OVERSIGHT  OF  FOREIGN  AVIATION 

REPAIR  STATIONS 

S.  HRG.  110–1126 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  20,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

74–105 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  AVIATION  OPERATIONS,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia, 

Chairman 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 20, 2007  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Lott 
......................................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller  ...........................................................................

WITNESSES 

Barimo,  Basil  J.,  Vice  President,  Operations  and  Safety,  Air  Transport  Asso-
ciation of America, Inc.  ........................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Brantley,  Tom,  President,  Professional  Airways  Systems  Specialists  (PASS), 
AFL–CIO  ...............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Filler,  Marshall  S.,  Managing  Director  and  General  Counsel,  Aeronautical 
Repair Station Association (ARSA)  .....................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Gilligan, Margaret, Deputy Associate Administrator for Aviation Safety, FAA 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Roach,  Jr.,  Robert,  General  Vice  President  of  Transportation,  International 
...........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Scovel  III,  Hon.  Calvin  L.,  Inspector  General,  U.S.  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Association of Machinists and Aerospace Workers 

APPENDIX 

Rockefeller  IV,  Hon.  John  D.,  U.S.  Senator  from  West  Virginia,  prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  John  D.  Rockefeller  IV: 
Marshall S. Filler 
.............................................................................................
Margaret Gilligan  .............................................................................................
Hon. Calvin L. Scovel III  .................................................................................

Page 
1 
58 
3 
53 
2 
1 

36 
38 

46 
47 

24 
26 
15 
17 

20 
22 

5 
7 

75 

77 
76 
75 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  FOREIGN  AVIATION 

REPAIR  STATIONS 

WEDNESDAY,  JUNE  20,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, SAFETY, AND 
SECURITY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:36  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  John  D.  Rockefeller 
IV, Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  My  apologies.  I’ve  been  in  the  Senate  for 
a  number  of  years  and  this  is  the  first  time  I’ve  ever  been  late  for 
anything. I’m just sorry it had to be you. 

This is an important oversight. Aviation safety is one of the Sub-
committee’s primary responsibilities and we, the Subcommittee, in-
terestingly,  there  aren’t  that  many  that  come.  Claire  McCaskill  is 
one, John Thune is another, Trent Lott, and myself come, but avia-
tion,  as  you  know,  is  a  very  difficult  subject  and  if  you’re  not  into 
the terminology and the weeds of that and with all the other things 
people have going on. I’m always a little bit embarrassed when we 
have a hearing on such an important manner, but Claire and I are 
here and that’s—actually you got a pretty good deal on that. 

The  Government  has  absolutely  no  more  important  role  in  mak-
ing  sure  that  our  Nation’s  aviation  systems  remain  the  safest  in 
the  world.  I  met  with  the  former  Prime  Minister  of  Ireland  this 
morning where we discussed this general subject in his new capac-
ity. I want to thank Senator McCaskill for requesting this hearing, 
which she did. It was she that requested it and she is aggressively 
seeking to improve our Nation’s aviation safety. 

Now, I would like to thank our other witnesses for coming today, 

as well. That’s all of you. 

I  have  a  few  brief  remarks  and  then  we’ll  ask  other  Senators  if 
they have opening statements and I know of at least one who will. 
First, I want to state that I firmly believe that the United States 
has  the  safest  and  the  best  air  system  in  the  world.  I  say  that  in 
spite  of  the  fact  that  we  have  an  analog  air  traffic  control  system, 
which  embarrasses  me  every  single  day  of  my  life,  since  we’re  the 
only  people  in  the  industrialized  world  that  have  that.  And  we’re 
trying  to  cure  that  in  the  bill,  which  we  passed  through  Congress 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

with various people objecting for what I call wholly insufficient rea-
sons. 

2 

I  do  not  want  to  give  anyone  the  impression  that  I  believe  it’s 
unsafe to fly, but the aviation industry continues to change rapidly 
in  light  of  unrelenting  competitive  pressures.  I  am  concerned  that 
the  quickly  changing  nature  of  the  commercial  aviation  industry, 
coupled  with  the  FAA’s  declining  level  of  resources,  threatens  the 
agency’s  ability  to  maintain  the  necessary  level  of  oversight  of  air 
carriers’ foreign repair stations and upgrade the existing safety in-
frastructure  at  our  own  airports.  It’s  a  massive  problem.  There 
have  been  huge  layoffs  because  of  budget  cuts  by  the  Administra-
tion. 

Although  I  understand  why  many  commercial  airlines  are  con-
tracting out an increasing amount of their maintenance work, I am 
concerned  that  this  work  is  being  sent  to  foreign  countries  where 
governmental oversight for both the home nation and the FAA may 
be weak or nonexistent. That is a much larger source of energy and 
concern than many of you will, at first, accept. You will accept this, 
you’ll hear the statement, but you need to understand this is a, the 
profound concern of, not just this Committee, but generally in Con-
gress. 

Compounding  the  industry’s  trend  to  outsource  much  of  the  sig-
nificant  maintenance  work,  is  the  inability  of  the  FAA  to  certify 
and  closely  monitor  an  ever  increasing  number  of  foreign  repair 
stations. I do not question the Agency’s commitment to safety. I be-
lieve that is due mainly to a lack of resources. I’m deeply concerned 
that the FAA is losing a number of its most senior safety inspectors 
and does not have the ability to replace them. 

This  Committee,  as  it  begins  evaluating  the  future  of  the  FAA, 
should be spending a considerable amount of its time making sure 
that  the  agency  is  able  to  meet  its  foremost  mission,  which  is  the 
safety of the traveling public. 

Again,  I  want  to  thank  Senator  McCaskill  for  her  leadership  on 
this  issue  and  I  call  on  her  for  any  statements  that  she  may  wish 
to make. 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And,  I  want  to 
thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing.  I  think  it  is  incredibly  impor-
tant.  I  think  if  the  American  people  understood  some  of  the  safety 
and security issues surrounding foreign repair stations, they would 
march on Washington with pitchforks. I began down this road sim-
ply  by  reviewing  a  summary  of  the  IG  report,  the  FAA  IG  reports 
of  both  2003  and  2005.  And,  as  I  began  to  pull  that  thread,  I  was 
surprised by what I learned and I hope today I will have the oppor-
tunity  to  ask  some  very,  I  hope,  penetrating  questions  in  four  dif-
ferent areas. 

First, on safety—if, in fact, qualified and certified inspection sites 
are  important  in  the  United  States  of  America,  then  why  aren’t 
they important in other countries? We can not have a double stand-
ard.  We  can  not  decide  that  you  have  to  get  to  a  certain  level  in 
the  United  States,  but  not  care  about  those  safety  levels  in  other 
countries.  If  drug  and  alcohol  testing  are  important  in  the  United 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

States  of  America,  they  should  be  important  in  every  location 
where someone has access to the physical operation of an airplane. 
In the security area—if background checks are important and pe-
rimeter  security  is  important  in  some  FAA-certified  sites,  they 
should be important in all sites. In June of 2007, the State Depart-
ment  put  out  its  latest  report  on  terrorism,  excuse  me,  in  June  of 
2006,  this  was  released  on  April  30,  2007.  The  following  countries 
where FAA-certified foreign repair stations are located, these coun-
tries  are  located  as  terrorist  safe  havens;  the  tri-border  region  of 
Argentina,  Brazil,  Columbia,  Indonesia,  and  the  Philippines.  If  we 
are  allowing  foreign  repair  stations  to  be  located  in  nations  that 
have  been  deemed  safe  havens  for  terrorists  by  our  own  State  De-
partment,  then  the  standard  should  be  very  high  in  deed  for  secu-
rity checks, background checks, and perimeter security. 

The  third  area  that  I  think  we  have  to  talk  about  today  is  ac-
countability.  If  the  Congress  passes  laws,  including  their  most  re-
cent  authorization  act,  and  requires  certain  rules  to  be  promul-
gated  and  certain  action  to  be  taken  by  FAA  and  TSA,  then  it  is 
imperative  that  those  rules  be  promulgated,  it  is  imperative  that 
those laws be followed. If we don’t force accountability for the laws 
that  Congress  has  already  passed,  then  one  could  ask,  what  is  the 
point of us being here to pass another FAA authorization act. 

And  finally  funding—and  it  is  forced  because  it  is  the  least  im-
portant. Safety and security are the most important, accountability 
of FAA and those people in the Homeland Security Department are 
incredibly important, but funding is also important. Should the tax-
payers  be  funding  any  part,  should  we  be  subsidizing  in  any  way 
the  effort  to  inspect  foreign  repair  stations?  Is  that  fair  to  those 
companies who are not going to the lowest wage and are continuing 
to  repair  their  airplanes  and  maintain  their  airplanes  here  in  the 
United States of America. 

Once  again,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  thank  you  very  much  for  holding 
this hearing and I look forward to hearing the testimony of the wit-
nesses.  I  appreciate  them  all  being  here,  as  I  know  you  do,  and  I 
look forward to having these questions answered. 

Thank you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator McCaskill. 
Senator Lott, do you have—Co-Chair of this Subcommittee. 
Senator  LOTT.  Well,  thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  glad  to  be  here 
and appreciate you having a hearing so we can fully understand all 
the  ramifications  of  this  issue.  I’d  like  to  withhold  any  comments 
at  this  time  so  we  can  hear  the  testimony  of  the  witnesses.  And 
maybe I’ll have some questions and some comments after that. 

Thank you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. That means you’ll have a lot of questions. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Senator Lautenberg. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  just  need  a 

moment to get organized. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well, we’re just going to sit here and look 

right at you and wait for you to be ready. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I respect that. 
OK,  thanks  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  congratulate  our  col-
league  from  Missouri  for  her  inquiry  into  the  bill  and  examining 
the  problems  that  we  see,  and  as  with  other  industries  across  the 
country  work  like  this,  being  outsourced  in  the  aviation  industry. 
Ten  years  ago,  airlines  outsourced  37  percent  of  their  mainte-
nance  work  according  to  the  DOT’s  Inspector  General.  Today,  they 
outsource  64  percent,  it’s  quite  incredible.  The  more  repair  work 
the  airlines  choose  to  send  overseas,  the  less  of  that  work  gets  in-
spected by FAA. 

But in 2003, an Air Midwest plane crashed, killing 19 passengers 
and  2  crew  members,  and  the  NTSB  investigated  and  found,  spe-
cifically,  that  a  lack  of  Federal  oversight  over  maintenance  had 
contributed to the accident. 

Seven hundred and sixty million people will fly this year, and by 
the  year  2015,  the  number’s  expected  to  hit  1  billion.  And  yet, 
while the number of passengers is increasing, the amount of main-
tenance work that the FAA inspects is decreasing. As of February, 
the  FAA  had  only  three  more  aviation  safety  staffers  than  it  had 
3 years ago. It doesn’t sound like it’s keeping up to date. And those 
inspectors  used  to  travel  primarily  to  staff  facilities  within  the 
country, but now they’ve got to go to aviation repair facilities as far 
away as China, without additional resources. 

So,  I  also  want  to  mention  my  concern  about  the  safety  of  the 
work  done  at  repair  stations  not  certified  by  the  FAA.  With  the 
summer  season  travel  upon  us,  long-term  agenda  in  air  travel 
trends  shows  no  sign  of  slowing.  This  is  not  the  time  to  take  any 
extra  risks  with  the  safety  of  our  aviation  system.  FAA  needs  to 
outline  what,  if  any,  work  it  will  allow  at  these  facilities,  for  the 
safety of our passengers and the viability of our economy, we need 
to know that our aircraft are being repaired responsibly, and those 
repairs are being overseen by the FAA. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thanks  very  much  for  the  opportunity  to  chat 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Lauten-

with you here. 

berg. 

I’m  going  to  introduce  the  panelists,  and  then  we’re  going  to  do 
something  a  little  bit  different.  Senator  McCaskill,  who  has  been 
the  driving  force  behind  this,  is  going  to  come  sit  here,  and  chair 
the hearing, and I will take her place, and stay and ask questions. 
Our  witnesses  are  Calvin  Scovel,  U.S.  Department  of  Transpor-
tation Inspector General; Peggy Gilligan, Deputy Associate Admin-
istration  for  Aviation  Safety,  FAA;  Robert  Roach,  General  Vice 
President,  International  Association  of  Machinists  and  Aerospace 
Workers; Marshall Filler, Managing Director and General Counsel, 
Aeronautical  Repair  Station  Association;  Basil  Barimo  who  is  Vice 
President  of  Operations  and  Safety,  Air  Transport  Association 
(ATA);  and  Tom  Brantley,  President,  Professional  Airway  Systems 
Specialists (PASS). So, just hold for 1 second. 

Senator  LOTT.  Are  we  going  to  have  the  testimony  of  the  wit-

nesses now, beginning with Mr. Scovel, I guess across the table? 

Senator MCCASKILL. Please, go ahead, thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

STATEMENT OF HON. CALVIN L. SCOVEL III, INSPECTOR 

GENERAL, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr. SCOVEL. Mr. Chairman, Madame Chairman, members of the 
Subcommittee,  we  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  FAA’s 
oversight of foreign repair stations and facilities. 

Air  carriers  have  outsourced,  or  contracted  out,  maintenance  for 
years to both domestic and foreign repair stations. However, in re-
cent years, use of external repair facilities has become more preva-
lent in the industry. 

From  1996  to  2006,  air  carriers  increased  the  percentage  of 
maintenance dollars spent on outsourced maintenance from 37 per-
cent to 64 percent. In 2006, $3.7 billion of the $5.7 billion spent on 
maintenance was outsourced. 

Neither  FAA  nor  the  Department  maintain  information  on  how 
much  maintenance  air  carriers  outsource  to  foreign  facilities,  but 
our work shows that the number of foreign, FAA-certificated repair 
stations  repairing  U.S.  aircraft  has  increased  from  344  in  1994  to 
698 in 2007. 

As  we  have  emphasized  in  the  past,  however,  the  issue  is  not 
where  maintenance  is  performed,  it  is  that  maintenance  requires 
effective oversight. 

We  see  three  areas  that  are  key  in  FAA’s  efforts  to  effectively 
oversee outsourced air carrier maintenance, including maintenance 
performed by foreign repair stations and facilities. First, FAA must 
strengthen  its  risk-based  systems  for  safety  oversight.  During  the 
past  8  years,  FAA  has  taken  important  steps  to  move  its  safety 
oversight for air carriers and repair stations to risk-based systems. 
FAA’s  new  oversight  system  applies  to  both  domestic  and  foreign 
repair  stations.  It  is  designed  to  help  FAA  inspectors  focus  their 
outsourced  maintenance  oversight  on  areas  that  pose  the  greatest 
safety  risks.  Risk-based  oversight  should  significantly  enhance 
FAA’s  ability  to  focus  its  inspections.  However,  we  have  identified 
a number of concerns that FAA must address. 

In July 2003, we reported that FAA oversight had not shifted to 
where  the  maintenance  was  actually  being  performed.  Instead,  in-
spectors  continued  to  focus  inspections  on  in-house  air  carrier 
maintenance.  We  also  reported,  that  at  that  time,  138  repair  sta-
tions  in  Germany,  France,  and  Ireland  were  not  inspected  by  FAA 
at  all.  Under  bilateral  agreements  with  the  aviation  authorities  of 
these countries, FAA permitted foreign authorities to inspect FAA- 
certificated repair stations on its behalf. 

Since our 2003 report, FAA officials have worked closely with the 
aviation  authorities  of  other  countries,  to  improve  the  surveillance 
they  perform  on  FAA’s  behalf.  We  are  concerned  that  FAA  is  still 
not  regularly  visiting  the  facilities  and  the  countries  where  agree-
ments  exist  with  other  aviation  authorities.  For  example,  FAA 
international  field  office  inspectors  had  not  conducted  any  spot  in-
spections  of  one  major  foreign  engine  repair  station  in  5  years  be-
tween 2001 and 2006. 

Recently, FAA has made significant progress in improving its re-
pair station oversight. Since October 2005, inspectors have been re-
quired to review 15 areas within repair station operations to obtain 
a  baseline  assessment  of  each  facility.  Using  this  information,  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

spectors  can  focus  their  oversight  on  risk  areas  identified  within 
the facility. 

For the new oversight system to be successful, FAA needs to en-
sure  that  its  inspectors  receive  the  training  they  need  to  properly 
implement these new processes. 

Second,  FAA  must  know  the  location  and  type  of  maintenance 
that is being performed. In July of 2003 and December of 2005, we 
reported  that  FAA  did  not  have  good  systems  for  determining 
which repair facilities air carriers were using to perform their most 
critical  maintenance.  Air  carriers  are  required  to  provide—and 
FAA must approve—a list of repair stations that can conduct major 
repairs  on  air  carriers’  aircraft.  However,  the  information  that  air 
carriers were providing did not always represent the facilities they 
actually used or show the quantity of work they sent to each facil-
ity. 

This  fiscal  year,  FAA  developed  new  inspector  guidance  and  air 
carrier processes to address this problem, but these efforts still fall 
short of providing FAA with the information it needs. 

For  example,  air  carriers  do  not  include  all  repair  stations  that 
provide  critical  component  repairs  in  their  quarterly  utilization  re-
ports. Also, FAA does not validate the information provided. 

Further, in December 2005, we reported that FAA was not aware 
that  non-certificated  repair  facilities  were  performing  critical  re-
pairs for U.S. air carriers. Our review of 19 air carrier maintenance 
vendor lists showed that all 19 carriers used non-certificated repair 
facilities  to  some  extent.  We  identified  over  1,400  non-certificated 
repair  facilities  performing  maintenance,  and  more  than  100  of 
these facilities were located in foreign countries. 

I  see  that  I  am  almost  out  of  time;  if  I  may  have,  perhaps,  an-

other 2 minutes, I should be able to wrap up. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Take the 2 minutes. 
Mr. SCOVEL. Thank you. 
Non-certificated facilities are not required to have the same qual-
ity controls and oversight systems that exist in FAA-certificated re-
pair  stations.  Yet,  there  are  no  limitations  on  the  scope  of  work 
they can perform. Further, FAA cannot rely on air carrier oversight 
programs  for  non-certificated  repair  facilities,  because  the  carriers 
we  visited  did  not  provide  adequate  oversight  of  the  work  per-
formed. FAA’s efforts to improve its oversight in this area are still 
underway. 

Third, FAA must ensure that its inspectors are well-positioned to 
adequately  oversee  maintenance  outsourcing.  FAA  has  approxi-
mately 3,821 inspectors located in offices around the world to over-
see  both  domestic  and  foreign  aspects  of  air  carrier  maintenance 
operations. However, FAA does not have a staffing model to deter-
mine  the  number  of  inspectors  needed  and  where  they  should  be 
placed. 

FAA  has  hired  an  independent  contractor  to  conduct  a  study  to 
determine the most effective staffing mechanism, but completion of 
this process is likely years away. 

The important implications of the changing U.S. and global avia-
tion  environment  that  we  have  discussed  today  are  expected  to  be 
key drivers of future inspector staffing needs. Air carrier outsourc-
ing  of  aircraft  maintenance,  FAA’s  shift  to  a  systems  safety  over-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

sight  approach,  and  safety  inspectors’  attrition  and  retirement  are 
all  significant  changes  that  must  be  considered  in  determining 
staffing  needs.  Until  FAA  develops  an  effective  staffing  model,  it 
will  not  be  able  to  determine  where  inspectors  should  be  placed  to 
make the most effective use of its resources. 

This  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  address  any 
questions  that  you  or  other  members  of  the  Subcommittee  may 
have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Scovel follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CALVIN L. SCOVEL III, INSPECTOR GENERAL, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Subcommittee: 
We appreciate the opportunity to testify on the Federal Aviation Administration’s 
(FAA)  oversight  of  foreign  repair  stations  and  facilities.  Our  testimony  today  is 
based on a number of our previous reports as well as our ongoing work. At the out-
set, it is important to note that while the United States has the most complex avia-
tion system in the world, it is also the safest. Multiple layers of controls in air car-
rier  operations  and  maintenance  processes,  along  with  FAA’s  oversight,  are  largely 
responsible for the high level of safety that we have seen in the last 5 years. 

This safety record is a remarkable accomplishment given the many changes occur-
ring  within  the  industry.  For  example,  air  carriers  continue  to  struggle  for  profit-
ability and are aggressively working to cut costs by reducing in-house staff, renego-
tiating labor agreements, and increasing the use of external repair facilities—many 
of which are located in foreign countries. 

Today’s  aviation  environment  continues  to  evolve.  Since  2001,  eight  commercial 
air  carriers  have  gone  through  bankruptcy  and  one  has  ceased  operations.  Fuel 
prices  remain  high,  and  this  makes  cost  control  a  key  factor  in  both  the  sustained 
profitability  and  overall  survival  of  an  airline.  Personnel  and  aircraft  maintenance 
are  also  significant  cost  areas  within  an  air  carrier’s  operations,  and  air  carriers 
have  been  outsourcing,  or  contracting  out,  more  maintenance  to  domestic  and  for-
eign repair stations to reduce these costs. Outsourcing maintenance is also a means 
for air carriers to accommodate the increasingly global nature of air travel. That is, 
having  maintenance  contracts  with  facilities  around  the  world  permits  air  carriers 
to readily obtain needed maintenance repairs and services. 

Air  carriers  have  outsourced  maintenance  for  years  to  both  domestic  and  foreign 
repair facilities. These facilities can complete repairs for less cost and provide serv-
ices  in  areas  (such  as  engine  repair)  that  would  otherwise  require  air  carriers  to 
have specialized equipment and staff. Many air carriers outsource their engine work 
to  the  original  equipment  manufacturers  because  of  the  level  of  expertise  and  the 
product  warranties  that  the  manufacturers  can  provide.  However,  in  recent  years, 
use  of  external  repair  facilities  has  become  more  prominent.  From  1996  to  2006, 
while total maintenance costs fluctuated, air carriers continued to increase the per-
centage  of  maintenance  dollars  spent  on  outsourced  maintenance—from  37  percent 
to  64  percent.  In  2006,  $3.7  billion  of  the  $5.7  billion  spent  on  maintenance  was 
outsourced (see figure 1). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Figure  1.  Percentage  Increase  in  Outsourced  (Contract)  Maintenance 

Expense for Major Air Carriers 1 From 1996 to 2006 

8 

Neither  FAA  nor  the  Department  maintain  information  on  how  much  mainte-
nance air carriers outsource to foreign facilities, but our work shows that the num-
ber  of  foreign  FAA-certificated  repair  stations  repairing  U.S.  aircraft  has  increased 
from  344  in  1994  to  698  in  2007.  We  have  emphasized  that  the  issue  is  not  where 
maintenance is performed but that maintenance requires effective oversight. 

However, we have identified challenges in FAA’s ability to effectively monitor the 
increase in outsourcing. For example, in July 2003, we reported 2 that FAA had not 
shifted its oversight of aircraft maintenance to the locations where the maintenance 
was performed. Although air carriers were using external repair stations to perform 
more  of  their  maintenance  work,  FAA  was  still  focusing  most  of  its  inspections  on 
the maintenance work that air carriers performed within their own facilities. 

FAA  has  taken  a  number  of  steps  to  improve  its  oversight,  and  we  will  discuss 
some  of  those  improvements  today.  However,  the  continuous  growth  in  outsourcing 
underscores  the  need  for  FAA  to  remain  vigilant  in  continually  improving  its  over-
sight. 

Today, I will begin by briefly discussing the regulatory differences between foreign 
and  domestic  repair  stations.  I  will  then  move  to  two  areas  that  we  see  as  key  in 
FAA’s  efforts  to  effectively  oversee  outsourced  air  carrier  maintenance—including 
that performed by foreign repair stations and facilities. 

• Regulatory differences between domestic and foreign repair stations: FAA-certifi-
cated  maintenance  facilities  are  referred  to  as  repair  stations.  FAA  has  certifi-
cated (or licensed) 698 foreign repair stations to perform work on U.S. aircraft. 
The  issuance  of  an  FAA  certificate  means  that  FAA  has  determined  that  the 
facilities have the equipment, personnel, and inspection systems to ensure that 
repairs are completed according to FAA standards. Unlike U.S. repair stations, 
foreign  repair  stations  must  first  demonstrate  a  need  to  obtain  an  FAA  certifi-
cate—that  is,  the  facility  must  show  that  it  has  potential  customers  with  U.S.- 
registered  aircraft.  Also,  foreign  repair  station  certificates  are  only  valid  for  a 
1- to 2-year period. 
These  requirements  are  more  stringent  than  those  mandated  for  domestic  re-
pair  stations.  However,  foreign  repair  stations  are  currently  exempt  from  some 
FAA  requirements  that  domestic  repair  stations  must  meet.  For  example,  FAA 
requires domestic repair stations to have drug and alcohol programs to periodi-
cally test employees performing maintenance but does not require foreign repair 
stations to perform drug and alcohol testing on their employees. 
• Strengthening  safety  oversight  of  repair  stations  and  non-certificated  repair  fa-
cilities:  During  the  past  8  years,  FAA  has  taken  important  steps  to  move  its 

1 Alaska  Airlines,  America  West  Airlines,  American  Airlines,  Continental  Airlines,  Delta  Air 

Lines, Northwest Airlines, Southwest Airlines, United Airlines, and US Airways. 

2 OIG Report Number AV–2003–047, ‘‘Review of Air Carriers’ Use of Aircraft Repair Stations,’’ 

July 8, 2003. OIG reports and testimonies can be found on our website: www.oig.dot.gov. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
V
O
C
S
0
2
6

9 

safety oversight for air carriers and repair stations to risk-based systems. FAA’s 
new oversight system applies to both domestic and foreign repair stations. It is 
designed  to  help  FAA  inspectors  focus  their  outsourced  maintenance  oversight 
on  areas  that  pose  the  greatest  safety  risks.  FAA  is  clearly  on  the  right  path; 
however, the risk-based systems are not yet at an end-state. 
FAA  cannot  effectively  implement  a  risk-based  system  for  oversight  of  aircraft 
maintenance  if  it  does  not  know  where  the  maintenance  is  performed.  In  July 
2003 and December 2005,3 we reported that FAA did not have good systems for 
determining which repair facilities air carriers were using to perform their most 
critical maintenance. FAA has developed new inspector guidance and air carrier 
processes  to  address  this  problem,  but  these  efforts  still  fall  short  of  providing 
FAA  with  the  information  it  needs.  For  example,  FAA  has  developed  a  vol-
untary  process  for  air  carriers  to  report  the  top  10  critical  maintenance  pro-
viders  used  each  quarter.  However,  as  long  as  the  process  is  voluntary,  FAA 
cannot be assured that it is getting the accurate and timely information needed 
to  determine  where  it  should  focus  its  inspections.  Further,  we  reported  that 
FAA  was  not  aware  that  non-certificated  repair  facilities  performed  critical  re-
pairs for U.S. air carriers. Our review of 19 air carrier maintenance vendor lists 
showed that all 19 air carriers used non-certificated repair facilities to some ex-
tent. We identified over 1,400 non-certificated repair facilities performing main-
tenance, and more than 100 of these facilities were located in foreign countries. 
FAA’s efforts to improve its oversight in this area are still underway. 

• Ensuring  that  inspectors  are  well-positioned  to  adequately  oversee  maintenance 
outsourcing: FAA has approximately 3,821 inspectors located in offices through-
out the United States and in other countries. FAA inspectors must oversee both 
domestic  and  foreign  aspects  of  air  carriers’  maintenance  operations—a  task 
made  more  difficult  by  the  rapidly  changing  aviation  environment.  The  pace  of 
these  changes  makes  it  imperative  for  FAA  to  maintain  a  sufficient  number  of 
inspectors to perform safety oversight and place them in the right locations. 
In the next 5 years, 51 percent of the current inspection workforce will be eligi-
ble  to  retire.  However,  this  is  only  one  of  the  challenges  that  FAA  faces  with 
its  inspectors.  For  example,  FAA  does  not  have  a  staffing  model  to  determine 
the  number  of  inspectors  needed  and  where  they  should  be  placed.  Until  FAA 
develops  a  staffing  model,  it  will  not  be  able  to  make  the  most  effective  use  of 
its resources. 

I  would  now  like  to  discuss  the  changes  occurring  in  the  aviation  industry,  regu-

latory differences, and these two key areas in further detail. 
Recent Trends in Outsourcing 

We are conducting a review of the type and quantity of maintenance that air car-
riers are outsourcing; we plan to report on this review later this year. We are find-
ing  that  the  amount,  or  quantity,  of  maintenance  that  air  carriers  outsource  con-
tinues  to  climb.  Further,  the  work  that  U.S.  air  carriers  outsource  includes  every-
thing  from  repairing  critical  components,  such  as  landing  gear  and  engine  over-
hauls, to performing heavy airframe maintenance checks, which are a complete tear-
down  and  overhaul  of  aircraft.  As  shown  in  figure  2,  nine  major  air  carriers 4 we 
reviewed  increased  the  percentage  of  heavy  maintenance  they  outsourced  to  certifi-
cated repair stations from 34 percent in 2003 to 67 percent in 2006. 

3 OIG  Report  Number  AV–2006–031,  ‘‘Review  of  Air  Carriers’  Use  of  Non-Certificated  Repair 

Facilities,’’ December 15, 2005. 

4 The carriers represent a cross-section of nine of the largest network and low-cost air carriers 
and  included:  AirTran  Airways,  Alaska  Airlines,  America  West  Airlines,  Continental  Airlines, 
Delta Air Lines, JetBlue Airways, Northwest Airlines, Southwest Airlines, and United Airlines. 
Because  American  Airlines,  the  largest  U.S.  air  carrier,  has  retained  its  heavy  maintenance  as 
opposed to making a significant shift to outsourcing, we did not include it in our review. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Figure  2.  Percentage  of  Heavy  Airframe  Maintenance  Checks  Outsourced 

for Nine Major Air Carriers From 2003 to 2006 

10 

Of the heavy maintenance outsourced by the nine carriers in 2006, 35 percent was 
sent to foreign maintenance providers, up from 21 percent in 2003. The trend in out-
sourcing is significant and underscores the need for FAA to ensure that it has accu-
rate  information  on  where  critical  maintenance  is  performed  so  it  can  target  its  in-
spection resources. 

Repair  stations  certificated  by  FAA  are  located  worldwide,  as  shown  in  figure  3. 
There are currently 4,216 domestic and 698 foreign FAA-certificated repair stations 
available for use by U.S. air carriers. 
Figure 3. Locations of FAA-Certificated Repair Stations 

In addition, there are approximately 900 repair facilities in Canada that could be 
used by U.S. air carriers. Under a reciprocal agreement with the United States, Ca-
nadian officials certify and monitor operations at these facilities. FAA oversees work 
performed  on  U.S.  aircraft.  At  least  two  major  U.S.  carriers  use  Canadian  facilities 
to perform heavy airframe maintenance, and, as I will discuss later, air carriers also 
use  domestic  and  other  foreign  non-certificated  repair  facilities  to  perform  aircraft 
maintenance. 
Regulatory Differences Between Domestic and Foreign Repair Stations 

FAA  has  approved  698  repair  stations  in  countries  around  the  world  to  perform 
work  on  U.S.  aircraft.  While  FAA  verifies  that  the  repair  stations  have  the  equip-
ment,  personnel,  and  inspection  systems  to  ensure  that  repairs  are  completed  ac-
cording  to  FAA  standards,  the  repair  stations  are  under  the  regulatory  control  of 
a  foreign  governmental  authority.  As  a  result,  there  are  some  requirements  that 
FAA  does  not  impose  on  the  facilities.  For  example,  FAA  does  not  require  foreign 
repair  stations  to  conduct  background  checks  or  drug  and  alcohol  testing  on  their 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
V
O
C
S
0
2
6

s
p
e
.

2
V
O
C
S
0
2
6

11 

employees. There are also other differences between foreign and domestic repair sta-
tions (see table 1). 

Table 1. Regulatory Differences Between Domestic and Foreign Repair Stations 

Regulatory Difference 

Domestic FAA-Certificated 

Repair Stations 

Foreign FAA-Certificated Repair Stations 

Duration of FAA Certificate  Certificate lasts indefinitely  Certificate must be renewed every 

Fees for Certification 

Drug and Alcohol Testing 

Program 

Certificated Mechanics 

Security Regulations 

Do not pay FAA for certifi-
cation 
Required to have a program  Not required to have a program.

1 to 2 years.
Pay FAA for certification and 
renewal costs.

Certain personnel, such as 
return to service and super-
visory personnel, must be 
FAA-certificated 

Repair stations on commer-
cial airport property are 
subject to security require-
ments 

Personnel are not required to be 
FAA-certificated.
(Note: Personnel must meet certain 
training and qualification 
requirements. Mechanics may be 
certificated by the aviation 
authority where they are located).
Repair stations are not subject to 
U.S. security requirements.

Source: OIG 
As table 1 demonstrates, foreign repair stations must comply with more stringent 
requirements,  in  some  respects,  than  domestic  repair  stations  to  get  and  maintain 
their  FAA  certification.  For  example,  foreign  repair  station  applicants  must  show 
the need to obtain an FAA certificate. That is, applicants must be able to show that 
they  have  customers  with  U.S.-registered  aircraft  or  customers  with  parts  used  on 
U.S.-registered aircraft. U.S. repair station applicants do not have to meet these cri-
teria.  Also,  an  FAA  foreign  repair  station  certificate  is  only  valid  for  a  1-  to  2-year 
period. 

Foreign  repair  stations  must  pay  for  comprehensive  annual  or  biannual  FAA-re-
quired inspections in order to maintain, or renew, their certificate, whereas domestic 
repair  stations  can  hold  their  certificates  indefinitely.  Conversely,  in  some  areas, 
such as personnel requirements, domestic repair stations are held to more stringent 
provisions  than  their  foreign  counterparts.  For  example,  U.S.  repair  stations  must 
employ FAA-certificated mechanics to approve all repairs; foreign repair stations are 
not held to this requirement. 

However,  some  foreign  countries  may  have  their  own  mechanic  licensing  require-
ments  that  are  just  as  stringent  as  those  required  of  FAA-certificated  mechanics. 
For  example,  one  country  we  visited  requires  its  mechanics  to  be  at  least  21  years 
old  and  have  a  minimum  of  48  months  of  aviation  experience.  Also,  this  country’s 
mechanics are certificated for a specific size of aircraft. In contrast, FAA-certificated 
mechanics must be at least 18 years old and have a minimum of 30 months of avia-
tion experience; also, they can work on aircraft of any size. 

In  2003,  we  identified  another  difference  between  foreign  and  some  domestic  re-
pair  stations—repair  stations  located  on  commercial  U.S.  airport  property  must 
comply  with  U.S.  security  requirements.  Repair  stations  located  on  foreign  airport 
property in foreign countries are not subject to U.S. security requirements. The level 
and depth of security programs in other countries, including background checks, are 
subject to the government requirements in the country where the repair station op-
erates. 

To address security concerns at aircraft repair stations, Congress included a provi-
sion  in  the  Federal  Aviation  Reauthorization  Act  (Vision  100),5 which  required  the 
Transportation  Security  Administration,  in  consultation  with  FAA,  to  issue  a  final 
rule imposing security standards on foreign and domestic repair stations by August 
2004. The rule has not yet been issued. 
Strengthening  Safety  Oversight  of  Repair  Stations  and  Non-Certificated 

Repair Facilities 

FAA  has  strengthened  its  repair  station  oversight  through  implementation  of  a 
risk-based  oversight  system  for  both  domestic  and  foreign  repair  stations.  The  sys-

5 Vision 100—Century of Aviation Reauthorization Act, Pub. L. No. 108–176 (2003). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

tem  is  designed  for  inspectors  to  use  information  obtained  from  data  analysis  to 
focus  their  oversight  on  areas  with  the  greatest  safety  risks.  In  our  view,  a  risk- 
based  system  is  even  more  crucial  to  FAA’s  ability  to  maximize  its  inspection  re-
sources  and  travel  budget  given  the  increasingly  global  nature  of  the  airline  indus-
try.  Risk-based  oversight  should  significantly  enhance  FAA’s  ability  to  focus  its  in-
spections; however, we have identified a number of concerns that FAA must address 
to continue advancing the program. 
FAA  Must  Ensure  That  Its  New  Risk-Based  Oversight  System  for  Repair  Stations 

Is Effective 

In July 2003, we reported that FAA oversight had not shifted to where the main-
tenance was actually being performed. Instead, inspectors continued to focus inspec-
tions  on  in-house  air  carrier  maintenance.  For  example,  inspectors  completed  400 
inspections of in-house maintenance at 1 air carrier but only 7 inspections of repair 
stations.  This  occurred  even  though  this  carrier  contracted  out  nearly  half  of  its 
maintenance that year. 

We  also  reported  that  138  repair  stations  in  Germany,  France,  and  Ireland  were 
not  inspected  by  FAA  at  all.  Under  a  bilateral  agreement  with  the  European  Joint 
Aviation  Authorities,  FAA  permitted  foreign  authorities  to  inspect  FAA-certificated 
repair stations on its behalf to prevent duplicative inspections and reduce the finan-
cial  burden  on  foreign  repair  stations.  However,  FAA  did  not  have  an  adequate 
method  to  monitor  the  surveillance  performed  by  other  authorities.  For  example, 
most of the inspection files we reviewed that FAA received from the foreign authori-
ties  were  either  incomplete,  written  in  a  foreign  language,  or  otherwise  difficult  to 
comprehend. 

Since  our  2003  report,  FAA  officials  have  worked  closely  with  the  aviation  au-
thorities  of  other  countries  to  improve  the  surveillance  they  perform  on  FAA’s  be-
half. For example, FAA is no longer limited in the number of inspections it can per-
form to verify the quality of foreign aviation authority inspections. However, we are 
concerned  that  FAA  is  still  not  regularly  visiting  the  facilities  in  the  countries 
where  agreements  exist  with  other  aviation  authorities.  For  example,  FAA  inter-
national  field  office  inspectors  had  not  conducted  any  spot  inspections  of  one  major 
foreign engine repair station in 5 years (2001–2006). In addition, FAA inspectors for 
1 air carrier that used the repair station had not visited the facility within the same 
5-year period, even though the repair station had performed maintenance on 39 (74 
percent) of the 53 engines repaired for the air carrier. 

In recent years, FAA has made significant progress in improving its repair station 
oversight.  For  example,  under  FAA’s  old  inspection  system  for  repair  stations,  in-
spectors  were  instructed  to  perform  one  inspection  of  each  facility  per  year  and 
could  review  any  aspect  of  the  repair  station’s  operations.  Inspectors  were  not  re-
quired  to  provide  detailed  information  on  the  areas  they  inspected  or  the  issues 
identified.  Since  October  2005,  inspectors  have  been  required  to  review  15  areas 
within  repair  station  operations  to  obtain  a  baseline  assessment  of  each  facility. 
Using the information from this assessment, inspectors can focus their oversight on 
risk  areas  identified  within  the  facility.  Further,  the  information  generated  from 
this  oversight  will  be  available  for  review  by  all  FAA  inspectors  to  assist  them  in 
targeting their inspections more effectively. 

For  the  new  oversight  system  to  be  successful,  FAA  needs  to  ensure  that  its  in-
spectors  receive  the  training  they  need  to  properly  implement  the  new  processes. 
FAA  must  also  ensure  that  it  has  reliable  processes  for  determining  where  mainte-
nance is performed. 
FAA Must Have Adequate Processes for Determining Where the Most Critical Mainte-

nance Is Performed and How it Should Be Monitored 

In  2003,  we  reported  that  FAA  inspectors  did  not  have  effective  procedures  for 
determining  which  FAA-certificated  repair  stations  air  carriers  were  using  to  per-
form maintenance that could impact the airworthiness of their aircraft. In December 
2005,  we  reported  that  FAA  was  unaware  of  air  carriers’  use  of  non-certificated  re-
pair  facilities  to  perform  critical  maintenance.6 These  facilities  are  not  covered 
under  FAA’s  routine  oversight  program  and  do  not  have  the  same  regulatory  re-
quirements as repair stations that obtain certification from FAA. 

Air carriers are required to provide—and FAA must approve—a list of substantial 
maintenance providers, which are repair stations that can conduct major repairs on 

6 In  our  December  2005  report,  we  identified  critical  repairs  as  those  repairs  categorized  as 
Required Inspection Items by each air carrier. Required Inspection Items are mandatory mainte-
nance  activities  that,  due  to  the  importance  to  the  overall  airworthiness  of  the  aircraft,  must 
be independently inspected by a specially trained inspector after the work is completed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

the  air  carrier’s  aircraft.  These  procedures  are  designed  to  provide  inspectors  with 
information  on  where  air  carriers  intend  to  send  their  substantial  maintenance. 
However,  the  information  that  air  carriers  provided  did  not  always  represent  the 
facilities they actually used or show the quantity of work they sent to each facility. 
For  example,  we  identified  one  foreign  repair  station  designated  as  a  ‘‘substantial 
maintenance  provider’’  for  a  major  U.S.  carrier  even  though  it  had  not  conducted 
any  significant  maintenance  work  for  the  air  carrier  in  almost  3  years.  FAA’s  sur-
veillance should be better targeted to those repair facilities that air carriers use reg-
ularly. 

FAA’s  new  process  for  identifying  certificated  repair  stations  that  air  carriers  use 
to  perform  maintenance  is  not  effective.  In  response  to  our  July  2003  report,  FAA 
implemented  a  system  in  Fiscal  Year  2007  for  both  air  carriers  and  repair  stations 
to  submit  quarterly  utilization  reports.  These  reports  are  supposed  to  show  the 
quantity,  or  volume,  of  critical  repairs  that  maintenance  providers  perform  for  air 
carriers and repair stations. However, submission of this information is not manda-
tory.  FAA’s  Flight  Standards  staff  advised  us  that  a  new  rule  would  be  required  to 
make volume reporting mandatory and that they believed air carriers would provide 
the  requested  information  voluntarily.  Early  indicators  show  that  air  carriers  are 
submitting the reports. Our review of FAA records for nine air carriers showed that 
as of March 23, 2007, seven of the nine air carriers had submitted quarterly utiliza-
tion  reports  for  the  quarter  ending  December  2006.  FAA  must  ensure  that  air  car-
riers file these reports in a timely manner. 

Our primary concerns with the reports are that (1) air carriers do not include all 
repair stations that provide critical component repairs and (2) FAA does not validate 
the  information  provided.  Air  carriers  are  only  requested  to  report  the  top  10  sub-
stantial  maintenance  providers  used—the  ones  most  frequently  used  per  quarter. 
The reports do not have to include repair stations that perform high-volume, critical 
component  repairs  on  parts  such  as  wheels  and  brakes  because  FAA’s  definition  of 
substantial maintenance does not include component repairs. Further, without some 
form of data verification, FAA cannot be assured that air carriers have provided ac-
curate and complete information. If the reports are to be an effective means for FAA 
to  track  and  accurately  target  those  repair  facilities  that  air  carriers  use  the  most, 
a more thorough process will be needed. 

FAA needs to develop a mechanism to identify non-certificated repair facilities per-
forming  critical  maintenance  for  air  carriers.  In  December  2005,  we  reported  that 
air  carriers  were  using  domestic  and  foreign  repair  facilities  that  were  not  certifi-
cated by FAA to perform critical and scheduled 7 aircraft maintenance. FAA was un-
aware of this practice. Air carriers have used non-certificated facilities for years, but 
it was widely believed that these facilities principally performed minor aircraft work 
on an as-needed basis. However, we determined that both domestic and foreign non- 
certificated facilities can and do perform the same type of work as FAA-certificated 
repair stations, including scheduled and critical maintenance. We examined records 
at  three  air  carriers  and  identified  6  domestic  and  foreign  facilities  that  performed 
scheduled maintenance and 21 that performed maintenance critical to the airworthi-
ness of the aircraft. 

We  are  especially  concerned  that  air  carriers  rely  on  non-certificated  facilities  to 
perform  scheduled  maintenance  tasks  that  the  air  carriers  can  plan  for  well  in  ad-
vance.  For  example,  we  identified  an  air  carrier’s  use  of  a  non-certificated  facility 
to  perform  work  on  three  aircraft  that  was  required  for  compliance  with  an  FAA 
Airworthiness  Directive.  Other  critical  repairs  we  found  included  adjustments  to 
flight control systems and removal and replacement of an engine. 

FAA  does  not  know  how  many  non-certificated  maintenance  facilities  air  carriers 
currently  use  because  it  does  not  maintain  a  list  of  the  facilities.  We  sampled  19 
air carriers, and all 19 were using non-certificated facilities to some extent. We iden-
tified over 1,400 non-certificated repair facilities performing maintenance, and more 
than 100 of these facilities were located in foreign countries, such as Aruba, Belize, 
Bermuda, Dominican Republic, El Salvador, Guatemala, Haiti, and Mexico. It is im-
portant  to  note  that  in  many  instances,  air  carriers  contracted  with  facilities  in 
these  locations  to  ensure  that  they  had  a  maintenance  source  in  locations  where 
there were no FAA-certificated repair stations available. 

Nevertheless, permitting non-certificated facilities to perform critical maintenance 
is  an  important  issue  that  FAA  must  address.  To  do  so,  FAA  must  first  determine 
which  non-certificated  facilities  perform  critical  and  scheduled  maintenance  and 
then decide if it should limit the type of work these facilities can perform. 

7 This  maintenance  is  required  to  be  performed  at  regularly  scheduled  times,  such  as  inspec-
tions  required  after  the  aircraft  has  flown  a  designated  number  of  hours  (e.g.,  inspections  of 
crew and passenger oxygen, aircraft fuselage, wings, and engines). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

FAA  Cannot  Rely  on  Air  Carrier  Oversight  Programs  for  Non-Certificated  Repair 

Facilities 

FAA  permits  air  carriers  to  use  domestic  and  foreign  non-certificated  facilities  as 
long as the work is approved by an FAA-certificated mechanic. However, this is not 
an  adequate  substitute  for  an  FAA-certificated  repair  facility  because  non-certifi-
cated  facilities  do  not  have  the  safeguards  and  controls  for  maintenance  repair  and 
oversight  that  is  required  at  FAA-certificated  facilities.  Differences  in  FAA  require-
ments for these two types of maintenance operations are illustrated in table 2. 

Table 2. Differences in Requirements for FAA-Certificated Repair Stations 

and Non-Certificated Facilities 

FAA Requirement 

Certificated Repair 

Station 

Annual FAA Inspections 
Quality Control System 
Report Failures, Malfunctions, and Defects 
Designated Supervisors and Inspectors 
Training Program 
Facilities and Housing* 

Required 
Required 
Required 
Required 
Required 
Required 

Non-Certificated 
Repair Facility 

Not Required 
Not Required 
Not Required 
Not Required 
Not Required 
Not Required 

* If  authorized  to  perform  airframe  repairs,  certificated  repair  stations  must  have  facilities  large  enough  to 

house the aircraft they are authorized to repair. 

Source: OIG analysis. 
We  found  that  air  carrier  quality  systems  under  which  these  repairs  were  per-
formed  were  not  as  effective  as  they  should  have  been.  This  was  particularly  true 
in the areas of mechanic training and oversight of these facilities. 

Non-certificated repair facilities are not required to employ designated supervisors 
and inspectors to monitor maintenance work as it is being performed. Relying solely 
on  the  expertise  of  an  individual  mechanic  to  ensure  that  repairs  are  completed 
properly  is  an  inadequate  control  mechanism.  In  our  view,  this  is  the  reason  FAA 
requires  added  layers  of  oversight,  such  as  designated  supervisors  and  inspectors, 
in its certificated facilities. 

In our December 2005 report, we stated that neither FAA nor the six air carriers 
we visited provided adequate oversight of the work performed at non-certificated re-
pair facilities. The air carriers we reviewed relied primarily on telephone contact to 
monitor maintenance performed at these facilities rather than conducting on-site re-
views of the actual maintenance work. In contrast, as an added level of quality con-
trol, air carriers often assign on-site representatives to monitor the work performed 
at certificated repair stations. 

Despite the differences in quality controls and oversight that exist between certifi-
cated  and  non-certificated  maintenance  facilities,  there  are  no  limitations  on  the 
scope  of  work  that  non-certificated  repair  facilities  can  perform.  For  example,  we 
looked at critical repairs performed under special authorizations at 1 air carrier and 
found  that  over  a  3-year  period,  14  of  the  19  (74  percent)  repairs  were  performed 
at non-certificated repair facilities. Examples of the work performed include landing 
gear  checks,  lightning  strike  inspections,  and  door  slide  replacements.  In  contrast, 
FAA-certificated  repair  stations  are  limited  to  completing  only  the  specific  mainte-
nance tasks that FAA has determined the facility is capable of performing. 

FAA  agreed  that  it  needs  to  place  more  emphasis  on  the  oversight  that  air  car-
riers provide to non-certificated facilities and that it needs to gather more informa-
tion  on  the  type  of  work  these  facilities  perform.  FAA’s  efforts  in  this  area  are  still 
underway.  If  FAA  is  to  achieve  the  planned  improvements  in  oversight  of 
outsourced maintenance, it will need to obtain definitive data on where air carriers 
are  getting  the  maintenance  performed,  including  critical  and  scheduled  mainte-
nance  work  done  at  non-certificated  repair  facilities,  so  that  it  can  focus  its  inspec-
tions to areas of greatest risk. 
Ensuring 

Inspectors  Are  Well-Positioned  To  Adequately  Oversee 

Maintenance Outsourcing 

In  June  2005,  we  reported  that  FAA  needed  to  ensure  that  its  inspection  work-
force was adequately staffed. Currently, FAA has approximately 3,821 inspectors lo-
cated in offices throughout the United States and other countries. FAA has assigned 
a  portion  of  its  inspector  workforce  to  verify  that  foreign  facilities  used  by  U.S.  air 
carriers  continue  to  meet  FAA  standards.  As  shown  in  table  3,  FAA  has  86  Inter-
national  Field  Office  inspectors.  Of  these  86  inspectors,  approximately  47  are  lo-
cated abroad (i.e., Germany, England, and Singapore). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Table 3. FAA International Field Office Inspectors and Their Areas of Responsibility 

15 

International Field 

Office (IFO) 

Number of 
Inspectors 

Area of Responsibility 

Dallas IFO 
Frankfurt IFO 

London IFO 
Miami IFO 

San Francisco IFO 

Singapore IFO 

5 
26 

13 
20 

14 

8 

TOTAL 

86 Inspectors 

Mexico 
Europe (excluding the United Kingdom), 

Africa, and the Middle East 

United Kingdom 
South  America,  Central  America,  and 

the Caribbean 

Australia,  New  Zealand,  Japan,  Korea, 
Philippines,  Fiji,  Taiwan,  and  other 
Asian-Pacific Island Nations 

China,  Hong  Kong,  India,  Indonesia, 
Malaysia,  Singapore,  Thailand,  and 
other Asian-Pacific Nations 

Number of 

Foreign 
Repair 
Stations 

20 
300 

162 
52 

61 

103 

698 Repair 

Stations 

Source: FAA data (as of June 10, 2007). 
FAA  will  never  have  enough  inspectors  to  oversee  every  aspect  of  aviation  oper-
ations.  However,  FAA  faces  challenges  in  balancing  potential  inspector  retirements 
with  the  number  of  inspectors  it  is  able  to  hire.  This  year,  27  percent  (or  1,037  of 
the  3,821)  of  the  current  inspector  workforce  will  be  eligible  to  retire.  By  2012,  51 
percent  of  the  workforce  will  be  eligible  to  retire.  To  counter  this  trend,  FAA  re-
quested  funding  to  hire  an  additional  203  aviation  safety  inspectors  in  its  Fiscal 
Year 2008 budget submission. In 2006, FAA hired 538 inspectors, but lost 226 (181 
to  retirements  and  45  for  other  reasons).  However,  FAA  will  need  to  know  where 
to place inspectors to make the most effective use of its resources. 
FAA Needs a Process To Determine Inspector Placement 

FAA  does  not  have  a  process  to  determine  the  number  of  inspectors  needed  and 
where  they  should  be  placed.  FAA  has  made  at  least  two  attempts  to  develop  a 
staffing model to determine the appropriate number of and best locations for its in-
spectors.  However,  neither  of  the  two  models  provided  FAA  with  an  effective  ap-
proach to allocate inspector resources. During our review of FAA oversight of finan-
cially  distressed  and  low-cost  air  carriers,  we  found  inconsistencies  in  the  way  that 
FAA  allocated  inspectors  among  field  offices.  For  example,  two  FAA  offices  had  the 
same  number  of  inspectors  assigned  to  oversee  the  air  carriers  in  their  geographic 
areas even though one of those carriers had twice as many aircraft and 127 percent 
more flights than the other. 

Until  FAA  develops  an  effective  staffing  model,  it  will  not  be  able  to  determine 
where  inspectors  should  be  placed  to  make  the  most  effective  use  of  its  resources. 
The  important  implications  of  the  changing  U.S.  and  global  aviation  environment 
that we have discussed today are expected to be key drivers of future inspector staff-
ing needs. Air carriers’ outsourcing of aircraft maintenance, FAA’s shift to a system 
safety oversight approach, and safety inspectors’ attrition and retirement are all sig-
nificant  changes  that  must  be  considered  in  determining  staffing  needs.  FAA  ad-
vised us that it has hired an independent contractor to conduct a study to determine 
the most effective staffing mechanism. However, completion of this process is likely 
years away. 

Mr.  Chairman,  that  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  address  any 

questions that you or other members of the Subcommittee might have. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Inspector General Scovel. 
Ms. Gilligan? 
STATEMENT OF MARGARET GILLIGAN, DEPUTY ASSOCIATE 

ADMINISTRATOR FOR AVIATION SAFETY, FAA 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Thank  you,  and  I’m  pleased  to  appear  before  the 
Committee today to discuss aviation safety, because the system has 
never  been  so  safe,  and  so  there  can  never  be  a  better  time  for  us 
to focus on how we can continue to build on that safety record. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

While  the  focus  for  the  Committee  today  is  on  the  issue  of  air-
craft maintenance, it is important to keep this issue in context. The 
truth  is,  in  the  recent  past,  we  have  suffered  very  few  major  acci-
dents.  That’s  because  of  concerted  efforts  by  FAA  and  those  in-
volved  in  the  aviation  industry.  We’ve  been  working  through  the 
commercial  aviation  safety  team  for  the  last  decade,  to  establish 
safety  requirements  for  things  like  new  technology,  training,  and 
standard  operating  procedures.  We’ve  reduced  the  fatal  accident 
rate significantly. The results speak for themselves. 

In  the  1940s,  we  had  about  1,300  fatalities,  for  100  million  pas-
sengers  and  crew  carried.  By  1995,  that  number  had  dropped  to 
about 47 fatalities. The average for the last 3 years has been about 
4 fatalities per 100 million passengers and crew carried. That acci-
dent  rate  is  not  one  of  fate  or  luck.  It  is  the  achievement,  and  the 
result of a lot of hard work. 

In  fact,  we  compare  ourselves  to  medicine,  which  also  addresses 
public  health  and  safety.  Like  medicine,  we  have  virtually  elimi-
nated  major  causes  of  accidents.  Just  as  dedicated  physicians  and 
researchers  have  eliminated  smallpox  and  polio.  This  industry  has 
virtually eliminated mid-air collisions, controlled flight into terrain 
accidents, and wind shear accidents. And I can assure you, we will 
not see those accidents as persistent, recurring accident types that 
they have been, historically. 

In those cases, we used a layered approach to address the safety 
risk.  That’s  the  same  layered  approach  that  we  take  to  aviation 
maintenance. 

The  first  layer  for  establishing  the  safety  of  aircraft  is  in  design 
and  manufacture,  and  that  we  hold  to  the  highest  standards.  We 
require  designers  to  anticipate  potential  failures,  and  design  safe 
solutions.  We  know  that  the  people  involved  in  the  system—pilots 
and mechanics—will make mistakes. Our challenge is to anticipate 
those mistakes, and design for them. This makes the aircraft what 
we call ‘‘air tolerant,’’ and this is true whether the aircraft is man-
ufactured in the U.S., in Canada, in Europe or in Brazil. 

Once  the  aircraft  is  introduced  into  service,  we  require  a  second 
layer  of  defense—an  airline  maintenance  program.  This  includes 
identifying  the  facilities  and  equipment  to  perform  the  work,  and 
training  and  detailed  instructions  for  those  who  will  do  the  work. 
It is true, we don’t require the airline to provide all of those ele-
ments itself—it can contract with other companies to provide some 
of  those  facilities,  or  to  perform  some  of  the  work.  But  the  work 
must  always  be  done  in  accordance  with  the  airlines’  training  and 
maintenance programs. 

As  we  all  know,  there’s  a  changing  industry  dynamic,  as  it  re-
lates  to  maintenance  work.  Airlines  are  contracting  more  often  to 
have work done by third parties. Some airlines are developing their 
own  areas  of  expertise,  and  performing  contract  maintenance  in 
those  areas  for  other  airlines,  and  many  are  using  providers  all 
around the world. 

But the airline is always responsible for the work performed, and 
for  the  decision  to  return  the  aircraft  to  service  after  determining 
that it’s safe. 

That’s  why  our  third  layer  is  a  requirement  that  the  airlines 
have  a  continuing  analysis  and  surveillance  system.  Simply  put, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

this  is  a  regulatory  requirement  that  ensures  the  airlines  track 
every  aircraft’s  performance,  and  identify  any  failures.  It  also  al-
lows the airline to identify when a repair may not have solved the 
root problem. 

So,  whether  the  airline  maintains  the  aircraft,  or  uses  contract 
workers,  the  airline  is  always  monitoring  the  aircraft’s  perform-
ance, and evaluating the aircraft for its air worthiness. 

And,  the  fourth  layer  is  FAA  oversight.  For  many  years,  we  did 
inspections  based  on  inspector  experience,  and  well-educated  gut 
reactions. And that worked fine for us, for a very long time. 

But  now  we  have  automated  tools  that  allow  our  inspectors  to 
focus  their  attention  in  areas  of  risk.  And  we’ve  integrated  our 
databases  in  response  to  Inspector  General  recommendations,  so 
inspectors  assigned  to  an  airline,  and  the  inspectors  assigned  at 
the  repair  station  that  might  be  used  by  that  airline,  are  sharing 
up-to-the-minute  data.  This  makes  both  of  those  inspectors  more 
productive. 

All  of  these  layers  of  requirements  apply  wherever  the  aircraft 
operates,  and  wherever  the  repair  and  maintenance  work  is  done. 
And FAA inspectors share the same kinds of data, whether the in-
spector is in London, or in Lincoln, Nebraska, and whether the air-
line  is  using  a  repair  station  in  Asia,  or  its  own  facility  in  Tulsa, 
Oklahoma. 

We’re  always  looking  for  ways  to  enhance  the  safety  of  the  sys-
tem,  and  hearings  like  this  one  provide  us  another  opportunity  to 
continue the dialogue among all of us who are dedicated to aviation 
safety, so that we can improve on our safety record. 

I look forward to responding to any questions you may have this 

afternoon. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Gilligan follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARGARET GILLIGAN, DEPUTY ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR 

FOR AVIATION SAFETY, FAA 

Chairman  Rockefeller,  Senator  Lott,  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am 
pleased to appear before you to discuss the Federal Aviation Administration’s (FAA) 
oversight  of  air  carrier  maintenance  that  is  outsourced  to  foreign  repair  stations. 
(Just  to  be  clear,  outsourcing  is  any  maintenance  performed  for  an  air  carrier  by 
any  individuals  who  are  not  employed  by  the  air  carrier  whether  in  the  U.S.  or 
abroad.)  I  know  the  industry  trend  to  outsource  more  of  its  maintenance  in  recent 
years  has  been  a  concern  for  some  of  you.  To  some,  outsourcing  equates  to  cutting 
corners  to  save  a  few  dollars.  To  some,  less  costly  maintenance  means  less  safe 
maintenance.  To  some,  repair  stations  represent  lesser  quality  maintenance.  All 
these  assumptions  imply  that  safety  is  being  compromised  as  more  maintenance  is 
outsourced.  I  am  here  today  to  reassure  you  that  the  quality  of  maintenance  is  not 
compromised  simply  because  it  is  not  being  done  by  an  air  carrier.  No  less  an  au-
thority  than  the  former  Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General  (IG),  Ken 
Meade, testified before Congress that use of these stations is not a question of qual-
ity, but rather an issue of oversight. We agree, which is why the FAA is continually 
improving  and  refining  our  oversight  of  maintenance,  no  matter  where  it  is  per-
formed or by whom. 

Let me start by stating the obvious. The system is safe. As this subcommittee well 
knows,  we  have  achieved  the  highest  safety  standards  in  the  history  of  aviation. 
Even so, our goal is—as always—to continue to improve safety. I would like to share 
with  you  a  chart  that  goes  to  the  heart  of  this  hearing.  (See  the  attachment  at  the 
end of the statement.) The lines represent the percent of maintenance that is being 
outsourced and the accident rate, per hundred thousand operations. I think this pic-
ture  is  worth  a  thousand  words.  Although  the  percentage  of  outsourcing  has  never 
been  higher,  the  accident  rate  has  never  been  lower.  These  statistics  amply  dem-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

onstrate  that  aviation  safety  is  not  dependent  on  airlines  performing  their  own 
maintenance. 

18 

Before  I  explain  the  specifics  of  FAA’s  oversight  of  outsourced  maintenance,  let 
me  take  a  moment  to  describe  the  office  of  aviation  safety.  Last  year,  after  years 
of  hard  work,  the  Office  of  Aviation  Safety  (AVS)  achieved  ISO  9001  certification. 
This  certification  ensures  that,  worldwide,  FAA  safety  offices  provide  standardized 
service  and  products,  and  that  we  adhere  to  the  same  safety  standards  as  those 
businesses we regulate. We are the only Federal organization of our size, scope and 
complexity  to  have  achieved  ISO  certification  under  a  single  quality  management 
system.  It  was  through  my  employees’  dedication  and  hard  work  that  we  achieved 
ISO certification. Not one milestone was missed on our road to certification. So, our 
oversight of maintenance is part of an independently validated approach to holding 
ourselves to some pretty high standards. 

Previously,  our  oversight  was  based  largely  on  inspector  knowledge  and  informa-
tion  that  was  available  as  the  result  of  individual  inspections.  This  approach  was 
the  best  we  could  do  at  the  time,  but  it  was  far  from  comprehensive.  The  effective-
ness  of  our  oversight  could  vary  from  facility  to  facility.  What  we  are  doing  now  is 
managing  risk  and  requiring  system  safety.  Just  as  we  have  worked  the  concept  of 
system  safety  with  the  airlines,  we  are  currently  introducing  the  concept  to  repair 
stations. 

Let  me  explain  what  I  mean  by  system  safety.  System  safety  is  extremely  com-
prehensive. It sounds like a simple list of requirements, but in reality, it is a sophis-
ticated  approach  to  ensuring  that  everything  is  in  place  to  obtain  the  information 
that  can  identify  vulnerability  in  time  to  address  it  before  safety  is  compromised. 
System safety requires the following attributes. It must be clear who is responsible 
for different aspects of the operation. The responsible person must have the author-
ity to take necessary action. There must be procedures in place to execute required 
actions. There must be controls in place to ensure that a consistent product or serv-
ice is being provided. There must be oversight/auditing procedures in place to inde-
pendently  evaluate  the  effectiveness  and  consistency  of  the  operation.  And  last, 
there must be interface procedures in place to ensure that different parts of the or-
ganization  are  effectively  talking  to  each  other.  Consistency  is  the  goal.  Inconsist-
ency signals the need for a closer look and can provide us the early warning we need 
to get ahead of problems that could affect safety. 

In  addition,  these  attributes  must  be  supported  by  a  written  Safety  Policy  ex-
pressing  senior  management’s  commitment  to  continually  improve  safety  and  in-
cludes  safety  risk  management  processes,  safety  assurances,  and  safety  promotion. 
Safety risk management processes are used to assess system design and verify that 
safety  risk  management  is  integrated  into  all  processes.  Safety  assurances  contin-
ually identify new hazards and ensure risk controls achieve their intended objective. 
Safety promotion ensures an environment where action is taken to create a positive 
safety  culture  where  people  acknowledge  their  accountability  and  act  on  their  own 
individual responsibility for safety. 

This  is  what  we  will  require  of  all  organizations  for  which  we  have  safety  over-
sight  responsibility,  whether  it  be  an  airline,  a  manufacturer  or  a  repair  station. 
With these elements in place, our inspectors can perform hazard analyses and iden-
tify risk so that threats can be pre-empted. Instead of relying solely on information 
from individual inspections alone, we now perform a sophisticated analysis of anom-
alies identified and entered into the system. The analysis can provide us trend infor-
mation  that  effectively  targets  our  oversight.  This  is  a  much  more  comprehensive 
approach  than  what  we  were  able  to  do  previously.  It  allows  us  to  get  in  front  of 
potential  problems  in  order  to  prevent  them.  This  is  not  only  a  better  use  of  FAA 
resources, it enhances safety. 

The past few years have been about continuing forward and making adjustments 
to  an  already  robust  system.  We  have  been  working  closely  with  the  Department 
of  Transportation  Inspector  General’s  (IG)  office  since  their  issuance  in  2003  of  the 
report  ‘‘Review  of  Air  Carriers’  Use  of  Aircraft  Repair  Stations.’’  The  report  identi-
fied  specific  areas  where  the  IG  felt  improvements  could  be  made.  In  response  to 
the  report,  we  made  a  number  of  changes  to  our  oversight  of  repair  stations.  In 
2004,  we  revised  the  regulations  that  apply  to  repair  stations.  The  rule  improved 
quality  control  requirements,  equipment  requirements,  and  provided  more  detailed 
requirements  on  the  use  by  repair  stations  of  external  maintenance  providers.  In 
2005,  we  issued  guidance  to  enhance  oversight  of  repair  stations  based  on  system 
safety  requirements  and  risk  assessment.  In  2006,  we  developed  and  implemented 
software to further enhance oversight, risk assessment, and risk management proc-
esses  used  in  our  oversight.  We’ve  improved  our  Safety  Performance  Analysis  Sys-
tem to provide sharing of information between the inspectors assigned to the repair 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

station,  and  those  assigned  to  the  air  carrier.  We’ve  also  improved  the  training  re-
quirements for certain repair station personnel. 

We  are  currently  testing  a  different  way  to  oversee  the  work  performed  by  com-
plex repair stations. We call this approach the Certificate Management Unit (CMU) 
concept.  CMU  is  a  model  of  oversight  for  complex  repair  stations  that  parallels  the 
way we conduct oversight of air carriers. CMU will provide for dedicated inspectors 
providing oversight at the assigned repair station. This addresses the criticism that 
FAA  has  failed  to  adapt  its  oversight  of  repair  stations  to  reflect  their  increasing 
use by air carriers. Having assigned inspectors at these repair stations will further 
reduce  the  differences  between  the  way  we  oversee  major  repair  stations  versus 
major airlines. We will continue to evaluate, modify and expand this concept as ap-
propriate. 

I  mentioned  at  the  outset  that  AVS  is  ISO  certified.  Part  of  what  this  means  is 
that, as an organization, we must continually evaluate what we are doing to identify 
where we can improve. So I fully expect ongoing modifications to our oversight pro-
cedures and analyses as we learn more and develop new and better tools. 

I  would  now  like  to  turn  my  focus  to  foreign  repair  stations  because  I  know  they 
have  been  of  particular  interest  to  this  subcommittee.  As  is  the  case  with  domestic 
repair  stations,  there  is  an  incorrect  perception  that  a  carrier’s  use  of  a  foreign  re-
pair  station  is  somehow  unsafe  or  done  solely  to  reduce  maintenance  costs.  I  know 
there have been a number of efforts to restrict a U.S. carrier’s ability to use foreign 
repair stations, but I do not believe these efforts would enhance safety. It is impor-
tant  to  understand  that  FAA  only  certifies  a  foreign  repair  station  if  a  U.S.  carrier 
wants  to  use  it.  Unlike  a  domestic  applicant,  a  foreign  applicant  must  provide  evi-
dence  that  a  U.S.  operator  or  manufacturer  needs  its  services.  The  repair  station 
must meet the same standards that we apply to repair stations in the United States 
or we will not certify it. Safety is addressed because we require that all aircraft that 
are  registered  in  the  United  States  be  maintained  to  U.S.  standards,  regardless  of 
where  they  operate.  Due  to  the  global  nature  of  aviation,  we  must  have  repair  sta-
tions  that  meet  U.S.  standards  throughout  the  world.  It  is  an  essential  element  of 
the  U.S.  being  a  leading  provider  of  international  transportation  services.  Finally, 
keep in mind that, as is the case when a carrier uses a domestic repair station, the 
carrier has the ultimate responsibility to ensure that the maintenance is being per-
formed  appropriately.  All  of  this  adds  up  to  a  great  deal  of  supervision.  The  repair 
station  has  internal  controls,  foreign  government  oversight,  airline  oversight,  and 
FAA oversight. 

In  three  countries  (France,  Ireland  and  Germany)  where  we  have  Bilateral  Avia-
tion Safety Agreements (BASA), we have outlined Maintenance Implementation Pro-
cedures (MIP) to ensure that foreign inspectors are placing appropriate emphasis on 
the Federal Aviation Regulations when conducting review of work done on U.S. air-
craft.  We  have  a  long  history  and  experience  with  these  aviation  authorities.  In 
these countries, we rely on the oversight of the aviation authority in addition to our 
periodic  inspections.  We  are  also  working  to  ensure  that  these  foreign  aviation  au-
thorities  inform  us  and  seek  FAA  approval  of  changes  to  repair  station  operations 
if they directly impact FAA requirements. 

In response to the IG, we have also made some changes to our oversight of foreign 
repair  stations.  For  example,  we  eliminated  the  10  percent  sampling  requirement 
on  FAA’s  inspection  of  repair  stations  in  countries  where  there  is  a  BASA/MIP  in 
place.  In  FY  2006,  FAA  conducted  sampling  inspections  in  21  percent  of  the  repair 
stations located in these countries. We have also developed and implemented policy 
and  procedures  in  the  BASA/MIP  countries  to  capture  the  results  from  the  inspec-
tions conducted by foreign authorities. 

It  is  also  important  to  remember  that,  by  its  nature,  aviation  is  truly  an  inter-
national  enterprise.  An  aircraft,  especially  in  commercial  aviation,  contains  parts 
manufactured  all  around  the  world.  The  original  equipment  manufactures  (OEMs) 
have  a  wealth  of  expertise  in  repairing  their  products.  In  addition,  their  parts  may 
have warranties. It would be extremely unwise to restrict a U.S. carrier’s ability to 
use OEM maintenance, even if the OEM is abroad. 

There  are  a  number  of  other  reasons  for  air  carriers  to  choose  to  outsource  some 
maintenance  and  repair  activities.  The  expertise  of  OEMs  is  so  considerable  and 
their work is so consistent that maintenance is often outsourced to them, regardless 
of  whether  the  maintenance  being  performed  is  on  a  part  they  manufactured.  In 
other  cases,  overseas  repair  and  maintenance  facilities  may  provide  a  great  deal  of 
expertise  for  lower  costs.  Nevertheless,  just  as  aviation  safety  is  in  no  way  com-
promised  by  allowing  U.S.  carriers  to  fly  aircraft  made  in  Europe,  in  Brazil,  or  in 
Canada, so too is safety in no way compromised by allowing other countries to con-
duct repair and maintenance on our aircraft. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

I would like to conclude this morning by saying that our work with the IG’s office 
in the past few years has been productive. We have made a number of adjustments 
that I think have improved the effectiveness of our oversight. That can only improve 
safety.  I  think  we  generally  agree  that  we  are  moving  in  the  right  direction.  Cer-
tainly,  the  chart  I  talked  about  reflects  that  airline  use  of  repair  stations  has  not 
compromised safety. 

I understand and appreciate this subcommittee’s concern about the increased use 
of  foreign  repair  stations.  Obviously,  we  share  a  common  goal  to  find  ways  to  im-
prove safety at a historically safe period in U.S. aviation. I can assure you that my 
office  is  totally  committed  to  making  whatever  adjustments  the  situation  demands 
when it comes to safety oversight. Hearings like the one today continue a necessary 
dialogue. I do not claim to have all the answers. I think the changes we have made 
in  recent  years  are  good  ones.  But  we  can’t  sit  still.  There  will  always  be  ways  to 
improve and we will continue to look for them. 

This  concludes  my  statement.  I  will  be  happy  to  answer  your  questions  at  this 

time. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Ms. Gilligan. 
Mr. Roach? 

STATEMENT OF ROBERT ROACH, JR., GENERAL VICE 
PRESIDENT OF TRANSPORTATION, INTERNATIONAL 

ASSOCIATION OF MACHINISTS AND AEROSPACE WORKERS 
Mr.  ROACH.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chair,  and  members  of  this 
Committee,  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  to  you  today.  My  name  is 
Robert Roach, Jr., I’m the General Vice President of Transportation 
for the Machinists Union. 

I’m  appearing  on  behalf  of  International  President,  R.  Thomas 
Buffenbarger.  The  Machinists  Union  is  the  largest  aviation  union 
in  North  America,  representing  180,000  airline  and  aerospace 
workers  in  almost  every  classification,  including  mechanics,  flight 
attendants,  ramp  service  workers,  public  contact  employees  and 
production workers. 

Since  2003,  nine  major  U.S.  carriers  have  increased  the  amount 
of outsource work. The percentages, as mentioned by Senator Lau-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
L
L
I
G
0
2
6

21 

tenberg,  are  from  34  percent  to  67  percent.  The  trend  of  U.S.  air-
lines  increasingly  subcontracting  work,  aircraft  maintenance  work, 
jeopardizes  safety,  and  security  of  our  Nation’s  air  transportation 
system.  The  lack  of  adequate  Federal  Aviation  Administration 
oversight  at  certificated  and  non-certificated  maintenance  repair 
stations is unforgivable. 

Airlines utilize overseas facilities to take advantage of low wages 
and  lax  regulations  available  at  overseas  repair  stations,  when 
there  are  many  U.S.  repair  station  facilities  available  and  under-
utilized,  such  as  the  state-of-the-art  facility  in  Indianapolis,  Indi-
ana, a facility abandoned by United Airlines. 

Cutting  back  on  food,  pillows,  or  other  in-flight  amenities  is  a 
business decision that only inconvenienced the passengers, but cut-
ting  costs  in  aircraft  maintenance  has  serious  safety  implications. 
Our  mechanics  have  found  aircraft  returning  from  overseas— 
overseas flight having departed with obvious mechanical problems. 
Our  members  have  seen  aircraft  returned  from  repair  facilities 
with flaps rigged improperly, engine fan blades installed backward, 
improperly  connected  ducting  that  resulted  in  pressurization  prob-
lems,  air  speed  indicator  lines  disconnected,  inoperable  thrust  re-
versers,  incorrect  engine  fuse  pins  installed,  and  over-wing  exit 
emergency slides deactivated. 

These  aircraft  have  been  deemed  ‘‘airworthy’’  by  repair  stations. 
Although  these  mistakes  were  noticed,  and  catastrophic  accidents 
avoided, that is not always the case. 

FAA  oversight  of  U.S.  repair  facilities  is  better  than  foreign  re-
pair stations, but is still not adequate. The NTSB faulted the FAA’s 
lack  of  oversight  of  work  being  performed  at  an  Air  Midwest  facil-
ity  in  West  Virginia,  as  a  contributing  factor  in  the  January  8, 
2003 crash that killed 21 people. 

There is still a dangerous shortage of FAA inspectors. The FAA’s 
Singapore  Field  Office  alone,  is  responsible  for  103  stations,  but 
has only four inspectors. An immediate increase of FAA inspectors, 
along  with  the  resources  they  need—is  necessary  to  safeguard  the 
U.S. aviation industry. 

When inspectors are permitted to make a rare inspection of over-
sight repair stations, they must still give advance notice. Unsched-
uled  surprise  inspections,  like  those  performed  in  the  United 
States, are necessary to ensure compliance. 

Unlike U.S. air worker—United States workers—foreign mainte-
nance  persons  are  not  required  to  undergo  drug  and  alcohol  test-
ing,  or  pass  criminal  background  checks,  in  fact,  they’re  not  even 
required  to  read  English,  which  is  the  language  in  which  aircraft 
manufacturers write their maintenance repair manuals. The FAA’s 
oversight  of  certified  repair  stations  is  insufficient  to  ensure  com-
pliance and regulations. 

FAA  oversight  of  non-certificated  repair  stations,  however,  is 
nonexistent.  Non-certificated  facilities  operate  without  the  same 
regulatory  requirements  as  certificated  repair  stations  and  operate 
with  no  limit  on  the  type  or  scope  of  work  they  can  perform.  The 
FAA  does  not  monitor  the  maintenance  performed  at  non-certifi-
cated facilities, and the air carrier’s training and oversight of these 
facilities is inadequate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Hearings and investigations do nothing to increase safety unless 
it’s  followed  with  the  action  by  both  the  FAA  and  the  airlines  who 
subcontract their maintenance work. 

Having U.S. aircraft repaired overseas also opens up this country 
to great security risks. It’s not hard to imagine how overseas repair 
stations  working  on  U.S.  aircraft  could  provide  terrorists  with  the 
opportunity  to  sabotage  an  aircraft,  or  components  that  will  even-
tually re-enter the United States for domestic service. 

These stations should be immediately closed down so security au-
dits  can  be  conducted,  and  security  vulnerabilities  addressed. 
There  should  be  one  standard  for  safety  and  security,  and  FAA 
oversight  at  all  aircraft  facilities  working  on  U.S.  aircraft,  regard-
less  of  where  they  are  located.  This  must  include  the  equivalent 
standards—criminal background checks, drug and alcohol testing of 
all workers, to tighten up security at the repair stations. 

The  FAA  does  not  have  sufficient  funding  to  hire  an  adequate 
number  of  inspectors  to  ensure  aviation  safety  at  home  or  abroad. 
Mr. Chairman—Madame Chair—Members of this Committee, let 
my  testimony  today  serve  as  more  than  a  warning  that  the  over-
sight  of  contract  maintenance  of  U.S.  aircraft  is  almost  non-exist-
ent.  I  am  here  to  offer  the  assistance  of  the  machinists  union  and 
all  of  our  members  who  build  and  maintain  aircraft  to  help  safe-
guard our aviation industry. 

I  thank  this  Committee  for  inviting  us  to  participate  in  these 
proceedings  and  listening  to  our  concerns,  I  look  forward  to  your 
questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Roach follows:] 

ASSOCIATION

INTERNATIONAL

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT ROACH,  JR.,  GENERAL VICE PRESIDENT OF 
AND 

TRANSPORTATION, 
AEROSPACE WORKERS 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  Members  of  this  Committee  for  the  opportunity 
to  speak  to  you  today.  My  name  is  Robert  Roach,  Jr.,  General  Vice  President  of 
Transportation for the International Association of Machinists and Aerospace Work-
ers  (IAM).  I  am  appearing  at  the  request  of  International  President,  R.  Thomas 
Buffenbarger. The Machinists Union is the largest aviation union in North America, 
representing  180,000  airline  and  aerospace  workers  in  almost  every  classification, 
including Mechanics, Flight Attendants, Ramp Service workers, Public Contact em-
ployees and production workers. 

OF MACHINISTS

Since  2003,  nine  major  U.S.  carriers  (AirTran  Airways,  Alaska  Airlines,  America 
West Airlines, Continental Airlines, Delta Airlines, JetBlue Airways, Northwest Air-
lines,  Southwest  Airlines,  and  United  Airlines)  have  increased  their  amount  of 
outsourced maintenance from 34 percent of total heavy aircraft maintenance checks 
to 67 percent.1 The trend of U.S. airlines increasingly subcontracting aircraft main-
tenance  work  jeopardizes  the  safety  and  security  of  our  Nation’s  air  transportation 
system.  The  lack  of  adequate  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  oversight  of 
certificated and non-certificated maintenance repair stations is unforgivable. 

Many overseas repair stations exist only because U.S. airlines are constantly look-
ing  for  ways  to  reduce  their  operating  costs.  Airlines  utilize  these  facilities  to  take 
advantage of the low wages and lax regulations available at overseas repair stations 
when  there  are  many  U.S.  repair  facilities  available  and  underutilized,  such  as  the 
state-of-the-art  Indianapolis,  Indiana  facility  abandoned  by  United  Airlines,  one  of 
the  most  advanced  repair  stations  in  the  world.  Cutting  back  on  food,  pillows  and 
other in-flight amenities is a business decision that only inconveniences passengers, 
but cutting costs in aircraft maintenance has serious safety implications. 

1 Statement  of  the  Honorable  Calvin  L.  Scovel  III,  Inspector  General  of  the  U.S.  Department 
of Transportation before the House Transportation and Infrastructure Committee Subcommittee 
on Aviation, March 29, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Our  mechanics  have  found  aircraft  returning  from  overseas  flights  departed  with 
obvious  mechanical  problems.  When  they  tell  FAA  inspectors,  the  inspectors  com-
plain that their hands are tied. Budget constraints limit their ability to inspect over-
seas maintenance operations. 

A  recent  example  of  poor  work  performed  by  a  maintenance  vendor  occurred  at 
US  Airways.  The  FAA  recently  issued  an  Airworthiness  Directive  requiring  the  re-
placement  of  the  fuse  pins  that  mount  engines  to  Boeing  767  aircraft.  A  mainte-
nance  contractor  for  US  Airways  performed  the  modification,  but  installed  the 
wrong  fuse  pins  on  three  aircraft.  These  pins  are  designed  to  allow  an  engine  to 
drop from the wing during an emergency to prevent excessive vibrations from caus-
ing  the  entire  wing  to  break  away  from  the  aircraft.  Such  a  catastrophic  event 
would  force  the  plane  into  an  uncontrolled  spiral  toward  the  Earth.  Our  members 
have also seen aircraft return from repair facilities with the flaps rigged improperly, 
engine fan blades installed backward, improperly connected ducting that resulted in 
pressurization problems, airspeed indicator lines disconnected, inoperable thrust re-
versers and over-wing exit emergency slides deactivated. These aircraft had all been 
deemed airworthy by the repair stations. Although these mistakes were noticed and 
catastrophic accidents avoided, that is not always the case. 

FAA  oversight  of  U.S.  repair  facilities  is  better  than  foreign  repair  stations,  but 
still  not  adequate.  On  January  8,  2003,  US  Airways  Express  Flight  5481  crashed 
into  a  Charlotte,  North  Carolina  hangar  packed  with  IAM  members,  killing  all  21 
people  onboard.  The  subsequent  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  (NTSB)  in-
vestigation  faulted  Air  Midwest,  which  operated  the  aircraft,  the  facility  that  per-
formed maintenance of the aircraft and the FAA.2 

US  Airways,  then  headquartered  in  Arlington,  Virginia,  sold  the  tickets  to  the 
flight  and  the  aircraft  displayed  the  carrier’s  logo.  Air  Midwest,  based  in  Arizona, 
operated the flight and was responsible for the aircraft’s maintenance. But Air Mid-
west  subcontracted  that  maintenance  to  Raytheon  Aerospace  in  Huntington,  West 
Virginia,  who  then  contracted  with  Structural  Modification  and  Repair  Technicians 
to supply the mechanic workforce. 

The  NTSB  determined  that  a  mechanic  improperly  adjusted  cables  that  helped 
control  the  pitch  of  the  aircraft.  The  mechanic  had  never  done  the  job  on  that  type 
of  plane  before  and  with  his  trainer’s  approval,  skipped  steps  that  the  NTSB  said 
would likely have helped the mechanic catch his mistakes. FAA regulations require 
such  flight  critical  work  to  be  inspected,  but  in  this  case  it  was  inspected  by  the 
same instructor who allowed steps to be skipped. 

NTSB  Chairman  Ellen  Engleman  Conners  said  at  the  time,  ‘‘I  think  the  entire 
system  here  was  broken  down.  There  were  errors  at  every  level.’’ 3 Commenting  on 
the airline’s layers of subcontracted maintenance work, Aeronautical Repair Station 
Association  Executive  Director  Sarah  Macleod  said,  ‘‘The  more  removed  you  get 
from  the  maintenance,  the  more  training  it  takes.  The  more  tiers,  the  closer  you’d 
better be looking.’’ 4 The Machinists Union wholeheartedly agrees with both of these 
statements. 

A July 2003 Department of Transportation (DOT) Inspector General Report high-
lighted  the  weak  oversight  of  aircraft  maintenance  performed  overseas  by  third- 
party contractors.5 In response to that report, Congress directed the FAA to submit 
a  plan  by  March  12,  2004  to  ensure  that  foreign  repair  stations  working  on  U.S. 
aircraft  are  subject  to  the  same  level  of  safety  and  oversight  as  required  here  at 
home. 

Years  past  the  deadline,  the  FAA  finally  submitted  a  plan  that  the  Machinists 
Union  believes  is  woefully  inadequate.  There  is  still  a  shortage  of  FAA  inspectors, 
and  when  inspectors  are  permitted  to  make  a  rare  inspection  of  an  overseas  repair 
station  they  must  still  give  advance  notice.  Unscheduled  surprise  inspections,  like 
those  performed  in  the  U.S.  are  necessary  to  ensure  compliance.  Unlike  U.S.  work-
ers,  foreign  maintenance  personnel  are  still  not  required  to  undergo  drug  and  alco-
hol  testing  or  pass  criminal  background  checks.  In  fact,  they  are  not  even  required 
to  read  English,  which  is  the  language  in  which  aircraft  manufactures  write  their 
maintenance repair manuals. 

2 NTSB  Aircraft  Accident  Report,  ‘‘Loss  of  Pitch  Control  During  Takeoff,’’  Air  Midwest  Flight 
5481, Raytheon (Beechcraft) 2000D, N233Y, Charlotte, North Carolina, January 8, 2003, NTSB/ 
AAR–04/01. 

3 Charlotte Observer, ‘‘NTSB faults FAA and airline in US Airways crash’’, February 26, 2004. 
4 Department of Energy Aviation Flight Safety Notice 03–002, ‘‘Subcontract Maintenance’’. 
5 DOT  Inspector  General  Report,  ‘‘Review  of  Air  Carriers’  Use  of  Aircraft  Repair  Stations’’, 

July 8, 2003 (AV–2003–047). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

A December 2005 DOT Inspector General report 6 found that while foreign repair 
stations  were  widely  used  by  U.S.  carriers,  some  FAA  certified  foreign  repair  sta-
tions  are  not  inspected  at  all  by  FAA  inspectors  because  civil  aviation  authorities 
review these facilities on the FAA’s behalf. Airlines are subcontracting their mainte-
nance and the FAA is outsourcing their inspections. The Machinists Union believes 
this only degrades aviation safety and endangers the traveling public. 

The  FAA’s  oversight  of  certified  repair  stations  is  insufficient  to  ensure  compli-
ance with regulations. FAA oversight of non-certificated repair stations, however, is 
non-existent. 

The  Inspector  General’s  2005  report  found  that  non-certificated  facilities  operate 
without  the  same  regulatory  requirements  as  certificated  repair  stations  and  oper-
ate  with  no  limit  on  the  type  or  scope  of  work  they  can  perform.  The  report  also 
verified  that  the  FAA  does  not  monitor  the  maintenance  performed  at  non-certifi-
cated facilities and the air carriers’ training and oversight of these facilities are in-
adequate.  The  report  further  revealed  that  the  FAA  did  not  know  the  extent  of 
maintenance performed at non-certificated repair facilities. 

The  Machinists  Union  is  thankful  the  Inspector  General’s  office  has  repeatedly 
demonstrated  the  FAA’s  lack  of  oversight  of  contract  maintenance  facilities.  How-
ever,  hearings  and  investigations  do  nothing  to  increase  safety  unless  it  is  followed 
with  action  by  both  the  FAA  and  the  airlines  who  subcontract  their  maintenance 
work. 

Having U.S. aircraft repaired overseas also opens up this country to a great secu-
rity  risk.  It  is  not  hard  to  imagine  how  overseas  repair  stations  working  on  U.S. 
aircraft could provide terrorists with an opportunity to sabotage an aircraft or com-
ponents  that  will  eventually  re-enter  the  U.S.  for  domestic  service.  These  stations 
should be immediately closed down until security audits can be conducted and secu-
rity vulnerabilities addressed. 

There should be one standard for safety, security and FAA oversight at all aircraft 
repair facilities working on U.S. aircraft, regardless of where they are located. This 
must include equivalent standards for criminal background checks, drug and alcohol 
testing of workers and tightening the security at repair facilities. 

The  FAA  does  not  have  sufficient  funding  to  hire  an  adequate  number  of  inspec-
tors to ensure aviation maintenance safety, at home or abroad. Even the recent hir-
ing  of  additional  FAA  inspectors  does  little  to  improve  oversight.  As  of  January 
2007,  there  were  only  103  international  field  inspectors  for  a  total  of  692  foreign 
repair stations.7 The Singapore field office alone is responsible for 103 stations, but 
has only 4 inspectors. An immediate increase in FAA inspectors, along with the re-
sources they need, is necessary to safeguard the U.S. aviation industry. 

Mr. Chairman, Members of this Committee, let my testimony today serve as more 
than a warning that the oversight of contract maintenance on U.S. aircraft is almost 
non-existent.  I  am  here  to  offer  the  assistance  of  the  Machinists  Union  and  all  our 
members  who  build  and  maintain  aircraft  to  help  safeguard  our  aviation  industry. 
I thank the Committee for inviting us to participate in these proceedings and lis-

tening to our concerns. 

I look forward to your questions. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Roach. 
Mr. Filler? 

STATEMENT  OF  MARSHALL  S.  FILLER,  MANAGING  DIRECTOR 
AND  GENERAL  COUNSEL,  AERONAUTICAL  REPAIR  STATION 
ASSOCIATION (ARSA) 
Mr.  FILLER.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chairman,  and  good  afternoon 

to Chairman Rockefeller and Senator Lautenberg as well. 

My name is Marshall Filler, I’m Managing Director and General 
Counsel for the Aeronautical Repair Station Association. I’d like to 
assure  this  Committee  that  in  order  to  be  a  regular  member  of 
ARSA,  you  have  to  hold  a  certificate,  and  most  of  our  members 

6 Inspector  General  Report  Air  Carriers’  Use  of  Non-Certificated  Repair  Facilities,  December 

15, 2005 (AV–2006–031). 

7 Statement  of  the  Honorable  Calvin  L.  Scovel  III,  Inspector  General  of  the  U.S.  Department 
of Transportation before the House Transportation and Infrastructure Committee Subcommittee 
on Aviation, March 29, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

hold  that  certificate,  we  do  have  about  1  percent  that  hold  other 
kinds of authorities, and they’re not voting members of ARSA. 

Foreign repair stations are also members of ARSA, and they are 
an essential part of aviation, and of aviation safety. In fact, without 
them,  there  would  be  no  international  travel.  I  say  that,  because 
under  international  law,  the  State  of  Registry  of  the  aircraft  is  re-
sponsible  for  controlling  the  maintenance  performed  on  that  air-
craft,  and  on  any  component  to  be  installed  thereon,  regardless  of 
where the aircraft is. So, if an aircraft is traveling in Europe, if it’s 
got an N in front of it, and it’s registered in the United States, the 
work  must  be  performed  by  an  FAA-certificated  facility,  or  other 
certificated person. 

Although it is true that there are 700 repair stations located out-
side  our  borders,  it  is  also  true  that  425  of  them  are  in  Europe.  If 
you  would  compare  the  number  of  U.S.-based  repair  stations  that 
are  certificated  by  the  European  Aviation  Safety  Agency,  it  is  al-
most 1,200. So, there are almost 3 times as many U.S.-based repair 
stations  certificated  to  perform  work  under  European  jurisdiction 
as there are FAA-certificated to performed repairs in Europe. 

Many of these 700 foreign repair stations are owned by U.S. com-
panies,  by  Pratt  &  Whitney,  General  Electric,  Hamilton 
Sundstrand,  Honeywell,  and  Nordam  to  name  a  few,  as  well  as 
some  of  the  most  well-respected  international  air  carriers  such  as 
Qantas.  Also  among  our  members  are  Lufthansa  Technik,  as  well 
as  SR  Technics.  These  are  highly  respected,  worldwide  acclaimed 
repair facilities. 

When  we  talk  about  repair  stations,  I  think  it  is  important  to 
distinguish  the  various  types—we  have  line  maintenance  facilities 
that  basically  keep  the  aircraft  flying  during  the  day,  and  do  sim-
pler  overnight  checks.  We  have  substantial  maintenance  providers 
where  the  aircraft  is  maintained  for  anywhere  from  a  number  of 
days, to weeks in a hanger-type facility, but most of the repair sta-
tions  are  actually  component  repair  facilities,  located  miles  from 
airports, presenting little security threats, located in places like in-
dustrial parks. 

Most of the rules that apply to foreign repair stations by the FAA 
are  the  same.  Some  of  those  differences  are,  there’s  a  very  good 
reason  for  them,  because  of  international  considerations,  in  fact, 
with  respect  to  drug  and  alcohol  testing,  the  FAA  did  propose  to 
make this mandatory overseas in 1994, but over significant protest 
from  the  international  community,  and  I  might  add,  our  State  De-
partment withdrew that proposal in the year 2000. 

FAA  has  chosen,  instead,  to  work  through  ICAO,  the  inter-
national body, which has adopted drug and alcohol testing as a rec-
ommended  practice.  ICAO  also  has  an  international  standard  that 
prohibits  anybody  from  performing  a  safety-sensitive  function 
under the influence of a controlled substance. 

Some  of  the  requirements  of  foreign  repair  stations  are  actually 
greater  than  they  are  domestically,  such  as  the  certificate  that 
lasts only a year or two. In the domestic situation, once you get cer-
tificated,  you  keep  it  forever.  In  a  foreign  situation,  the  FAA  has 
to conduct a re-inspection every 12 to 24 months. 

With  respect  to  security,  I  think  it  is  important  for  members  to 
know  that  ICAO  also  plays  a  very  significant  role  in  security  per-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

formed  in  international  locations.  ICAO  Annex  17  provides  for 
international  security  standards,  that  include  a  national  security 
program,  airport-specific  programs  for  all  airports  serving  inter-
national  airlines,  air  operator  security  programs,  background 
checks,  perimeter  security.  All  189  members  of  ICAO  are  required 
to  follow  these  standards,  or  otherwise  notify  ICAO  that  they  are 
not.  So,  while  it  is  true  that  they  are  not  subject  to  U.S.  require-
ments,  they  are  subject  to  ICAO  requirements,  and  in  fact,  our 
TSA rules are very similar to the ICAO standards because—like all 
of  the  rest  of  the  countries  that  are  members  of  ICAO,  we  have  to 
comply with those standards, as well. I think there’s a danger here 
if  you  direct  security  resources  at  places  where  the  threat  is  less. 

Madame Chair, I have two more minutes? 
Senator MCCASKILL. Yes. 
Mr. FILLER. Thank you very much. 
If the—historically, background checks have been required when 
people  need  unescorted  access  to  restricted  security  areas  of  the 
airport—that’s  where  the  threat  is  greatest.  If  we  re-direct  those 
resources  to  places  where—that  are  20,  25  miles  from  an  airport, 
that work on components that are tested and inspected before they 
leave the repair station, once again, functionally checked by the air 
carrier  prior  to  installation,  we  are  going  to  take  resources  away 
from the places where we think they’re needed more. 

A  couple  of  other  things  I  would  like  to  mention.  We  disagree 
with the notion that airlines will always go to the lowest cost main-
tenance  provider.  And  the  reason  we  disagree  with  that,  is  that  if 
that  maintenance  is  performed  poorly,  with  a  lack  of  reliability, 
that  airplane  will  not  move.  FAA  regulations  require  maintenance 
discrepancies  to  be  addressed,  or  appropriately  deferred.  And,  in-
deed,  if  work  is  performed  in  a  shoddy  fashion,  and  the  mainte-
nance  discrepancy  is  written  up,  the  cost  of  that  flight  delay  or 
flight cancellation will far outweigh any savings that might accrue 
because of the use of, for example, lower paid workers. 

We also disagree with the notion that the FAA is responsible for 
ensuring safety. FAA regulations set up a structure in which safety 
can  flourish.  We,  the  certificate  holders,  are  responsible  for  ensur-
ing safety. Safety is good business, as demonstrated by the accident 
record that Ms. Gilligan mentioned. We don’t believe foreign repair 
stations take U.S. jobs, we think only, you have to look at the situ-
ation  between  the  U.S.  repair  stations  and  the  European  repair 
stations  to  know  that,  I  think  we  actually  get  the  benefit  of  that 
bargain—with  1,200  in  Europe,  rather,  1200  U.S.  repair  stations 
that are certificated by EASA. 

We  also  don’t  think,  well,  I  think  I’ve  used  my  2  minutes,  Ma-
dame  Chair,  so  I  think  that  I  will  not  ask  for  any  more  time,  but 
I do appreciate your indulgence. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Filler follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARSHALL S. FILLER, MANAGING DIRECTOR AND GENERAL 

COUNSEL, AERONAUTICAL REPAIR STATION ASSOCIATION (ARSA) 

Chairman Rockefeller, Ranking Member Lott, and members of the Subcommittee, 
thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  this  afternoon  about  the  role  of  foreign  repair 
stations, and the safety of aviation maintenance. 

My name is Marshall Filler and I am the Managing Director and General Counsel 
of  the  Aeronautical  Repair  Station  Association  (ARSA).  ARSA  is  a  670  member 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

strong  international  trade  association  with  a  distinguished  22-year  record  of  edu-
cating  and  representing  certificated  aviation  maintenance  facilities  before  the  U.S. 
Congress, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), the European Aviation Safety 
Agency (EASA), and other national aviation authorities (NAA). 

ARSA’s primary members are companies holding repair station certificates issued 
by  the  FAA  under  part  145  of  the  Federal  Aviation  Regulations  (FARs).  These  cer-
tificates  are  our  industry’s  ‘‘license  to  do  business.’’  They  authorize  repair  stations 
to perform maintenance and alterations on civil aviation articles, including aircraft, 
engines,  and  propellers,  and  on  components  installed  on  these  products.  These  re-
pair stations perform maintenance for airlines and general aviation owners and op-
erators. 

In  recent  years,  the  profile  of  the  contract  maintenance  industry  has  increased 
dramatically. With over 4,000 repair stations in the United States employing almost 
200,000 people (Appendix A), this sector of the aviation industry continues to grow. 
We welcome the opportunity to discuss the important role our members play in the 
aviation industry here and abroad and to correct any misconceptions about the safe-
ty of maintenance performed by foreign repair stations. 
Foreign Repair Stations Are an Essential Part of Aviation 

Foreign repair stations are a necessary part of the international aviation system. 
Any effort to restrict the use or number of such facilities would likely lead to retalia-
tory trade actions by other countries. Ultimately, U.S. aerospace manufacturers, air 
carriers and the flying public would be harmed. 

The  Chicago  Convention  of  1944  and  International  Civil  Aviation  Organization 
(ICAO)  standards  require  that  the  State  of  Registry  (i.e.,  the  country  in  which  an 
aircraft  is  registered)  oversee  the  maintenance  performed  on  that  aircraft  and  re-
lated components, regardless of where the work is performed.1 Consequently, a U.S. 
registered  aircraft  requiring  maintenance  while  outside  of  the  U.S.  must  have  that 
work performed by an FAA-certificated maintenance provider. Indeed, a foreign ap-
plicant  for  a  repair  station  certificate  must  also  demonstrate  to  the  FAA  that  its 
services are needed to perform work on articles subject to FAA jurisdiction. 

Similarly,  when  an  aircraft  of  foreign  registry  requires  maintenance  while  in  the 
U.S.,  only  a  repair  station  certificated  or  validated  by  the  relevant  NAA  may  per-
form  the  work.  For  example,  only  an  EASA-certificated  repair  station  may  perform 
maintenance on an aircraft of French registry within the U.S. 

This  legal  regime  has  proven  beneficial  to  American  repair  stations.  Currently, 
there are 698 FAA-certificated repair stations outside the U.S. (see Appendix B). At 
the same time, there are close to 1,200 EASA-certificated repair stations in the U.S., 
and numerous other NAA-certificated repair stations inside our borders.2 Our avia-
tion maintenance industry is highly-regarded worldwide. 
Foreign Repair Stations Must Follow Strict Standards and Procedures 

Bilateral  agreements  are  negotiated  between  two  regulatory  authorities  to  facili-
tate the airworthiness certification of new and used products imported and exported 
from the affected countries. The agreements are not a ‘‘one size fits all’’ proposition; 
they must be tailored to the specific oversight systems and capabilities of the respec-
tive authorities. 

Such  agreements  are  only  concluded  after  a  lengthy  evaluation  process  that 
assures  that  the  two  regulatory  oversight  systems  are  technically  equivalent.  In 
most  cases,  they  are  based  on  reciprocity.  Bilateral  agreements  also  eliminate  re-
dundant  technical  determinations  that  are  not  necessary  in  the  interests  of  safety. 
Consequently,  they  allow  the  two  authorities  to  more  efficiently  allocate  their  lim-
ited oversight resources. The FAA currently has about 30 bilateral agreements cov-
ering  design,  production  and  airworthiness  approvals,  primarily  for  new  products. 
It  is  interesting  to  note  that  many  more  bilateral  agreements  apply  to  the  air-
worthiness  certification  of  mostly  new  products  than  to  articles  that  have  been 
maintained  or  altered.  In  relatively  few  cases,  however,  Maintenance  Implementa-
tion  Procedures  (MIPs)  have  also  been  negotiated.  Currently,  there  are  MIPs  in 
place with France, Germany and Ireland (soon to be expanded to other members of 
the  European  Union)  and  Canada.  The  MIPs  set  forth  mutually  acceptable  proce-
dures that apply whenever maintenance or alterations are performed on equipment 
under  the  jurisdiction  of  either  authority.  They  also  provide  a  means  by  which  the 
authorities can cooperate in conducting surveillance and sharing the results of those 
findings. 

1 See, ICAO Annex 8, Airworthiness, § 4.2.1(b). 
2 Data  obtained  on  European  Safety  Agency  (EASA)  website,  for  ‘‘Foreign  EASA  Part-145 

Valid Approvals for Organisations Located in the United States’’ June 1, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

Except  for  Canada,  facilities  located  in  MIP  countries  receive  an  FAA  repair  sta-
tion certificate. They are required to follow the rules of their home country and the 
designated  FAA  special  conditions.  The  special  conditions  are  areas  where  the  two 
authorities’  regulations  are  different  and  therefore  must  be  followed  when  work  is 
performed on articles subject to the other’s jurisdiction. 

A list of countries in which FAA foreign repair stations are located, whether these 
countries  meet  ICAO  standards,  and  the  status  of  bilateral  agreements  with  the 
U.S. is found in Appendix C. 
FAA-Certificated Repair Facilities Located Abroad Are Not a Threat to the 

U.S. Economy Or To Aviation Safety 

FAA-certified  repair  stations  located  oversees  must  meet  the  same  or  equivalent 
safety standards as domestic facilities. Unlike their domestic counterparts, however, 
foreign repair stations must renew their certificate with the FAA annually or, at the 
discretion  of  the  FAA,  biannually,  following  a  safety  inspection.  This  ensures  that 
the  FAA  evaluates  the  housing,  facilities,  equipment,  personnel,  and  data  of  each 
repair station located outside the U.S. at least once every 2 years. 

In 2005, ARSA conducted a member survey, (see Appendix D) which revealed that 
the  average  FAA-certificated  foreign  repair  station  is  audited  more  than  74  times 
each  year  by  government  regulators,  customers,  other  third-parties,  and  the  repair 
station’s own quality assurance personnel, suggesting a high-level of combined over-
sight. 

Recent  attempts  at  restricting  the  use  of  foreign  repair  stations,  and  specifically 
removing the FAA Administrator’s ability to issue new certificates, would be highly 
detrimental.  Many  companies  factor  into  their  business  plan  the  ability  to  open  a 
new  foreign  repair  station,  and  much  time  and  effort  goes  into  the  application  and 
certification process. 

Indeed, many U.S. companies have repair stations internationally. The FAA’s list 
of  foreign  repair  stations  reveal  that  there  are  approximately  80  foreign  repair  fa-
cilities  owned  by  U.S.  aerospace  companies,  including  Nordam,  Pratt  &  Whitney, 
Hamilton  Sundstrand  and  Honeywell.3 Additionally,  international  companies  have 
repair  stations  located  within  our  borders,  such  as  Lufthansa  Technik,  Dassault, 
and BAE systems. 

The  aviation  maintenance  industry  is  a  global  enterprise;  thus,  action  taken  do-
mestically  affects  companies  worldwide.  A  restriction  on  the  use  of  foreign  repair 
stations  only  punishes  American  companies,  making  them  less  profitable  and  com-
petitive. 
Although the Location of Work May Differ, Quality Does Not 

To  operate  in  the  civil  aviation  maintenance  industry,  certificated  repair  stations 
must  demonstrate  to  the  FAA,  or  other  NAAs  if  applicable,  that  they  possess  the 
housing,  facilities,  equipment,  trained  personnel,  technical  data,  and  quality  sys-
tems necessary to perform maintenance in an airworthy manner. Based upon satis-
factory  showings  in  these  areas,  a  repair  station  is  rated  to  perform  certain  types 
of maintenance. 

However,  not  all  repair  stations  look  alike  and  their  capabilities  vary  signifi-
cantly.  Some  provide  line  maintenance—the  routine,  day-to-day  work  necessary  to 
keep  an  airline’s  fleet  operating  safely.  Some  perform  substantial  maintenance, 
which  includes  more  comprehensive  inspection  and  repairs  on  airframes  and  over-
hauls  of  aircraft  engines.  Others  offer  specialized  services  for  their  customers  such 
as  welding,  heat  treating,  and  coating  on  a  variety  of  aircraft  parts.  However,  the 
vast  majority  of  repair  stations  perform  maintenance  on  components.  Component 
maintenance usually occurs off the aircraft, typically away from an airport in indus-
trial parks and similar facilities. 

Regardless  of  the  location  of  the  repair  facility,  the  regulatory  requirements  are 
the  same.  Each  item  goes  through  a  series  of  checks  required  by  FAA  regulation, 
before being placed on an aircraft. 
Despite Limited FAA Resources, The Industry Ensures Safety 

Aviation  safety  does  not  begin  and  end  with  the  FAA  or  any  other  regulatory 
body.  Government  inspectors  will  never  be  able  to  oversee  each  technician  at  every 
facility all the time. The industry has the ultimate obligation to ensure that the civil 
aviation  system  is  safe.  All  evidence  suggests  that  it  is  fulfilling  that  responsibility 
despite the FAA’s limited oversight resources. 

In  reports  published  in  2003  and  2005,  the  Office  of  the  Inspector  General  of  the 
Department  of  Transportation  (DOT  IG)  expressed  concerns  about  the  FAA’s  over-

3 Based on FAA Listing of Foreign Repair stations from Air Agency Data, June 10, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

sight  of  the  contract  maintenance  industry  stating  that  the  agency’s  oversight  is 
currently  insufficient  for  the  amount  of  work  independent  repair  stations  perform 
for  airlines.4 The  FAA  has  responded  to  these  findings  by  introducing  a  risk-based 
inspection program that identifies those repair stations doing the most work for air-
lines  and  monitoring  their  operations  more  closely.  ARSA  has  continuously  sup-
ported efforts to better utilize FAA resources to ensure the continued quality of con-
tract  maintenance  here  and  abroad,  and  to  demonstrate  to  policymakers  and  the 
public that our aviation system remains safe. 

We  also  note  that  despite  the  IG’s  observations,  repair  stations  are  subject  to  a 
tremendous  amount  of  oversight  by  regulators,  their  customers,  and  other  entities 
as shown in the 2005 ARSA member survey referenced above (Appendix D). A more 
recent  membership  survey  conducted  in  March  2007  is  summarized  in  Appendix  E. 
The findings from this survey reaffirmed past survey results, including: 

• 42  percent  of  members  surveyed  reported  11  or  more  external  audits  during 

2006 by regulators, customers, and third-party accreditation bodies. 

• FAA resource issues are having an impact. A quarter of survey respondents re-
ported  losing  customers  or  foregoing  business  opportunities  because  of  inad-
equate FAA staffing. 

Thus, safety is not just the FAA’s responsibility, but that of every aviation main-
tenance employee performing work on behalf of a certificated repair station, air car-
rier  or  other  aviation  business.  It  is  the  FAA’s  role  to  ensure  that  repair  stations 
have  the  procedures  in  place  to  ensure  the  quality  of  the  work  performed  and  to 
ensure  that  procedures  are  followed.  Indeed,  FAA  regulations  treat  repair  stations 
as  extensions  of  an  air  carrier’s  maintenance  organization.  This  means  that  the 
maintenance provider, regardless of their location, must perform the work in accord-
ance with the carrier’s maintenance program and the applicable portions of its man-
ual. It also requires the airlines to provide a level of oversight to make certain these 
standards are met. 

This holds true whether the work is being performed at an FAA certificated facil-

ity in Florida or France. 
Security Is a Prime Concern of All Repair Facilities 

Security  at  contract  maintenance  facilities  has  drawn  much  attention.  Domesti-
cally,  many  repair  stations  located  on  an  airport  are  required  to  have  their  per-
sonnel  undergo  criminal  background  checks  under  TSA  regulations  if  they  require 
unescorted  access  to  the  designated  airport  security  identification  display  area 
(SIDA). Therefore, a repair station employee that performs line maintenance for an 
air carrier would have the same 10-year criminal background check requirement as 
an airline mechanic. Many repair stations voluntarily implement additional security 
procedures since the quality and safety of their work directly affects their business. 
However, many U.S. repair stations are located miles away from airports and per-
form  specialized  work  on  component  parts  that  have  been  removed  from  the  air-
plane  and  sent  to  them  for  repair.  These  facilities  are  usually  small-businesses; 
thus, imposing undue security burdens on them would in effect put an entire sector 
of specialized workers out of business. Our members understand the need for safety 
and security, since their livelihood depends upon it, and we ask that Congress recog-
nize  the  difference  in  repair  facilities,  remembering  that  our  industry  shares  their 
same goal: maintaining a high level of safety and security. 

Internationally,  each  country  must  implement  the  types  of  security  procedures  to 
be followed just as they must do in the safety area. These are based on ICAO stand-
ards contained in Annex 17 and thus are very similar to TSA regulations. They in-
clude, but are not limited to: 

• A  national  civil  aviation  security  program  with  continuous  threat  monitoring 

and mandatory quality control procedures; 

• Airport security programs for each airport serving international carriers; 
• Air operator security programs; 
• Background  checks  for  persons  implementing  security  control  measures  and 

persons with unescorted access to restricted security areas; and 

• Periodic ICAO security audits. 

4 See,  Department  of  Transportation  Office  of  Inspector  General,  Rep.  No.  AV–2003–047,  Re-
view  of  Air  Carriers’  Use  of  Aircraft  Repair  Stations,  at  1  (July  8,  2003);  Department  of  Trans-
portation Office of Inspector General, Rep. No. AV–2005–062, Safety Oversight of an Air Carrier 
Industry in Transition, at 1 (June 3, 2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

The  professionals  at  the  TSA,  ICAO  and  other  countries’  security  oversight  orga-
nizations have concluded that resources should be focused where the threat is great-
est.  Therefore,  FAA  foreign  repair  stations  working  on  components  and  located 
miles  away  from  an  airport  are  not  required  to  implement  background  checks  for 
their employees. However, if they perform line maintenance at an international air-
port  or  otherwise  require  access  to  the  ramp  area,  foreign  repair  station  employees 
would be subject to similar security requirements to their FAA counterparts, includ-
ing background checks. 

Neither  domestic  nor  international  security  requirements  are  based  on  whether 
a person works for an airline or a repair station; they are dependent on the degree 
of  access  the  individual  has  to  the  restricted  security  areas  of  an  airport.  Further, 
mandating  additional  security  requirements  where  none  are  truly  needed  will  re-
allocate  limited  oversight  resources  from  areas  where  the  threat  is  greater.  This 
could have the unintended consequence of reducing the level of security for the trav-
eling public. 
Drug and Alcohol Testing 

FAA-certificated repair stations in the U.S. are required to conduct drug and alco-
hol  testing  for  employees  performing  ‘‘safety-sensitive  functions’’  for  U.S.  air  car-
riers.  This  means  that  an  employee  performing  a  maintenance  task  is  tested  for 
drug  and  alcohol  use.  Additionally,  subcontractors  used  by  the  repair  station  are 
also  required  to  undergo  testing.  It  is  important  to  note  that  FAA  testing  require-
ments do not apply outside the U.S. Therefore, employees of domestic airlines work-
ing  outside  the  U.S.  must  remove  their  employees  from  the  drug  and  alcohol  pool 
when they leave the country.5 Once again, this has nothing to do with whether the 
individual  works  for  an  airline  or  a  repair  station;  it  is  based  on  where  the  work 
is performed. 

While  some  have  suggested  that  the  U.S.  mandate  drug  and  alcohol  testing  for 
all  aviation  maintenance  workers  if  they  work  on  articles  subject  to  FAA  jurisdic-
tion,  several  practical  and  legal  issues  arise  based  on  the  fact  that  many  of  the  af-
fected individuals are citizens of another state. Indeed, the FAA proposed drug and 
alcohol  testing  outside  the  U.S.  in  1994  but  withdrew  it  in  2000  preferring  to  de-
velop  a  multilateral  solution  through  ICAO.6 Currently,  drug  and  alcohol  testing  is 
an ICAO recommended practice; the FAA continues to support making it a standard 
and  thus  mandatory  for  all  ICAO  members.7 In  addition,  a  related  ICAO  standard 
prohibits individuals from performing safety-critical functions while under the influ-
ence of any psychoactive substance.8 
Conclusion 

Foreign  repair  stations  are  an  essential  part  of  the  aviation  community.  Without 
them,  maintenance  could  not  be  performed  on  aircraft  overseas,  and  the  ability  of 
Americans to travel abroad would cease. The standards and procedures followed by 
foreign repair stations are essentially the same as those followed by domestic repair 
stations, if they are FAA-certificated and working on U.S.-registered aircraft. 

The use of foreign repair stations does not threaten the viability of domestic com-
panies,  or  aviation  safety.  In  fact,  with  many  American  businesses  having  facilities 
located worldwide, changes to the use of foreign repair stations will adversely affect 
domestic companies and encourage foreign countries to retaliate with similar meas-
ures.  ARSA  believes  that  the  Congress  should  allow  the  international  regulatory 
processes to work through the body established for that purpose, ICAO. 

Congress  can  help  maintain  the  safety  and  vitality  of  this  industry  by  providing 
the FAA with adequate resources to oversee the repair station industry, encouraging 
continued  oversight  by  airline  customers  and  other  civil  aviation  authorities,  and 
most  importantly  by  ensuring  that  legislation  and  regulations  are  truly  based  on 
safety. 

5 14 CFR part 121, Appendix I, section XII (Drug Testing) and Appendix J, section VIII (Alco-

hol Testing). 

6 FAA Docket No. 27066; Notice 92–18, effective January 13, 2000. 
7 ICAO Annex 1, Personnel Licensing, § 1.2.7.3 and ICAO Document 9654–AN/945, Manual on 

Prevention of Problematic Use of Substances in the Aviation Workplace (1995). 

8 ICAO Annex 1, § 1.2.7.1. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

APPENDIX A 

FAA Repair Stations by State 

[Including Territories] 

State 

Number of 

Repair Stations 

Number of 
Employees 

AK 
AL 
AR 
AZ 
CA 
CO 
CT 
DC 
DE 
FL 
GA 
GU 
HI 
IA 
ID 
IL 
IN 
KS 
KY 
LA 
MA 
MD 
ME 
MI 
MN 
MO 
MS 
MT 
NC 
ND 
NE 
NH 
NJ 
NM 
NV 
NY 
OH 
OK 
OR 
PA 
PR 
RI 
SC 
SD 
TN 
TX 
UT 
VA 
VI 
VT 
WA 
WI 
WV 
WY 

53 
56 
43 
156 
683 
73 
102 
1 
6 
512 
114 
1 
13 
38 
31 
93 
72 
107 
37 
40 
57 
30 
11 
114 
59 
55 
20 
25 
65 
11 
13 
24 
69 
21 
30 
129 
142 
139 
48 
99 
18 
9 
32 
14 
51 
428 
29 
45 
1 
11 
119 
46 
12 
9 

475 
6,545 
3,115 
6,469 
30,811 
1,219 
7,730 
7 
823 
16,356 
9,840 
6 
113 
2,985 
399 
3,346 
3,506 
7,109 
581 
2,251 
1,893 
1,100 
857 
4,469 
2,204 
2,643 
1,019 
336 
3,704 
101 
1,213 
590 
2,440 
624 
748 
5,450 
4,599 
12,059 
1,444 
2,699 
144 
385 
2,388 
73 
2,090 
25,801 
294 
1,292 
1 
158 
7,547 
1,537 
1,517 
78 

Grand 

4,216 

197,183 

Based on FAA Air Agency Data Dated: June 10, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

APPENDIX B 

FAA Repair Stations on Foreign Soil by Country 

Country 

Number of 

Repair Stations 

Number of 
Employees 

AE 
AR 
AS 
AU 
BA 
BE 
BR 
CH 
CI 
CO 
CS 
DA 
DR 
EC 
EG 
EI 
ES 
ET 
EZ 
FI 
FJ 
FR 
GM 
GR 
GT 
HK 
HU 
ID 
IN 
IS 
IT 
JA 
JO 
KE 
KS 
KZ 
LU 
MO 
MT 
MX 
MY 
NL 
NO 
NZ 
PE 
PM 
PO 
QA 
RO 
RP 
RS 
SA 
SF 
SN 
SP 
SW 
SZ 
TD 
TH 
TU 
TW 

4 
8 
13 
1 
1 
12 
15 
30 
4 
4 
3 
2 
2 
2 
1 
12 
1 
1 
2 
1 
1 
101 
53 
2 
2 
7 
2 
2 
2 
13 
20 
20 
2 
1 
9 
1 
1 
2 
1 
20 
8 
20 
4 
4 
4 
1 
2 
1 
2 
8 
1 
5 
4 
48 
6 
8 
8 
1 
6 
2 
6 

4,224 
1,727 
6,868 
1,150 
5 
4,618 
6,160 
15,171 
754 
1,471 
480 
859 
43 
131 
3,500 
3,429 
1,200 
2,230 
1,213 
1,800 
26 
25,972 
30,457 
914 
70 
5,650 
806 
2,832 
806 
5,567 
6,659 
17,332 
944 
5 
5,629 
33 
329 
995 
42 
4,279 
4,107 
7,034 
1,052 
3,377 
670 
192 
3,174 
41 
864 
3,249 
2,350 
6,423 
3,690 
15,475 
4,360 
2,481 
4,524 
153 
5,650 
3,006 
4,844 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

FAA Repair Stations on Foreign Soil by Country—Continued 

Country 

Number of 

Repair Stations 

Number of 
Employees 

UK 
UP 
VE 
WI 
YI 

Grand 

161 
1 
4 
1 
1 

698 

23,998 
91 
304 
100 
— 

267,589 

Based on FAA Air Agency Data Dated: June 10, 2007. 

APPENDIX C 

FAA Repair Stations on Foreign Soil by Country Code Listing 

Country 

Code 

Name 

[based on FAA data] 

Total 
Repair 
Stations 

Number of 
Employees 

Category 

1 = Meets ICAO 

standards 

2 = Does not meet 
ICAO standards 

AE 
AR 
AS 
AU 
BA 
BE 
BR 
CH 
CI 
CO 
CS 
DA 
DR 
EC 
EG 
EI 
ES 
ET 
EZ 
FI 
FJ 
FR 
GM 
GR 
GT 
HK 
HU 
ID 
IN 
IS 
IT 
JA 
JO 
KE 
KS 
KZ 
LU 
MO 
MT 
MX 
MY 
NL 
NO 
NZ 

United Arab Emirates 
Argentina 
Australia 
Austria 
Bahrain 
Belgium 
Brazil 
China 
Chile 
Columbia 
Costa Rica 
Denmark 
Dominican Republic 
Ecuador 
Egypt 
Ireland 
El Salvador 
Ethiopia 
Czech Republic 
Finland 
Fiji 
France 
Germany 
Greece 
Guatemala 
Hong Kong 
Hungary 
Indonesia 
India 
Israel 
Italy 
Japan 
Jordan 
Kenya 
Korea 
Kazakhstan 
Luxembourg 
Morocco 
Malta 
Mexico 
Malaysia 
Netherlands 
Norway 
New Zealand 

4 
8 
13 
1 
1 
12 
15 
30 
4 
4 
3 
2 
2 
2 
1 
12 
1 
1 
2 
1 
1 
101 
53 
2 
2 
7 
2 
2 
2 
13 
20 
20 
2 
1 
9 
1 
1 
2 
1 
20 
8 
20 
4 
4 

4,224 
1,727 
6,868 
1,150 

5 

4,618 
6,160 
15,171 

754 
1,471 
480 
859 
43 
131 
3,500 
3,429 
1,200 
2,230 
1,213 
1,800 

26 

25,972 
30,457 

914 
70 

5,650 
806 
2,832 
806 
5,567 
6,659 
17,332 

944 
5 

5,629 

33 
329 
995 
42 

4,279 
4,107 
7,034 
1,052 
3,377 

Not Listed 

Not Listed 
Not Listed 
Not Listed 

1 
1 
1 
1 

1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
2 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
2 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 

1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 

Bilateral 
Agreement 
with the 

U.S.? 

— 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
— 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
— 
— 
— 
Yes 
— 
— 
— 
— 
— 
— 
Yes 
Yes 
— 
Yes 
Yes 
— 
— 
— 
— 
Yes 
— 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
— 
— 
— 
— 
— 
— 
— 
— 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

FAA Repair Stations on Foreign Soil by Country Code Listing—Continued 

Country 

Code 

Name 

[based on FAA data] 

Total 
Repair 
Stations 

Number of 
Employees 

1 = Meets ICAO 

standards 

Category 

2 = Does not meet 
ICAO standards 

PE 
PM 
PO 
QA 
RO 
RP 
RS 
SA 
SF 
SN 
SP 
SW 
SZ 
TD 
TH 
TU 
TW 
UK 
UP 
VE 
WI 
YI 

Peru 
Panama 
Portugal 
Qatar 
Romania 
Philippines 
Russia 
Saudi Arabia 
South Africa 
Singapore 
Spain 
Sweden 
Switzerland 
Trinidad & Tobago 
Thailand 
Turkey 
Taiwan 
United Kingdom 
Ukraine 
Venezuela 
Western Sahara 
Yugoslavia 

TOTAL 

65 

4 
1 
2 
1 
2 
8 
1 
5 
4 
48 
6 
8 
8 
1 
6 
2 
6 
161 
1 
4 
1 
1 

698 

670 
192 
3,174 

41 
864 
3,249 
2,350 
6,423 
3,690 
15,475 
4,360 
2,481 
4,524 
153 
5,650 
3,006 
4,844 
23,998 

91 
304 
100 
— 

1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
1 
2 
1 

Not Listed 
Not Listed 

267,589 

60 

Bilateral 
Agreement 
with the 

U.S.? 

— 
— 
— 
— 
Yes 
— 
Yes 
— 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
— 
— 
— 
— 
Yes 
— 
— 
— 
— 

27 

APPENDIX D 

ARSA REPAIR STATION AUDIT SURVEILLANCE SURVEY RESULTS 

Domestic Repair Station Annual Audits 

Total 
Average 

Total 
Average 

Responses 

Internal 

Regulatory 

Customer 

3rd Party 

Total 

183 

3,301 
18.0 

663 
3.6 

1,361 
7.4 

235 
1.3 

5,560 
30.4 

Foreign Repair Station Annual Audits 

Responses 

Internal 

Regulatory 

Customer 

3rd Party 

Total 

27 

1,439 
53.3 

219 
8.1 

311 
11.5 

48 
1.8 

2,017 
74.7 

Total Repair Station Annual Audits 

Responses 

Internal 

Authority 

Customer 

3rd Party 

Total 

Grand Total 
Average 

210 

4,740 
22.6 

882 
4.2 

1,672 
8.0 

283 
1.3 

7,577 
36.1 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

APPENDIX E 

ANALYSIS OF THE AERONAUTICAL REPAIR STATION ASSOCIATION’S 

2007 MEMBER SURVEY 

Executive Summary 

In  March  2007,  the  Aeronautical  Repair  Station  Association  (ARSA)  conducted  a 

major survey of its members. The purposes of the 2007 survey were to: 

• Develop a better understanding of the markets served by ARSA members; 
• Determine what factors most affect member costs of doing business; 
• Identify legislative and regulatory issues of common concern to the membership; 
• Determine  what  members  perceive  as  the  most  important  parts  of  the  ARSA 
• Identify  additional  activities  the  association  could  undertake  to  enhance  value 

value proposition; and 

to members. 

This survey’s major findings were as follows: 
• ARSA’s  membership  is  dominated  by  privately-owned  small  businesses.  Nearly 
70 percent of the survey respondents have annual revenues below $10.5 million 
(Question  2);  more  than  67  percent  have  fifty  or  fewer  employees  (Question  3); 
and  more  than  81  percent  are  privately-owned  by  a  single  individual,  single 
family, or group of partners (Question 12). 
• The overwhelming majority of ARSA members (98.5 percent) hold Federal Avia-
tion  Administration  (FAA)  repair  station  certificates;  however,  more  than  two- 
thirds (68.42 percent) are also European Aviation Safety Administration (EASA) 
approval holders (Question 7). 
• Commercial air carriers are overwhelmingly the most important customer mar-
ket for ARSA members, with general (business aircraft) the second most impor-
tant.  The  military  and  general  (light  aircraft)  markets  are  a  distant  third  and 
fourth (Question 9). 
• Labor  unions  have  low  penetration  in  the  repair  station  industry.  Fewer  than 
twelve  percent  of  survey  respondents  report  that  their  facilities  are  unionized 
(Question 13). 
• The survey results suggest that the repair station industry is thriving economi-
cally. More than two-thirds (71.43 percent) of survey respondents said they plan 
to  add  positions  and/or  hire  new  workers  in  the  coming  year.  Not  a  single  sur-
vey  respondent  reported  plans  to  eliminate  positions.  Additionally,  83  percent 
of  survey  respondents  are  optimistic  about  business  prospects  for  the  coming 
year,  only  9  percent  are  ambivalent,  and  fewer  than  8  percent  are  pessimistic 
(Questions 15 and 18). 
• There is a considerable level of oversight of repair stations, with 42 percent re-
porting 11 or more external audits last year by regulators, customers, and third- 
party accreditation bodies (Question 19). 
• FAA resource problems are having some impact on the efficiency of the contract 
maintenance  industry.  A  quarter  (24.81  percent)  of  the  survey  respondents  re-
port  losing  customers  or  foregoing  business  opportunities  because  of  regulatory 
delays resulting from inadequate FAA staffing (Question 20.) 
• Obtaining maintenance manuals from manufacturers remains a major challenge 
for repair stations. Consistent with earlier ARSA surveys, more than 70 percent 
of survey respondents report having had some difficultly obtaining maintenance 
manuals  from  OEMs.  More  than  a  third  (37.59  percent)  of  respondents  report 
that  maintenance  manual  availability  is  a  consistent  source  of  frustration,  and 
that  their  ability  to  serve  customers  is  undermined  by  manufacturers  refusing 
to provide manuals and/or charging exorbitant prices (Questions 21 and 22.) 
• Rising health insurance costs have had a significant impact on ARSA members 
and their employees, with approximately three-quarters (74.44 percent) of mem-
bers reporting that they have had to reduce benefits or ask workers to shoulder 
more of the costs of health insurance in recent years (Question 25.) 
• Close to 80 percent of survey respondents have had trouble finding skilled tech-
nical workers. More survey respondents cited the shortage of technical workers 
as the single greatest challenge facing that aviation maintenance industry than 
any other (Questions 26 and 30). 
• ARSA members regard ARSA’s advocacy activities on behalf of the industry be-
fore  U.S.  regulators  and  Congress  as  the  most  important  parts  of  the  ARSA 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

value  proposition.  ARSA’s  regulatory  compliance  publications,  the  hotline,  and 
maintenance industry networking opportunities are also highly regarded (Ques-
tion 33.) 
• Survey  respondents  cite  their  desire  to  support  ARSA’s  advocacy  activities  and 
access  to  regulatory  compliance  assistance  as  the  top  reasons  for  joining  ARSA 
(Question 34.) 
• A  majority  of  survey  respondents  say  that  their  company  employees  have  not 
yet  participated  in  ARSA’s  Annual  Repair  Symposium,  suggesting  significant 
opportunities  to  grow  member  participation  in  ARSA’s  flagship  event.  Survey 
respondents  are  ambivalent  about  restructuring  the  Symposium  to  take  place 
entirely on weekdays and about adding a trade show component to the meeting 
(Question 40, 42 and 43.) 

Survey Methodology 

ARSA’s 2007 Member Survey was conducted between Feb. 26 and March 6 using 
SDI  Weblink’s  online  survey  system.  The  ARSA  key  contact  for  each  repair  station 
member  and  corporate  member  was  invited  to  participate  in  the  survey  through 
three  e-mails  sent  over  the  course  of  the  week  requesting  input.  Although  the  sur-
vey  was  anonymous,  the  survey  system  was  configured  to  prevent  duplicate  re-
sponses from the same individual. Ultimately, 133 ARSA member companies partici-
pated  in  the  survey  out  of  a  population  of  approximately  520  regular  and  15  cor-
porate members. The survey margin of error is 7.3 percent. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you. 
Mr. Barimo? 

STATEMENT OF BASIL J. BARIMO, 

VICE PRESIDENT, OPERATIONS AND SAFETY, 

AIR TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Mr. BARIMO. Thank you and good afternoon. 
I’m Basil Barimo, Vice President of Operations and Safety of the 

Air Transport Association of America. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  join  you  today,  as  you  consider 
how  the  expertise  of  highly  qualified  third  parties  can  be  applied 
to air carrier maintenance programs. 

Long  and  varied  experience  confirms  that  contract  maintenance 
can  be  both  safe,  and  efficient,  and  we  should  not  be  hesitant  in 
accepting  its  use.  Before  going  any  farther,  though,  I  want  to  em-
phasize that the starting point for any discussion that has aviation 
safety  implications  is  this—safety  is  the  constant,  overriding  con-
sideration  in  our  member’s  activities.  They  understand  their  re-
sponsibilities, and they act accordingly. 

The  U.S.  airline  industry’s  stellar,  and  improving,  safety  record 
demonstrates  that  unflagging  commitment.  Maintenance  con-
tracting  in  the  airline  industry  is  undertaken  in  this  overarching 
context  of  dedication  to  safety.  It’s  no  different  than  any  other  ac-
tivity in our industry in that respect. Consequently, it’s not a short-
cut  by  which  shoddy  maintenance  practices  are  tolerated,  it’s  not 
a  stray,  cutoff  from  an  airlines  overall  maintenance  program,  and 
it’s not adrift, detached from regulatory moorings. More decisively, 
the  safety  data  don’t  offer  a  reason  to  question  the  use  of  contract 
maintenance.  Outsourcing  has  increased  over  the  past  decade,  yet 
the U.S. industry’s maintenance-related safety record is the best it 
has ever been. If there were systemic problems with contract main-
tenance,  the  safety  data  would  have  exposed  it,  and  again,  we’re 
talking about NTSB data, not anecdotal claims. 

This  favorable  outcome  is  to  be  expected.  Once  again,  context  is 
crucial. Contract maintenance occurs in a highly structured, safety 
oriented environment, regardless of where it’s done. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

To  begin  with,  the  decision  to  outsource  is  for  each  airline  to 
make.  An  airline  makes  that  decision  as  the  certificate  holder,  the 
regulated  entity  that  is  ultimately  responsible  for  the  safety  of  its 
operations. If the airline elects to use third-party maintenance, the 
airline  is  not  fluffing  off  any  of  its  statutory  or  regulatory  obliga-
tions.  On  the  contrary,  the  airline’s  making  a  well  thought-out  de-
termination  that  outsourcing  will  contribute—both  in  terms  of  re-
sults and efficiency—to the airline’s maintenance program. 

Contract maintenance is common, and commonly accepted in the 
industry. Virtually every airline, to some degree, relies on contract 
maintenance—whether in the form of line, heavy, engine or compo-
nent maintenance. Aircraft operators with demanding and sophisti-
cated  maintenance  needs,  including  various  branches  of  the  U.S. 
military,  contract  for  maintenance  services.  It’s  not  an  exotic  prac-
tice, regardless of where it’s done. 

The  multi-layered  and  continuous  oversight  of  contract  mainte-
nance  does  more  than  ensure  a  safe  aircraft,  it  enhances  a  robust 
security  system—a  complex  system  of  checks  and  balances,  origi-
nally  designed  with  safety  in  mind,  are  interwoven  with  security, 
and  asset  protection  systems,  to  mitigate  risks  regardless  of  their 
nature. 

Oversight is fully integrated into FAA’s regulatory structure, the 
FARs  explicitly  recognize  it,  and  the  FAA  certificates  repair  sta-
tions,  which  must  comply  with  the  airlines  FAA-approved  mainte-
nance  program.  In  addition,  as  the  certificate  holder,  the  airline 
must monitor the quality of the maintenance that is performed. To 
do  so,  airlines  conduct  indepth  and  frequent  audits  of  the  repair 
stations  that  they  use,  they  employ  independent  auditors,  they  as-
sign their own onsite representatives to monitor repair station per-
formance,  and  they  measure  the  reliability  of  the  products  pro-
duced. Finally, the FAA has a compliance program that surveys the 
performance of both the airlines and the repair stations. 

Continued access to third-party maintenance is one ingredient in 
some airlines’ efforts to remain competitive both here and abroad— 
that  competitiveness  is  what  enables  passengers  and  shippers  to 
receive the services they want, at prices they’re willing to pay. 

Compromise  of  safety  can  never  be  tolerated,  but  neither  should 
efforts  to  limit  airlines’  ability  to  obtain  necessary  services—con-
sistent  with  the  highest  degree  of  safety—as  economically  as  pos-
sible.  This  search  for  efficiency  has  meant  that  some  airlines  have 
shifted where their maintenance is done. Sometimes it meant mov-
ing  the  location  of  in-house  maintenance  facilities,  other  times  it’s 
meant  contracting  with  a  third  party,  perhaps  even  overseas,  to 
perform  some  of  the  airlines’  maintenance.  Neither  type  of  change 
is  pleasant,  both  can  adversely  affect  workers  and  their  commu-
nities. It has, however, meant new job opportunities for some work-
ers, and new economic benefits for some communities. 

Far  from  resulting  in  the  export  of  the  majority  of  U.S.  mainte-
nance  jobs  overseas,  it  has  meant  that  we’ve  been  able  to  retain 
them  in  the  United  States.  This  is  a  key  point  in  evaluating  the 
effects of contracts maintenance. 

Thank  you  for  allowing  me  to  share  our  views  today,  and  I’m 

glad to answer questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Barimo follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BASIL J. BARIMO, VICE PRESIDENT, OPERATIONS AND 

SAFETY, AIR TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Introduction 

The Air Transport Association of America, Inc. (ATA), the trade association of the 
principal  U.S.  passenger  and  cargo  airlines,1 appreciates  the  opportunity  to  submit 
these  comments  for  the  record  on  safety  and  other  issues  affecting  the  U.S.  airline 
industry. ATA member airlines have a combined fleet of more than 4,000 airplanes 
and  account  for  more  than  90  percent  of  domestic  passenger  and  cargo  traffic  car-
ried annually by U.S. airlines. 

Safety is the constant, overriding imperative in our members’ activities. They un-
derstand  their  responsibilities  and  they  act  accordingly.  The  U.S.  airline  industry’s 
stellar—and  improving—safety  record  demonstrates  that  indisputable  commitment. 
Airlines Fuel Our Nation’s Economy 

The  U.S.  airline  industry  is  not  simply  an  important  sector  of  the  national  econ-
omy; its services fuel our entire economy. Air transportation is an indispensable ele-
ment of America’s infrastructure and our Nation’s economic well-being. Individuals, 
businesses and communities depend on the national air transportation system. U.S. 
airlines  transport  more  than  two  million  passengers  on  a  typical  day  and  directly 
employ  550,000  persons  to  do  so;  they  provide  just-in-time  cargo  services;  they  are 
the  backbone  of  the  travel  and  tourism  industry;  and  airlines  link  communities 
throughout our Nation and to the world. 

Moreover, the airline industry is the foundation of the commercial aviation sector, 
which comprises airlines, airports, manufacturers and associated vendors. U.S. com-
mercial  aviation  ultimately  drives  $1.2  trillion  in  U.S.  economic  activity  and  11.4 
million  U.S.  jobs.  By  any  measure,  the  U.S.  airline  industry  is  a  valuable  national 
asset and its continued economic health should be a matter of national concern. 
The Safest Airlines in the World 

Despite  the  unprecedented  travails  of  the  U.S.  airline  industry  throughout  the 
first half of this decade, its safety record has continued to improve. Our commitment 
to safety, even in the face of unprecedented financial adversity, has been unflagging 
and will remain so. 

Following $35 billion in losses from 2001 to 2005, 2006 was a much-improved year 
for  the  U.S.  airline  industry  from  an  economic  standpoint.  Including  the  all-cargo 
sector, the industry reported earnings of $3 billion for the year. 

While conditions have improved and the overall financial outlook is guardedly op-
timistic,  debt  levels  remain  high,  leaving  the  airlines  vulnerable  to  fuel  spikes,  re-
cession or exogenous shocks (e.g., terrorism, pandemics, natural disasters), let alone 
ill-advised  public  policy  decisions.  The  challenge  we  face  is  to  achieve  meaningful 
and  sustainable  profits,  and  to  improve  credit  ratings  to  the  point  where  airlines 
can  weather  normal  economic  turbulence  while  simultaneously  investing  in  the  fu-
ture. 

1 ABX  Air,  Inc.;  Alaska  Airlines;  Aloha  Airlines;  American  Airlines;  ASTAR  Air  Cargo;  Atlas 
Air;  Continental  Airlines;  Delta  Air  Lines;  Evergreen  International  Airlines;  Federal  Express 
Corp.;  Hawaiian  Airlines;  JetBlue  Airways;  Midwest  Airlines;  Northwest  Airlines;  Southwest 
Airlines; United Airlines; UPS Airlines; and US Airways. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Notwithstanding these financial challenges, airline safety has remained rock solid. 
NTSB  figures  show  fewer  accidents  in  2006  compared  to  2005  for  all  segments  of 
civil  aviation,  with  Part  121  carriers  continuing  to  have  the  lowest  accident  rates. 
In  2006,  Part  121  carriers  transported  750  million  passengers  more  than  eight  bil-
lion miles and logged 19 million flight hours on 11.4 million flights. Tragically, there 
were two fatal accidents in 2006 which claimed 50 lives. This yields an accident rate 
of  0.18  per  1,000,000  departures,  down  30  percent  from  2005.  For  comparison,  the 
average  rate  for  the  five-year  period  of  2002–2006  was  0.36,  and  the  5  years  prior 
to  that  saw  a  rate  of  0.45  accidents  per  1,000,000  departures.  The  trend  continues 
in 2007 and, without question scheduled air service is incredibly safe, getting safer, 
and maintenance certainly plays a role in that remarkable achievement. 

The  chart  above  clearly  depicts  the  remarkable  improvements  in  airline  safety 
that  have  occurred  over  time.  U.S.  air  carrier  accidents  are  rare  and  random.  A 
prominent  reason  for  this  is  the  extraordinary,  long-standing  collaboration  among 
the FAA, NTSB, NASA, manufacturers, airline employees and their unions, airlines 
themselves,  and  of  course,  maintenance,  repair  and  overhaul  service  providers 
(MROs). That collaborative relationship is firmly entrenched in the aviation commu-
nity; indeed, it has strengthened over the years. Programs such as the joint govern-
ment-industry Commercial Aviation Safety Team, Flight Operational Quality Assur-
ance  Programs,  Aviation  Safety  Action  Programs,  and  Line  Operations  Safety  Pro-
grams are important, tangible results of that ongoing collaboration. 

These collaborative safety-improvement efforts have created a safety management 
system  that  is  data  driven  and  is  based  on  risk  analysis.  That  undistracted  focus 
on  data  enables  safety-related  trends  to  be  identified,  often  before  they  emerge  as 
problems, and are properly resolved. This objective and measurable approach means 
that  we  apply  our  resources  where  the  needs  actually  are,  not  where  surmise  or 
unverified assumptions might take us. 

We  can  and  do  spot  these  trends,  whether  they  are  operational  or  maintenance 
related. With respect to the long-standing practice in the airline industry to use the 
expertise  of  regulated  contractors  to  perform  maintenance  services,  the  data  quite 
clearly do not tell us that safety suffers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
A
T
A
0
2
6

Maintenance Contracting Is Not a New Concept 

40 

In  simple  terms,  contract  maintenance  is  the  process  explicitly  allowed  by  FAR 
121.363(b) 2 where  airlines  hire  experts  to  perform  maintenance  tasks.  The  type  of 
maintenance  involved  can  range  from  minor  servicing  to  major  overhaul  of  compo-
nents, engines or the airframe itself. 

Airlines  exist  to  transport  people  and  goods.  In  order  to  survive  they  must  do  it 
safely, but to thrive in a fiercely competitive, global environment they must also do 
it  efficiently.  Safety  need  not  be  comprised  because  of  considerations  of  efficiency; 
in  fact,  it  can  be  significantly  advanced  in  an  environment  where  a  focus  on  effi-
ciency spurs a willingness to re-examine time-worn practices and encourage innova-
tion that embraces newer—and improved—practices. 

The  maintenance  of  commercial  airliners  is  a  complex,  capital-intensive  business 
requiring  specialized  equipment  and  facilities  along  with  highly-skilled  personnel. 
One implication of this is that using a maintenance facility or facilities with special-
ized skills is likely to be considered. Complexity inevitably will lead a carrier to ex-
amine dividing maintenance functions; some airlines will elect to do so, while others 
will  not.  Either  way,  examining  alternative  sources  in  this  type  of  environment  is 
entirely reasonable. 

Moreover,  current  airline  business  models  demand  continual  scrutiny  of  costs, 
commonly with a bias to shed non-core activities. In the case of maintenance, there 
are many incentives to utilize contract maintenance providers: 

nance infrastructure availability 

• Access to specialized repair facilities when and where they are needed 
• Avoidance of major capital investments (equipment and facilities) 
• Increased utilization of existing facilities 
• Improved employee focus on core airline activities 
• Optimization  of  flight  schedules  around  customer  demand  instead  of  mainte-
• Exceptional quality at a reduced cost 
As expected, the level of contract maintenance utilized by individual airlines var-
ies significantly based on factors such as the type(s) of aircraft used, geographic re-
gion  of  operation,  business  philosophy,  labor  agreement  limitations,  internal  cost 
structure, and commercial relationships with airframe, engine and component man-
ufacturers.  Without  exception,  all  airlines  rely  to  some  extent  on  contract  mainte-
nance  providers.  This  is  a  point  that  should  not  be  obscured:  contract  maintenance 
is  a  commonly  accepted  practice  in  this  industry.  The  extent  of  it  may  vary  from 
airline to airline but there is nothing out of the ordinary about its use. 

Airlines  are  by  no  means  unique  in  their  reliance  on  contract  maintenance.  In 
fact,  many  industries  rely  heavily  on  contract  maintenance  providers  for  a  broad 
range  of  services.  Trains,  buses  and  cruise  ships  are  predominantly  maintained  by 
companies  other  than  those  who  operate  them.  The  United  States  Department  of 
Defense  contracts  with  private  companies  for  the  maintenance  of  aircraft,  in  many 
cases  the  same  companies  utilized  by  commercial  airlines.  As  this  widespread  pat-
tern  of  relying  on  contract  maintenance  suggests,  operators  with  very  demanding 
and sophisticated needs routinely and successfully outsource maintenance. 
Statistics Don’t Lie 

Commercial  airlines  have  utilized  contract  maintenance  for  decades.  The  indus-
try’s reliance on contract maintenance providers increased since 2001 as airlines re-
structured  their  business  models.  The  implications  of  this  change  have  been  mis-
understood.  It  does  not  signal  a  diminution  in  safety  or  a  ‘‘slippery  slope.’’  Critics 
of contract maintenance argue that ‘‘If airlines don’t perform all of the maintenance 
themselves, then they can’t be safe.’’ Independent data from the National Transpor-
tation Safety Board (NTSB) proves them wrong. 

2 FAR 121.363 Responsibility for Airworthiness states that: 
(a) Each certificate holder is primarily responsible for— 

(1)  The  airworthiness  of  its  aircraft,  including  airframes,  aircraft  engines,  propellers,  appli-

ances, and parts thereof; and 

(2)  The  performance  of  the  maintenance,  preventive  maintenance,  and  alteration  of  its  air-
craft,  including  airframes,  aircraft  engines,  propellers,  appliances,  emergency  equipment,  and 
parts thereof, in accordance with its manual and the regulations of this chapter. 

(b)  A  certificate  holder  may  make  arrangements  with  another  person  for  the  performance  of 
any maintenance, preventive maintenance, or alterations. However, this does not relieve the cer-
tificate holder of the responsibility specified in paragraph (a) of this section. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Based  on  data  compiled  by  the  NTSB,  maintenance-related  accidents  make  up 

roughly 8 percent of all Part 121 accidents over the last 10 years. 

41 

The chart above clearly illustrates that U.S. airlines’ use of contract maintenance 
has not been a detriment to safety. In fact, maintenance-related safety performance 
is  the  best  its  ever  been.  It  is  simply  not  reasonable,  based  on  the  data  available, 
to consider the practice of maintenance contracting unsafe. 
Effective Oversight Is the Key 

Air carriers understand that aircraft maintenance is vital to continued operational 
safety.  Likewise,  safe  operations  are  elemental  to  compliance  with  regulatory  re-
quirements and ultimately to an airline’s existence. Over time, the industry has de-
veloped a comprehensive, multilayered approach to oversight that ensures the high-
est levels of quality and safety regardless of who does the work or where that work 
is performed. This point cannot be overstated—safety is what counts, first and fore-
most. 

Initial  levels  of  protection  are  contained  in  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration 
(FAA)  regulations,  which  provide  a  basic  framework  to  ensure  competence  among 
those  certificated  to  perform  aircraft  maintenance.3 Prior  to  granting  certification, 
the  FAA  confirms  that  an  entity  or  individual  has  fulfilled  specific  regulatory  re-
quirements. 

Part  of  this  approval  process  involves  the  issuance  of  Operations  Specifications 
(OpSpecs) by the FAA. Air carrier OpSpecs contain a specific section to address air-
craft maintenance, and repair station OpSpecs delineate the ratings and limitations 
of the maintenance that can be performed. In FAA Order 8300.10, Volume 2, Chap-
ter 84, it is stated, in part, that: 

OpSpecs  transform  the  general  terms  of  applicable  regulations  into  an  under-
standable  legal  document  tailored  to  the  specific  needs  of  an  individual  certifi-
cate  holder.  OpSpecs  are  as  legally  binding  as  the  regulations  . . .  (Citations 
omitted) 

Once certificated, air carriers and repair stations are inspected and monitored by 
the  FAA  to  verify  their  continued  conformity  with  the  rules.  This  ongoing  surveil-
lance process can be viewed as the second layer of safety. 

Additionally,  certificated  air  carriers  acquire  the  non-delegable  responsibility  for 
the  airworthiness  of  the  aircraft  in  their  fleet.4 The  backbone  of  any  air  carrier’s 

3 See, for example, 14 CFR parts 121, 145 and 65. 
4 See 14 CFR §121.363 which provides that: 
(a) Each certificate holder is primarily responsible for— 

Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
A
T
A
0
2
6

42 

airworthiness  is  its  Continuing  Analysis  and  Surveillance  System  (CASS).  CASS  is 
a quality-assurance system required by FAR 121.373 consisting of surveillance, con-
trols,  analysis,  corrective  action  and  follow-up.  Together,  these  functions  form  a 
closed loop system that allows carriers to monitor the quality of their maintenance. 
In  a  structured  and  methodical  manner,  the  CASS  provides  carriers  with  the  nec-
essary information to enhance their maintenance programs. 

Aircraft maintenance is the primary ingredient of airworthiness and FAA regula-
tions contain detailed maintenance program and manual requirements,5 which vali-
date the related air-carrier processes and procedures. When work is sent to a repair 
station, it must follow the maintenance program of the air carrier with whom it has 
contracted.6 Combined, these duties comprise the third level of protection. 

Apart  from  external  FAA  surveillance,  and  in  line  with  their  ultimate  responsi-
bility  for  airworthiness,  airlines  conduct  in-depth  initial  and  frequent  follow-up 
maintenance  vendor  audits.  As  a  rule,  these  audits  are  performed  by  air  carrier 
quality, compliance or inspection department employees, but oftentimes may include 
outside  counsel  and/or  consulting  firms  who  specialize  in  air  carrier  maintenance. 
These audits create a robust fourth level of oversight. 

Industry protocol for conducting and substantiating independent audits of air car-
riers  and  repair  stations  is  established  by  the  Coordinating  Agency  for  Supplier 
Evaluation (C.A.S.E.). In addition, guidance materials and inspection checklists cre-
ated for FAA inspectors are frequently used. 

Typically, preliminary investigation of a potential repair station vendor by an air 

carrier would include: 

• Review of repair station performance and quality metrics 
• Feedback from past and current repair station customers 
• Verification of repair station capabilities (OpSpecs) 
• Review of FAA mandated Repair Station Manual, Quality Manual and Training 

Manual 

If this repair station examination is satisfactory, it is normally followed by an on- 
site  visit  to  verify  compliance  with  applicable  regulations,  C.A.S.E.  requirements 
and  adherence  to  the  repair  station’s  own  manuals.  Some  areas  of  investigation  in-
clude: 

• Validation of FAA certificates held by persons directly in charge of maintenance 

and/or those who perform maintenance 

• Inspection of training records of inspectors, technicians and supervisors 
• Examination  of  procedures  for  technical  data,  documentation  and  maintenance 

record control 

• Examination of procedures for work processing, disposal of scrap parts, tool cali-

bration and handling material with a limited shelf life 

• Review of repair station internal inspection, quality, and security programs 
• Review of previous inspection program results and corrective actions 
If the repair station is selected to perform maintenance for the air carrier, similar 

on-site audits would be conducted on a regular basis. 

Finally, a fifth layer of oversight is provided by on-site air carrier representatives. 
These individuals monitor the day-to-day operations and coordinate the activities of 
the repair station related to the air carrier’s equipment. Final inspections and, ulti-
mately, air carrier approval for service are also normally accomplished by these on- 
site airline personnel. 

(1)  The  airworthiness  of  its  aircraft,  including  airframes,  aircraft  engines,  propellers,  appli-

ances, and parts thereof; and 

(2)  The  performance  of  the  maintenance,  preventive  maintenance,  and  alteration  of  its  air-
craft,  including  airframes,  aircraft  engines,  propellers,  appliances,  emergency  equipment,  and 
parts thereof, in accordance with its manual and the regulations of this chapter. 

(b) A certificate holder may make arrangements with another person for the performance of any 
maintenance, preventive maintenance, or alterations. However, this does not relieve the certificate 
holder of the responsibility specified in paragraph (a) of this section. (Emphasis added.) 

5 See 14 CFR §§ 121.365; 121.367; 121.369. 
6 See 14 CFR §145.205 which states, in part, that: 
(a) A certificated repair station that performs maintenance, preventive maintenance, or alter-
ations  for  an  air  carrier  or  commercial  operator  that  has  a  continuous  airworthiness  mainte-
nance program under part 121 or part 135 must follow the air carrier’s or commercial operator’s 
program and applicable sections of its maintenance manual. (Emphasis added.) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

In  essence,  there  are  two  separate  but  mutually  reinforcing  oversight  schemes, 
one regulatory and one independent, both effective in ensuring satisfaction of appli-
cable  FAA  regulations.  However,  air  carriers  have  further  incentive  to  provide  ade-
quate  oversight  through  the  potential  negative  impact—real  or  perceived—of  safety 
related  issues.  Without  question,  air  carriers  continue  to  make  safety  their  top  pri-
ority. Safety is ingrained in our culture. 
Safety and Security Layers Are Interwoven 

Security  of  repair  station  activities  is  a  constant  consideration.  As  in  other  areas 
of  civil  aviation  security,  the  response  to  this  issue  is  based  on  a  layered  approach. 
The subject of foreign repair station security measures has attracted attention re-
cently. We wish to clarify a few points about those measures. As a preliminary mat-
ter, we support the Congressional instruction to the Transportation Security Admin-
istration to issue foreign repair station security regulations. We look forward to par-
ticipating in the anticipated TSA rulemaking proceeding. 

Mutually  reinforcing  U.S.  and  host  country  regulatory  requirements  and  carrier 
practices produce the layered security regime at foreign repair stations. This begins 
with  a  U.S.  air  carrier’s  evaluation  of  a  potential  service  provider  before  it  enters 
into  a  contract  for  maintenance,  repair  or  overhaul  services.  This  is  an  important 
first  step  for  the  carrier;  it  is  looking  to  entrust  an  aircraft  or  high-value  compo-
nents  to  a  vendor.  The  carrier  obviously  wants  to  prevent  unauthorized  access  to 
such equipment and to be confident that the potential vendor can do so. Beyond that 
very  basic  business  concern,  are  the  security  requirements  that  the  country’s  civil 
aviation  authority  and  the  airport  authority  impose.  Those  requirements  are  rein-
forced  by  periodic  TSA  foreign  airport  security  inspections.  Coupled  with  those  re-
quirements is the typical presence of a representative of the U.S. carrier at the for-
eign  facility.  Weaved  into  this  array  of  measures  is  the  FAA  requirement  that  re-
paired or overhauled items be inspected when they are returned to the U.S. carrier 
and before they are returned to service aboard an aircraft. This means that multiple 
sets of trained eyes inspect a part that has been at a foreign repair station. Finally, 
before  an  aircraft  is  returned  to  passenger  service  from  a  foreign  location,  it  must 
complete the aircraft security inspection procedures. 

These complementary procedures yield a layered approach, which is the hallmark 
of how aviation security is achieved today. We look forward to continue to work with 
U.S. and foreign regulators on these measures. 
Global Competition, Local Politics 

U.S. airlines continually lead the world in virtually every performance metric, in-
cluding  safety.  Their  ability  to  compete  effectively  on  a  global  scale  is  due,  at  least 
in  part,  to  their  ability  to  evolve  with  changing  market  conditions.  Airlines  across 
the  United  States  and  around  the  world  have  formed  alliances  that  extend  beyond 
their networks to many aspects of airline operations, including maintenance. These 
complex  relationships  involve  airlines,  aircraft  manufacturers  and  a  host  of  service 
providers. 

The loss of some 130,000 airline jobs since 9/11 has been well documented. As air-
lines  downsized  to  meet  a  reduced  demand  for  air  travel,  it  became  even  more  dif-
ficult  for  them  to  efficiently  utilize  their  exhaustive  maintenance  infrastructure. 
Fleet  reductions  targeted  older,  maintenance-intensive  aircraft,  leaving  too  few  air-
craft being maintained at too many facilities, and airlines looked to contract mainte-
nance  providers  as  a  way  to  secure  quality  maintenance  while  shedding  the  expen-
sive  infrastructure  costs.  Airlines  were  also  forced  to  renegotiate  labor  agreements 
in an effort to reduce costs, bolster productivity and increase asset utilization. Scope 
clauses  were  modified  to  allow  air  carriers  to  more  broadly  leverage  contract  main-
tenance—a painful move for affected employees, but ultimately essential to the air-
line’s  survival.  It  is  this  impact  on  employees,  particularly  maintenance  employees, 
that draws attention to the issue of maintenance contracting. 

The  debate  surrounding  the  issue  of  contract  maintenance  is  best  understood 

when broken down into several key points: 

• Most  statistics  relating  to  the  amount  of  maintenance  contracted  are  based  on 
the  amount  an  airline  spends.  The  amount  ‘outsourced’  is  derived  by  dividing 
the amount spent on contract maintenance by the total maintenance cost for the 
airline.  These  include  all  costs  associated  with  the  maintenance  of  airframes, 
engines and components. 
• Engine  maintenance  is  much  more  expensive  per  event  than  airframe  mainte-
nance, due largely to the replacement of expensive parts within the engine. The 
fact  that  virtually  all  engine  maintenance  is  performed  outside  the  airline  can 
skew the numbers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

• Even  the  largest  engines  are  readily  transportable  enabling  access  to  repair 
centers around the world. Engine manufacturers such as GE, Pratt & Whitney, 
and  Rolls-Royce  rely  on  their  subsidiaries  worldwide  for  maintenance  of  their 
products  although,  as  shown  below,  most  of  that  work  is  performed  domesti-
cally.  Large  U.S.  airline  MROs  also  maintain  engines  for  foreign  and  domestic 
customers. 

nally.7 

• ATA-member airlines continue to perform the majority of airframe checks inter-
• The  majority  of  narrow-body  aircraft  maintenance  work  contracted  out  in  the 
past few years has stayed within North America. Maintenance, repair and over-
haul  companies  (MROs)  in  Washington,  North  Carolina,  Florida,  New  York, 
Georgia,  Tennessee,  Arizona,  Texas  and  Indiana  are  among  those  now  per-
forming  the  work.  Large  airlines  with  available  capacity  have  also  captured  a 
portion,  and  the  remainder  is  performed  by  experts  in  Central/South  America 
and Canada. 

7 According  to  a  2005  survey  of  ATA  member  airlines,  70  percent  of  all  heavy  maintenance 

checks (‘C’ or higher) were performed internally by direct airline personnel. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
A
T
A
0
2
6

45 

• Heavy  airframe  maintenance  performed  by  MROs  outside  of  North  America  is 
limited  primarily  to  wide-body  aircraft.  Regularly  scheduled  operations  enable 
these long-range aircraft to routinely transit locations abroad that offer best-in- 
class  maintenance  for  these  aircraft  types.  Asia  and  Europe  do  much  of  this 
work. 

Conclusion 

U.S.  airlines  have  logged  an  exceptional  safety  record  while  steadily  expanding 
their  use  of  contract  maintenance.  So  while  critics  charge  that  maintenance  con-
tracting  undermines  safety,  independent  government  figures  simply  don’t  support 
that  conclusion.  When  considered  objectively,  it  is  evident  that  the  practice  helps 
U.S.  airlines  compete  effectively  with  their  global  counterparts.  The  ability  to  opti-
mize  maintenance  practices  to  produce  safe,  reliable,  customer-worthy  aircraft  at  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
5
A
T
A
0
2
6

.

s
p
e
4
A
T
A
0
2
6

46 

competitive  cost  is  essential  to  airlines’  long-term  health.  Healthy  airlines  grow, 
adding  service  to  new  destinations  and  increasing  service  to  existing  ones.  That 
growth  requires  new  aircraft,  creating  new  jobs  within  the  airline  for  pilots,  flight 
attendants, ramp and customer service personnel, and a wide range of support staff. 
Beyond the airline, the impact grows exponentially and is felt nationwide by manu-
facturers, ATC service providers, airports, caterers, fuelers—the list goes on and on. 
Contract  maintenance  has  played  and  continues  to  play  an  important  role  in  im-
proving the health of the U.S. airline industry—in a way that is entirely consistent 
with  our  fundamental  commitment  to  safety.  It  is  imperative  that  this  fact  not  be 
overshadowed by the movement of jobs from one state or district to another. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Barimo. 
Mr. Brantley? 

STATEMENT OF TOM BRANTLEY, PRESIDENT, PROFESSIONAL 

AIRWAYS SYSTEMS SPECIALISTS (PASS), AFL–CIO 

Mr.  BRANTLEY.  Madame  Chairwoman,  Chairman  Rockefeller, 
Senator Lott, and members of the Subcommittee, thank you for in-
viting PASS to testify today. 

PASS  represents  over  11,000  FAA  employees,  including  approxi-

mately 2,800 Flight Standards aviation safety inspectors. 

In  recent  years,  the  aviation  industry  has  experienced  dramatic 
changes,  including  airlines  increasing  their  reliance  on  outsourced 
maintenance  work,  and  a  large  portion  of  this  work  is  being  per-
formed at FAA-certificated foreign repair stations. 

PASS and the inspector workforce we represent, who are respon-
sible  for  overseeing  the  certification  of  and  the  work  performed  at 
foreign  repair  stations,  have  serious  concerns  regarding  the  over-
sight of these facilities. 

Of primary importance, there must be an adequate number of ex-
perienced and trained FAA inspectors in place with budgetary and 
management support to properly oversee foreign repair stations. 

Inspector staffing has not kept pace with the exploding outsourc-
ing business and nearly half of the workforce will be eligible to re-
tire  within  3  years.  As  such,  PASS  is  requesting  that  Congress  di-
rect  the  agency  to  follow  recommendations  outlined  in  the  recent 
study  released  by  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  and  develop 
a staffing model for inspectors. 

Instead  of  addressing  the  inspector  staffing  issue,  however,  the 
FAA  is  working  to  expand  the  use  of  Bilateral  Aviation  Safety 
Agreements, which allow foreign authorities to provide oversight of 
the  work  performed  at  repair  facilities.  There  are  inherent  prob-
lems  associated  with  allowing  non-FAA  employees  in  foreign  loca-
tions to perform work on behalf of the FAA. Primarily, the fact that 
the  FAA  does  not  have  adequate  oversight  procedures  in  place  to 
ensure the quality of these inspections. 

The  FAA  is  entering  into  these  bilateral  agreements  with  other 
countries not to strengthen aviation safety, but instead to pass the 
responsibility for oversight onto another entity. It must be required 
and  verified  that  inspections  conducted  by  foreign  authorities  are 
done in line with the safety standards and regulations of this coun-
try. Until this issue is adequately addressed, additional agreements 
with foreign aviation authorities should not be allowed. 

In  addition,  inspectors  tell  us  of  several  problems  regarding  the 
regulations  governing  foreign  repair  stations  and  the  security  at 
foreign repair stations, since the FAA does not require the same se-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

curity screening or drug and alcohol testing of employees at foreign 
repair stations as are required in our own country. 

Furthermore, the process an inspector must go through, in order 
to  gain  access  to  a  foreign  repair  station  is  so  lengthy  and  tedious 
that by the time the inspector arrives at the facility, the repair sta-
tion  is  fully  aware  of  the  visit  and  the  element  of  surprise  is  non-
existent, rendering the inspection a simple formality. 

The  FAA  will  argue  steadfastly  that  it  cannot  impose  standards 
on  foreign  countries  for  drug  and  alcohol  testing  of  employees  at 
foreign repair stations or demand that inspectors be allowed to con-
duct  unannounced  inspections.  Clearly,  the  United  States  cannot 
insist  that  another  country  apply  our  standards  and  regulations, 
nor  can  we  dictate  the  requirements  under  which  a  foreign  busi-
ness must operate. 

However,  by  requiring  the  same  standards  for  foreign  as  it  does 
for domestic repair stations, the FAA would not be mandating that 
a  foreign  government  or  business  do  anything  since  these  foreign 
repair stations choose to voluntarily contract with U.S. carriers. 

The  FAA’s  responsibility  in  this  regard  is  to  maintain  oversight 
of  all  aspects  of  aviation  safety,  including  where  and  how  repair 
work is performed. To hold foreign facilities to lesser standards not 
only  compromises  safety,  it  gives  an  unfair  advantage  to  foreign 
businesses  that  do  not  have  to  meet  the  same  standards  as  those 
in the United States. 

Oversight of foreign repair station maintenance is in critical need 
of  attention  and  improvement.  The  FAA  must  take  immediate 
steps  to  increase  staffing  for  its  inspector  workforce  so  they  are 
able  to  continue  to  defend  this  country’s  reputation  as  having  the 
safest aviation system in the world. 

Thank  you,  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  that 

you have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Brantley follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TOM BRANTLEY, PRESIDENT, PROFESSIONAL AIRWAYS 

SYSTEMS SPECIALISTS (PASS), AFL–CIO 

Chairman Rockefeller, Senator Lott and members of the Subcommittee, thank you 
for  inviting  PASS  to  testify  today  on  the  oversight  of  foreign  aviation  repair  sta-
tions.  Professional  Airways  Systems  Specialists  (PASS)  represents  11,000  Federal 
Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  employees,  including  approximately  2,800  Flight 
Standards field aviation safety inspectors 1 located in 103 field offices in the United 
States  and  eight  international  field  offices  in  the  United  States  and  abroad.  FAA 
inspectors are responsible for certification, education, oversight, surveillance and en-
forcement  of  the  entire  aviation  system,  including  air  operator  certificates,  repair 
station certificates, aircraft, pilots, mechanics, flight instructors and designees. 

In recent years, the overall dynamic of the aviation industry has experienced sig-
nificant  changes.  One  such  change  in  practice  is  the  outsourcing  of  maintenance 
work to repair stations in this country and abroad. Whereas much of this work was 
once done at the air carrier’s facility, according to the Department of Transportation 
Inspector General, air carriers’ use of outsourced repair stations has grown from 37 
percent  of  air  carriers’  maintenance  costs  in  1996  to  62  percent  in  2005,  or  nearly 
$3.4 billion of the $5.5 billion spent on maintenance. During the first three quarters 

1 As of February 2007, the FAA lists the number of Flight Standards inspectors as 3,593. This 
figure,  however,  includes  first  line  field  and  office  managers;  the  PASS  figure  only  includes  in-
spectors who actually perform inspection functions in the field. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

of  2006,  the  amount  of  outsourced  maintenance  had  already  increased  to  64  per-
cent.2 

A  large  portion  of  this  work  is  being  performed  at  facilities  in  foreign  locations; 
there  are  currently  over  690  foreign  repair  stations  certified  by  the  FAA.  FAA  in-
spectors at international field offices (IFOs) are charged with certifying these repair 
stations and then recertifying them approximately every 2 years. FAA inspectors at 
certificate  management  offices  (CMOs)  in  this  country  provide  oversight  of  the 
maintenance  work  performed  on  their  assigned  air  carriers  at  FAA-certificated  for-
eign repair stations. However, with the current state of the inspector workforce and 
the tedious and bureaucratic process behind inspecting foreign repair stations, many 
inspectors  say  that  they  are  not  confident  with  the  level  of  oversight  of  foreign  re-
pair stations and that serious safety issues are not being addressed. 
Airworthiness Inspectors 

The  airworthiness  inspector  workforce  consists  of  both  avionics  and  maintenance 
inspectors,  and  there  are  two  types  of  airworthiness  inspectors—general  aviation 
and air carrier: 

• General  aviation  inspectors  oversee  both  foreign  and  domestic  repair  stations. 
Inspectors at IFOs are responsible for certifying FAA-certificated foreign repair 
stations.  There  are  eight  FAA  IFOs  located  worldwide  in  Alaska,  California, 
Florida,  New  York,  Texas,  England,  Germany  and  Singapore  that  conduct  cer-
tifications  and  surveillance  of  U.S.  foreign  repair  stations  in  a  particular  geo-
graphic  area.  When  inspecting  a  foreign  repair  station,  the  IFO  inspectors  ex-
amine several important elements, including, among other things, ensuring that 
the repair station has and continues to comply with the Code of Federal Regula-
tions  Part  145  for  their  repair  station  certificate  and  operation  specifications, 
making sure repair station manuals continue to meet Federal Aviation Regula-
tions, and examining the maintenance training, tools and equipment. These in-
spections vary depending on the size and complexity of the repair station, with 
the  time  to  complete  an  inspection  on  a  foreign  repair  station  ranging  from  a 
day to a week or more, not including travel time. 

• Air carrier inspectors are assigned to a specific air carrier and examine the cer-
tificate-specific  work  on  behalf  of  the  air  carrier  certificate  to  which  they  are 
assigned.  An  air  carrier  inspector  examines  the  actual  work  being  done  at  the 
air  carrier’s  facilities  or  a  repair  station  related  to  their  respective  air  carrier 
certificate and not the repair station in general. This can include inspecting the 
aircraft, examining technical data, and looking at housing and facilities. Air car-
rier  inspectors  often  ‘‘spot  check’’  specific  areas  based  upon  risk-assessment 
data, a process that can take a few hours or several days depending on the area 
of concern. 

Following  an  inspection,  both  the  general  aviation  and  air  carrier  airworthiness 
inspectors enter the results of their inspections into specific FAA databases. General 
aviation  inspectors  use  the  Program  Tracking  Reporting  System  (PTRS)  database, 
and  air  carrier  inspectors  enter  information  into  either  the  PTRS  database  or  the 
Air  Transportation  Oversight  System  (ATOS)  database.  This  information  is  then 
available  for  all  FAA  inspectors  through  the  Safety  Performance  Analysis  System 
(SPAS), enabling inspectors to analyze areas of potential concern. 
Inadequate Inspector Staffing 

A recent study released by the National Academy of Sciences called attention not 
only  to  insufficient  inspector  staffing  but  also  to  the  FAA’s  lack  of  a  viable  staffing 
model to determine whether it has the correct number of skilled individuals in posi-
tion  to  accomplish  the  responsibilities  of  the  job.  As  noted  by  the  Academies,  ‘‘The 
number of aviation safety inspectors employed by the FAA has remained nearly un-
changed  over  the  past  several  years,  while  aviation  industries,  especially  the  com-
mercial air carriers, have been expanding and changing rapidly.’’ 3 

The  increasing  use  of  foreign  repair  stations  has  been  drawing  even  more  atten-
tion  to  the  inspector  staffing  problem.  As  the  industry  continues  to  expand,  the 
number  of  FAA  inspectors  has  not  kept  pace;  in  fact,  nearly  half  of  the  workforce 
will  be  eligible  to  retire  by  2010.  Unfortunately,  for  2008,  the  FAA  is  only  request-

2 Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General,  Aviation  Safety:  FAA’s  Oversight  of 

Outsourced Maintenance Facilities, CC–2007–035 (Washington, D.C.: March 29, 2007), p. 1. 

3 National  Research  Council,  Committee  on  Federal  Aviation  Administration  Aviation  Safety 
Inspector  Staffing  Standards,  Staffing  Standard  for  Aviation  Safety  Inspectors  (Washington, 
D.C.: The National Academies Press, 2006), p. 1–4. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

ing funding to hire an additional 87 inspectors 4 above attrition despite the looming 
surge  in  retirements  and  the  fact  that  it  takes  two  to  3  years  to  fully  train  an  in-
spector. 

With airlines increasing their reliance on outsourced maintenance work, the work-
load  of  inspectors  located  at  CMOs  charged  with  overseeing  this  work  has  sky-
rocketed but inspector staffing has remained stagnant. A prime example of the prob-
lems with inspector understaffing and the increasing reliance on outsourced mainte-
nance  work  is  Delta  Airlines.  Since  2005,  Delta  has  outsourced  all  of  its  heavy 
maintenance work. Inspecting the heavy maintenance work involves a thorough ex-
amination of an entire airplane. According to one inspector at the Delta CMO, when 
this  work  was  performed  at  the  Delta  facility,  an  inspector  could  oversee  the  work 
by  traveling  a  mere  seven  miles  to  the  Delta  facility.  Now,  inspectors  are  forced  to 
travel from the CMO in Atlanta to places located hours away, such as Florida, Mex-
ico or, as recently announced by Delta, China. To make matters worse, staffing fig-
ures  are  down  considerably  at  the  CMO—after  losing  four  inspectors  last  year  and 
another  two  this  year  with  no  replacements  hired,  the  CMO  is  now  staffed  at  11 
airworthiness inspectors with a few additional inspectors at different locations. 

Inspectors  stationed  at  IFOs  responsible  for  certifying  repair  stations  also  face 
several  problems  related  to  insufficient  staffing.  The  number  of  foreign  repair  sta-
tions  is  on  the  rise  as  more  and  more  air  carriers  outsource  work  to  these  less-ex-
pensive alternatives. A lack of inspector staffing, however, makes it difficult to per-
form these certifications and impossible to do any follow-up if a problem is detected. 
For  instance,  there  are  only  eight  airworthiness  inspectors  at  the  London  IFO  re-
sponsible for 165 certificates in England and Scotland. When one of these inspectors 
dedicated  to  avionics  went  on  medical  leave,  this  left  only  one  avionics  inspector  to 
cover all 165 of these repair stations. In another example, for years, a single inspec-
tor  at  the  Miami  IFO  had  been  responsible  for  certifying  the  14  certificated  repair 
stations in Brazil, many of which are expansive, complicated facilities. The need for 
additional staffing was finally addressed in this particular situation and another in-
spector has been assigned to the repair stations in Brazil. 

If  the  industry  is  going  to  continue  to  increase  its  use  of  foreign  repair  stations, 
it is essential to aviation safety that there are enough inspectors to ensure oversight 
of  the  repair  stations  and  the  work  performed  there.  Many  of  our  inspectors  have 
told PASS that their workload is based on the number of inspectors available rather 
than the oversight that is needed. As such, PASS is requesting that Congress direct 
the  agency  to  develop  a  staffing  model  for  aviation  safety  inspectors  and  follow  the 
recommendations  outlined  in  the  Academies  study.  The  Academies  staffing  study 
also  emphasized  the  importance  of  involving  those  who  are  affected  by  the  staffing 
model in its development, specifically stating that aviation safety inspectors, as well 
as  PASS,  should  be  included  in  the  process  from  the  beginning  and  remain  active 
participants through the model’s design, development and implementation. In addi-
tion,  the  FAA  should  be  required  to  report  to  Congress  on  a  quarterly  basis  on  its 
inspector  workforce  plan  in  order  to  ensure  that  the  agency  has  an  adequate  num-
ber of inspectors to oversee the industry. 
Funding Constraints 

Combined with the low staffing numbers, insufficient funding for travel obviously 
has a considerable impact on the FAA’s ability to perform oversight of foreign repair 
stations. PASS is hearing from our inspectors of more and more instances in which 
FAA  inspections  of  major  repair  stations  that  perform  heavy  maintenance  work 
have been canceled or cut short due to lack of funds. According to inspectors in the 
field,  the  inspection  process  has  become  primarily  budget  driven  rather  than  moti-
vated by safety. 

CMO  inspectors  located  in  this  country  encounter  numerous  problems  when  try-
ing  to  travel  to  foreign  repair  stations  and  are  often  questioned  by  FAA  manage-
ment as to the necessity of travel expenses needed to reach a location where mainte-
nance is being performed. For example, a recent trip to a repair station in Germany 
was approved and then canceled at the last minute when the inspector was told that 
there  was  not  enough  funding  to  perform  the  inspection.  In  another  situation,  a 
CMO  inspector  responsible  for  examining  air  carrier  outsourced  maintenance  work 
performed  at  repair  stations  in  Singapore,  China  and  Ireland  is  only  able  to  get  to 
these  repair  stations  every  four  or  five  years.  Even  more  disturbing,  another  CMO 
inspector  responsible  for  work  being  performed  in  Scotland  has  never  even  been  to 
the  repair  station.  Although  infrequently  seen  by  the  CMO  inspector,  it  should  be 

4 Government  Accountability  Office,  Federal  Aviation  Administration:  Key  Issues  in  Ensuring 
the Efficient Development and Safe Operation of the Next Generation Air Transportation System, 
GAO–07–636T (Washington, D.C.: March 22, 2007), p. 31. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

noted  that  these  repair  stations  are  still  recertified  by  an  IFO  inspector  approxi-
mately every 2 years. 

The ability to follow up once a problem is detected is an issue faced by both CMO 
and  IFO  inspectors,  and  both  of  these  groups  of  inspectors  say  funding  is  the  pri-
mary  reason  for  not  being  able  to  follow  up  on  an  issue.  One  IFO  inspector  reports 
that  they  often  have  to  wait  until  the  following  year  to  validate  whether  or  not  a 
problem  has  been  corrected  or  pass  on  the  issue  to  the  next  inspector  traveling  to 
that country. CMO inspectors are often only able to send the repair station a letter, 
depend  on  the  repair  station’s  response  for  closure,  and  wait  until  the  next  inspec-
tion  in  order  to  determine  if  the  issues  have  been  addressed  and  a  long-term  solu-
tion incorporated. 

It is impossible to ensure safe operations at these repair stations if inspectors are 
rushed in their inspections, unable to perform adequate follow-up or prevented from 
visiting  the  repair  stations  altogether.  The  IG  specifically  addressed  the  impact  of 
the  lack  of  resources  on  the  oversight  process,  concluding  that  ‘‘adequate  resources 
need  to  be  committed  to  air  carrier  oversight  to  ensure  the  continuity  of  safe  oper-
ations, particularly as the airline industry makes significant and ongoing transitions 
in  their  operations.’’ 5 As  such,  PASS  feels  that  it  is  imperative  that  the  FAA  allo-
cate  adequate  resources  for  FAA  inspectors  to  visit  each  foreign  repair  station  at 
a minimum of twice a year. 
Additional Concerns With Oversight of Foreign Repair Stations 

Inspectors  in  the  field  relay  several  problems  associated  with  traveling  to  foreign 
countries  to  examine  repair  stations.  The  process  for  traveling  overseas  to  inspect 
a repair station is so labor intensive, often involving State Department coordination 
and  country  clearances,  that  an  inspector,  on  average,  must  give  60  to  90  days  no-
tice  prior  to  their  arrival  at  the  repair  station.  In  addition,  inspectors  must  often 
travel in pairs when visiting specific countries that may be considered unsafe. When 
the  inspector  is  finally  able  to  get  to  the  foreign  repair  station,  the  repair  station 
is fully aware of the visit and the element of surprise is nonexistent, rendering the 
inspection a simple formality. 

Once the inspector has traveled to the repair station, inspecting the repair station 
or  the  work  performed  there  introduces  additional  difficulties,  including  cultural 
and language issues, trouble accessing equipment, and inability to examine all proc-
esses and services used. In many cases, employees working at foreign repair stations 
cannot  read  or  speak  English;  yet,  the  air  carrier  and  repair  station  maintenance 
instructions are usually written in English. Inspectors traveling to foreign locations 
reveal that training is also a major problem overseas and that they often see main-
tenance employees working on aircraft without the proper training. For instance, in-
spectors  report  that  personnel  at  foreign  repair  stations  do  not  understand  that  an 
item with an expired shelf life cannot be used even if it still appears in good condi-
tion. 

There  is  also  serious  concern  over  the  regulations  governing  foreign  repair  sta-
tions. For example, as opposed to domestic airline or repair station employees, work-
ers at foreign repair stations are not required to pass drug and alcohol tests. In ad-
dition, criminal background checks are not required at foreign repair stations. There 
also continues to be major concerns regarding security at these facilities, with many 
of  the  repair  stations  lacking  any  security  standards.  It  should  go  without  saying 
that if a foreign repair station wants to work on U.S.-registered aircraft or any air-
craft  that  operate  in  this  country,  those  repair  stations  should  be  required  to  meet 
the same safety standards as domestic repair stations. 
Increasing Use of Bilateral Aviation Safety Agreements (BASAs) 

Instead of addressing the inspector staffing and funding issues, the FAA continues 
to  expand  the  use  of  bilateral  agreements  with  foreign  countries  to  oversee  repair 
stations working on U.S. carriers. The Bilateral Aviation Safety Agreement (BASA) 
with  Maintenance  Implementation  Procedures  allows  foreign  authorities  to  provide 
oversight  of  the  work  performed  at  repair  facilities  with  limited  involvement  from 
FAA  inspectors.  This  eliminates  the  need  for  the  inspector  to  travel  to  the  repair 
station at all and entrusts responsibility entirely to a foreign entity. However, there 
are inherent problems associated with allowing non-FAA employees in foreign loca-
tions  to  perform  work  on  behalf  of  the  FAA,  primarily  the  fact  that  the  FAA  does 
not  have  adequate  oversight  procedures  in  place  to  ensure  the  quality  of  these  in-
spections. PASS’s concerns regarding the FAA’s use of bilateral agreements include 
the following: 

5 Department of Transportation Inspector General, Safety Oversight of an Air Carrier Industry 

in Transition, AV–2005–062 (Washington, D.C.: June 3, 2005), p. 3. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

• According  to  the  Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General  (IG),  foreign 
inspectors  do  not  provide  the  FAA  with  sufficient  information  on  what  was  in-
spected,  the  problems  discovered  and  how  these  problems  were  addressed.  The 
IG goes so far as to state that at least one foreign authority representative said 
that  ‘‘they  did  not  feel  it  was  necessary  to  review  FAA-specific  requirements 
when conducting repair inspections.’’ 6 
• The  information  provided  to  the  FAA  by  foreign  inspectors  is  often  incomplete, 
inaccurate  or  difficult  to  understand  due  to  language  constraints.  In  fact,  the 
inspection  documents  given  to  the  FAA  were  found  to  be  incomplete  or  incom-
prehensible in 14 out of 16 files reviewed by the IG (88 percent).7 Although the 
reports  are  supposed  to  be  filed  in  English,  this  is  often  not  the  case.  Further-
more, the FAA does not even require that these foreign aviation authorities pro-
vide the appropriate amount of information in order to allow FAA inspectors to 
verify that the work is being done. 
• As  part  of  the  bilateral  agreements,  FAA  inspectors  can  perform  annual  ‘‘sam-
ple’’  inspections  of  up  to  10  percent  of  facilities  already  reviewed  by  foreign  in-
spectors.  This  system  of  ‘‘spot  checking’’  only  highlights  the  serious  deficiencies 
with the bilateral agreement process. In one case cited by the IG, when the FAA 
performed  a  sample  inspection  of  a  repair  station  that  had  already  been  in-
spected  by  a  foreign  inspector,  the  FAA  inspectors  found  45  problems,  several 
of  which  were  directly  related  to  FAA  requirements.8 Foreign  aviation  authori-
ties  rely  on  European  requirements  rather  than  adhering  to  U.S.  safety  stand-
ards.  Currently,  other  than  these  ineffective  sample  inspections,  the  FAA  pri-
marily  conducts  surveillance  of  foreign  aviation  authorities  through  desk  re-
views  of  inspection  documents,  the  quality  of  which  has  already  been  high-
lighted  as  a  major  issue.  In  other  words,  the  FAA  has  no  true  way  to  ensure 
that the inspections at these foreign repair stations are being conducted accord-
ing  to  U.S.  regulations.  In  addition,  inspectors  report  that  the  foreign  aviation 
authorities are not always reporting to the FAA deficiencies found during their 
inspections, which leaves FAA inspectors with the impression that there are no 
problems. 
• In  order  to  visit  a  country  holding  a  BASA,  the  inspector  must  provide  data  to 
prove that a trip is necessary. However, the foreign civil aviation authorities are 
often  not  providing  accurate  data  to  the  agency,  making  it  impossible  for  the 
inspector  to  show  that  a  trip  is  warranted.  In  one  case,  there  was  no  informa-
tion  in  the  database  on  problems  with  a  repair  station  in  Frankfurt,  but  when 
an  inspector  was  finally  able  to  get  to  the  facility,  he  noticed  several  serious 
violations that had not been put into the system. If these countries are not pro-
viding  the  United  States  with  data,  it  is  impossible  to  ensure  the  safety  of  the 
facility or the work being performed there. 

In  2003,  the  IG  issued  recommendations  to  enhance  FAA  oversight  of  foreign  re-
pair  stations.  Regarding  the  many  problems  with  bilateral  agreements,  the  IG  rec-
ommended  that  the  FAA  modify  inspection  documentation  requirements  with  for-
eign  aviation  authorities  and  develop  procedures  to  ensure  that  foreign  inspectors 
place  appropriate  emphasis  on  FAA  requirements  when  conducting  reviews  on  the 
FAA’s  behalf.  The  IG  also  advised  that  the  FAA  revise  procedures  for  conducting 
sample  inspections  of  repair  stations  to  allow  the  FAA  to  conduct  the  necessary 
number of inspections to ensure the work is being completed properly. In recent tes-
timony  before  the  House  Aviation  Subcommittee,  the  IG  stated  that  while  the  FAA 
has  worked  to  improve  the  surveillance  foreign  authorities  are  performing  on  the 
FAA’s  behalf  since  the  2003  report,  the  IG  remains  nonetheless  concerned  that 
‘‘FAA  is  still  not  regularly  visiting  the  facilities  in  the  countries  where  agreements 
exist  with  other  aviation  authorities.’’ 9 The  IG  cited  an  example  in  which  FAA  in-
spectors  for  one  air  carrier  had  not  visited  a  major  foreign  engine  repair  facility 
even though the repair station had performed maintenance on 39 (74 percent) of the 
53  engines  repaired  for  the  air  carrier.  Furthermore,  FAA  IFO  inspectors  had  not 
conducted any spot inspections of this facility in 5 years.10 

Without  a  doubt,  the  FAA  must  take  steps  to  ensure  that  inspections  conducted 
by foreign authorities are done in line with the safety standards and regulations of 

6 Department of Transportation Inspector General, Review of Air Carriers’ Use of Aircraft Re-

pair Stations, AV–2003–047 (Washington, D.C.: July 8, 2003), p. v. 

7 Id. 
8 Id. 
9 Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General,  Aviation  Safety:  FAA’s  Oversight  of 

Outsourced Maintenance Facilities, CC–2007–035 (Washington, D.C.: March 29, 2007), p. 9. 

10 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

this  country.  Until  this  issue  is  adequately  addressed,  along  with  the  IG  rec-
ommendations,  additional  agreements  with  foreign  aviation  authorities  should  not 
be allowed. 
Use of Non-Certificated Repair Facilities 

‘‘Non-certificated’’  means  that  the  repair  facility  does  not  possess  a  certificate 
issued  by  the  FAA  to  operate  under  the  Code  of  Federal  Regulations  Part  145  and 
is  therefore  not  subject  to  direct  FAA  oversight.  A  certificated  repair  station  meets 
the  standards  as  outlined  in  the  Federal  Aviation  Regulation  and  is  therefore  sub-
ject  to  direct  FAA  oversight  to  ensure  that  it  continues  to  meet  those  same  stand-
ards. The differences in regulatory requirements and standards at the two facilities 
are extremely troubling. For example, in an FAA-certificated repair station, it is re-
quired that there be designated supervisors and inspectors and a training program. 
These items are not required at non-certificated repair facilities.11 

Effective  oversight  of  non-certificated  repair  facilities  gained  attention  in  the 
aftermath  of  the  January  2003  Air  Midwest  crash  in  Charlotte,  N.C.  The  National 
Transportation  Safety  Board  determined  that  incorrect  rigging  of  the  elevator  sys-
tem  by  a  contractor  contributed  to  the  accident  and  pointed  to  ‘‘lack  of  oversight’’ 
by Air Midwest and the FAA.12 The airline contracted out the work to an FAA-cer-
tificated  repair  station,  which  then  subcontracted  to  a  non-certificated  repair  facil-
ity.  Under  Federal  regulations,  the  airline  is  ultimately  responsible  for  ensuring 
that  the  work  performed  at  a  non-certificated  repair  facility  is  done  in  accordance 
with standards and requirements. 

A December 2005 IG report called attention to airlines’ increasing use of non-cer-
tificated repair facilities to perform maintenance work, directing the FAA to improve 
its oversight of air carriers’ use of these facilities. According to the IG, the FAA does 
not  know  how  many  non-certificated  maintenance  facilities  air  carriers  currently 
use,  but  the  IG  identified  ‘‘as  many  as  1,400  domestic  and  foreign  facilities  that 
could perform the same work (e.g., repairing flight control systems and engine parts) 
a  certificated  facility  performs  but  are  not  inspected  like  certificated  facilities.  Of 
those  1,400  facilities,  we  identified  104  foreign  non-certificated  facilities—FAA  had 
never inspected any of them.’’ 13 

The  IG  discovered  that  there  are  no  limitations  to  the  amount  of  maintenance 
work  non-certificated  facilities  can  provide,  and  that  these  facilities  are  performing 
far  more  work  than  minor  services,  including  much  of  the  same  type  of  work  FAA- 
certificated  repair  stations  perform,  such  as  repairing  parts  used  to  measure  air-
speed, removing and replacing jet engines, and replacing flight control motors. Some 
of  these  non-certificated  facilities  are  even  performing  critical  preventative  mainte-
nance. The IG identified 21 domestic and foreign non-certificated facilities that per-
formed  maintenance  critical  to  the  airworthiness  of  the  aircraft.  Even  more  alarm-
ing  is  that  the  FAA  was  unaware  of  the  critical  work  being  performed  at  these  fa-
cilities. 14 

Despite the fact that these facilities are performing safety-critical work, FAA over-
sight is practically nonexistent. In other words, these facilities are performing work 
pivotal  to  aviation  safety  with  no  guarantee  that  it  is  being  done  in  line  with  FAA 
and air carrier standards. One inspector revealed that he learned of a repair station 
contracting  out  work  to  an  automobile  facility.  Without  having  the  ability  to  visit 
the  facility,  there  was  no  way  for  this  inspector  to  ensure  that  the  work  was  being 
done according to regulations. 

Furthermore, inspectors are discovering numerous incidents involving outsourcing 
of maintenance for critical functions or ‘‘specialized services,’’ an independent rating 
the FAA grants to some certificated repair stations for specialized and safety-critical 
functions,  such  as  non-destructive  testing,  specialized  testing  of  some  components, 
plating,  machining  and  welding.  Specialized  services,  like  other  maintenance,  can 
and is being contracted out to non-certificated repair facilities. Although recent reg-
ulatory changes state that certificated repair stations cannot contract out a special-
ized  service  unless  they  were  issued  that  rating  and  are  required  to  approve  that 
work  for  return  to  service,  inspectors  have  consistently  found  that  it  is  almost  im-
possible  to  determine  whether  that  work  was  done  correctly,  completely  and  in  ac-
cordance  with  technical  data  and  regulations.  Inspectors  do  not  have  the  time  or 

11 Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General,  Air  Carriers’  Use  of  Non-Certificated  Re-

pair Facilities, AV–2006–031 (Washington, D.C.: December 15, 2005), p. 4. 

12 National  Transportation  Safety  Board,  Loss  of  Pitch  Control  During  Takeoff,  Air  Midwest 
Flight 5481, Raytheon (Beechcraft) 2000D, N233YV, Charlotte, North Carolina, January 8, 2003, 
Aircraft Accident Report NTSB/AAR–04/01 (Washington, D.C.: 2004), p. x. 

13 Department  of  Transportation  Inspector  General,  Air  Carriers’  Use  of  Non-Certificated  Re-

pair Facilities, AV–2006–031 (Washington, D.C.: December 15, 2005), p. 6. 

14 Id., pp. 1–2. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

budget  capability  to  adequately  perform  surveillance  on  certificated  repair  stations, 
let alone evaluate and monitor subcontracting to non-certificated facilities. 

It is obvious that there must be modifications made regarding air carriers’ use of 
non-certificated repair facilities. PASS believes that the most effective way to correct 
the  disparity  between  certificated  and  non-certificated  repair  facilities  is  for  Con-
gress  to  require  that  air  carriers  outsource  maintenance  work  only  to  certificated 
repair stations, a standard that should apply to both domestic and international fa-
cilities.  This  is  a  feasible  option  that  will  ensure  consistency  and  improved  safety 
within the aviation industry. 
Conclusion 

It is clear that oversight of foreign repair stations needs serious attention and im-
provement.  With  the  FAA  anticipating  an  estimated  1  billion  passengers  per  year 
by  2015,  more  inspectors  are  obviously  needed  in  order  to  keep  up  with  the  rapid 
growth in the aviation industry. Since the FAA claims that it will be impossible for 
the inspector workforce to increase at the same rate the aviation industry is chang-
ing  and  expanding,  it  is  moving  toward  a  system-safety  approach  in  which  data, 
which  has  often  been  found  to  be  incomplete  or  limited,  will  be  the  primary  tool  to 
determine  risk.  PASS  believes  that  it  is  dangerous  to  rely  heavily  on  a  risk-based 
approach  when  it  is  obvious  that  our  talented  and  skilled  inspector  workforce  has 
kept  the  U.S.  aviation  system  the  safest  in  the  world.  In  order  to  ensure  continued 
safety  within  the  aviation  industry,  there  must  be  an  adequate  number  of  experi-
enced and trained FAA inspectors in place with budgetary and management support 
to accomplish the agency’s mission of safety oversight. 

PASS and the inspector workforce we represent remain solely focused on ensuring 
the  safety  of  this  country’s  aviation  system.  We  hope  that  Congress  will  seriously 
examine the conditions surrounding the oversight of foreign repair stations and rec-
ognize that major changes need to be made in order to protect this country’s reputa-
tion as having the safest aviation system in the world. 

Senator LOTT. Madame Chair? 
Senator MCCASKILL. Yes, Senator Lott. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TRENT LOTT, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator  LOTT.  Thank  you,  Madame  Chair  and  Chairman  Rocke-

feller, for having the hearing. 

Let me just say to the panel, I think this was a good panel, and 
you  did  a  really  good  job.  Most  of  the  questions  that  would  be 
asked,  I  think,  you’ve  commented  on  them,  and  answered  them 
well. 

But maybe I can just crystallize some of them, rather than giving 
a  statement  by  asking  just  two  or  three  questions,  if  you  would 
make your answers short, I think that should take care of it. 

First,  what  we’re  really  worried  about  here  and  want  to  make 
sure  of  is  safety  and  security,  OK?  I  think  airlines  should  have  a 
right to have contract maintenance, but we need to make sure that 
it’s  done  in  an  appropriate  way.  You  know,  I  learned  a  long  time 
ago  when  I  get  on  planes,  if  the  pilot  doesn’t  want  to  fly,  I  don’t 
want  to  fly.  If  the  pilots  want  to  fly,  I  usually  feel  pretty  safe,  be-
cause  he’s  putting  his  life  on  the  line,  too.  So,  I  think  everybody 
wants  this,  the  work  done  properly,  we  want  safety,  and  we  also 
now want security. 

Now,  Mr.  Scovel,  has  your  office  uncovered  any  evidence  that 
maintenance  work  performed  by  foreign  repair  stations  is  consist-
ently less safe than work performed at domestic repair stations? 

Mr. SCOVEL. Thank you, Senator Lott. 
Our studies from 2003 and 2005 show us that the location where 
maintenance  is  performed  is  far  less  important  than  the  oversight 
exercised by FAA to guarantee safety. In other words, we have not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

found  that  repairs  performed  by  overseas  facilities  are  inherently 
less accurate or less complete than repairs performed by—— 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  do  you  believe  that  FAA  has  generally  been 
responsive  in  correcting  problems  with  foreign  repair  station  over-
sight that’s been identified by your office? 

Mr.  SCOVEL.  Generally,  yes.  It  has  been  very  slow.  We  have 
found that the vehicles that FAA has devised to measure the main-
tenance  performed  by  repair  facilities,  both  in  the  U.S.  and  over-
seas,  have  been  less  than  fully  effective  to  give  the  agency  the  in-
formation it needs to make its safety oversight systems truly effec-
tive. 

Senator  LOTT.  Ms.  Gilligan,  do  you  believe  that  restricting  the 
ability  of  U.S.  carriers  from  using  foreign  repair  stations  will  im-
prove safety? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. Consistent with what the IG has just said, sir, our 
findings are the same—the work done at certificated repair stations 
meets all of the standards that we require. 

Senator  LOTT.  And,  Mr.  Filler,  you  feel  that  your  membership 
and  the  overall  way  that  this  is  being  handled,  both  the  questions 
of safety and security are being adequately addressed? 

Mr. FILLER. Yes, Senator, we do. 
Senator LOTT. I think we’ve got to always be diligent. I think the 
FAA  has  got  to  continue  to  pursue  their  responsibilities.  Yes,  they 
probably  are  slow,  I  haven’t  found  anything  in  the  government 
that’s  not,  but  that’s  no  excuse,  because  we’re  dealing  with  life  or 
death and people’s jobs here. And, I think it’s also incumbent upon 
us to ask legitimate questions about the impact that this can have 
on  the  industry  as  a  whole,  and  I’m  always  trying  to  look  at  it— 
not just from, you know, a regulator standpoint, or owners or man-
agers, but also, you know, the workers, too. 

So,  I  think  they’ve  done  a  good  job,  and  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity  to  hear  you,  and  thank  you  for  allowing  me  to  get  out  of 
order a little bit, there, Madame Chair. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Senator Lott. 
I  would  normally  defer  to  the  Chairman  of  the  Committee  for 
questions,  first,  but  he  has  sent  me  a  note  and  asked  me  to  go 
ahead, so I want to focus in, first, Mr. Scovel, on the difference be-
tween  certified  and  non-certified  foreign  repair  stations.  And  I 
think that’s a really important distinction for us to talk about. 

It is my understanding from your testimony and reading some of 
the background material in this area that the major carriers in the 
United  States  are  utilizing  non-certified,  overseas  repair  facilities 
for all kinds of work. I mean, not just kicking the tires and check-
ing the oil—but all kinds of work, is that correct? 

Mr. SCOVEL. That’s correct, Senator. 
Senator MCCASKILL. OK, and so I was—as I direct my questions 
on this round of questioning, I am addressing now the non-certified 
repair  stations.  I  don’t  want  to  talk  about  the  certified  repair  sta-
tions,  because  that’s  a  whole—that’s  apples  and  oranges.  But  we 
now  have  established  that  all  of  these  carriers  are  using  non-cer-
tified  repair  stations  for  major  work—not  just  line  maintenance— 
but major work. 

Ms.  Gilligan,  how  many  of  those  non-certified  foreign  repair  sta-

tions are there? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  As  you  know,  Senator,  we  don’t  keep  a  count  of 
facilities  that  people  may  use  that  don’t  hold  FAA  certificates.  In-
stead,  we  work  through  the  airlines  to  determine  that  the  airline 
has  put  in  place  the  proper  procedures,  that  they’re  providing  the 
proper  training  and  equipment  and  facilities  to  any  facility  that 
doesn’t hold an FAA certificate. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  So,  so  there  is  no  inspection  of  those  facili-

ties by FAA? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. There is—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. Correct? 
Ms.  GILLIGAN.  We  have  access  to  some,  to  third-party  providers, 
but we don’t have a scheduled plan for reviewing some of those op-
erators—or some of those facilities. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Any of those facilities, correct, Ms. Gilligan? 
You  all  do  not  certify,  you  do  not  inspect  an  unknown  number  of 
repair  facilities  that  are  providing  major  work  on  major  domestic 
airline carriers, isn’t that true? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  It’s  correct,  Senator,  but  that’s  because  we  are 
overseeing the carrier. And the carrier now has the responsibility— 
the  carrier  can  pick  a  few  different  models.  They  can  do  the  work 
internally. They can use a certificated repair station, and train that 
repair station personnel and provide the instructions to that repair 
station  personnel,  or  they  can  hire  certificated  mechanics,  for  ex-
ample,  who  hold  an  FAA  certificate  and  provide  that  mechanic  all 
of the materials and training and equipment that they need to per-
form  the  function.  They  can  use  any  of  those  three  models,  and  in 
the  third,  that  last  model,  the  individual  holds  an  FAA  certificate, 
but  the  company  through  which  they  may  work,  may  not  hold  an 
FAA certificate. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  do  you  know  how  many  of  those  cer-
tified  mechanics  are  working—how  many  there  are  right  now  that 
are  working  at  non-certified  facilities?  Do  you  even—does  FAA 
keep track of that? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. No, ma’am. Well, no, we do keep track of everyone 
who  holds  a  mechanics  certificate,  we  issue  those  certificates.  And 
so, then they have the authority to approve certain work, whatever 
it is they’re qualified to do, and they do that under the air carriers 
program, which we do oversee through our inspectors. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  But  you  don’t  match  up—the  certified  me-

chanics to the locations of the uncertified repair centers? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. That’s right. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  You  can’t,  there’s  no—there’s  no  place  we 
can  go  and  check  to  see  how  many  certified  mechanics  there  may 
be in any of these uncertified repair centers? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. That’s correct. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  so,  if,  in  fact,  the  certification  process 
that  we  have  to  do  here  in  the  United  States—if,  in  fact,  we  have 
a  certification  process  here,  do  you  think  the  certification  process 
is important to safety? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Yes,  ma’am,  but  airlines  also  use  non-certificated 

facilities using certificated mechanics, here in the U.S., as well. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Are  they  required  to  do  any  of  the  back-
ground  checks,  or  any  of  the  security  checks  that  the  certified  fa-
cilities are? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  The  airline  is  required  to  do  those  checks  for  its 
own  employees,  but  not  for  mechanics  that  they  hire  on  contract. 
Senator MCCASKILL. OK, well, then my question is, if we are cer-
tifying  some  facilities,  but  it’s  OK  for  the  airlines  to  use  any  facil-
ity, regardless of whether it’s certified, why are we certifying facili-
ties? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. Again, it’s one of several options. When the carrier 
uses  a  facility  that  does  not  hold  an  FAA  certificate,  the  carrier 
itself  must  be  in  place  to  provide  quality  control,  to  provide  train-
ing,  to  provide  all  of  the  tools  and  equipment—everything  that’s 
needed  for  the  work.  And  they  hire,  generally,  then,  a  certificated 
mechanic, and they provide that infrastructure. 

When  they  use  a  certificated  repair  station,  while  they  do  have 
to  provide  their  training  program,  and  their  maintenance  program 
to  that  repair  station,  they  can  take  advantage  of  all  of  the  facili-
ties  and  equipment  and  everything  else  that  the  repair  station  al-
ready  has  under  its  approved  certificate.  So,  it’s  just  a  matter  of 
how  it  is  that  the  carrier  is  going  to  make  sure  it  is  meeting  the 
responsibility to have the work done in accordance with its mainte-
nance program. 

Senator MCCASKILL. OK, so in the instances where it’s a non-cer-
tified repair station, this is more a situation where you are trusting 
that the airlines are going to perform at a level—at the same level 
that you require of the certified repair stations? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  No,  we  see  that  the  air  carrier  meets  its  stand-

ards. So, the repair station or the air carrier must meet—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Well, how—? 
Ms. GILLIGAN. I’m sorry, ma’am, if I’m confusing—— 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  I’m  confused  as,  how  do  you  know  if  you 
never go there, and you never look at them? How do you know that 
they are up to those standards, if you don’t inspect them? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. Because the airlines are continually analyzing the 
aircrafts  themselves,  and  they  are  sharing  that  data  with  our  in-
spectors. By regulation, we require that the carrier maintain a con-
tinuing  analysis  program,  where  they  analyze  every  day  how  their 
aircraft  are  operating,  and  then  they  must  address  any  discrep-
ancies  and  our  inspectors  regularly  are  a  part  of  that  review  proc-
ess.  So,  we  check  the  level  of  safety  of  the  aircraft  at  the  air  car-
rier.  And,  because  of  the  multple  layers  within  the  design  and  the 
manufacture  and  the  maintenance  of  the  aircraft,  that  provides  us 
the opportunity to find discrepancies before they cause any kind of 
serious result. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  my  time’s  up,  and  I  want  to  make 
sure  the  other  Senators  have  a  chance  for  a  round  of  questioning. 
I’ll revisit this on the next round. 

Mr. FILLER. Senator, would you mind if make one clarifying com-
ment  about,  about  security?  Because  one  of  your  questions  was,  if 
a  carrier  contracts  with  an  individual  mechanic  to  do  line  mainte-
nance at an airport. 

I didn’t want you to be left with the impression that that person 
is  not  given  a  background  check.  If  that  mechanic  has  unescorted 
access  privileges  to  the  ramp  of  an  airport,  then  he  will  have  to 
have  a  background  check  and  he  will  have  to  be  appropriately 
badged and that will be done under the authority of the individual 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

airport operator. So it doesn’t matter, in that situation, whether or 
not  it’s  contracted  or  it’s  an  air  carrier  employee.  The  focus  is  on, 
what kind of access does that individual need to the designated se-
curity areas of the airport. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  appreciate  that,  Mr.  Filler,  but  the  ques-
tion  is,  who  is  providing  the  oversight  and  accountability  that 
that’s  occurring?  Is  it  FAA  or  are  we  leaving  it  to  someone  else? 

Thank you. 
I believe, Senator Rockefeller, you’re next. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Madame Chair. 
The,  I  agree  very  much  with  the  Chair’s  line  of  questioning  and 
I have these comments. If there are—and I think there’s some vari-
ance in the FAA in this—of the 3,865 FAA inspectors who monitor 
more than 5,000—this is, Peggy to you, Ms. Gilligan, to you—— 

Ms. GILLIGAN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.—5,000  repair  stations  used  or  owned  by 
U.S.  carriers  worldwide,  then  we  further  know  that  51  percent  of 
those  FAA  inspectors  are  eligible  to  retire  in  2007.  If  you  look  at 
U.S.  Government  retirement,  some  stay  on,  but  most  don’t.  It’s  a 
stressful  life.  And,  so  that  immediately,  in  essence,  cuts  the  3,865 
into  half.  So,  my  question  is,  how  many  inspectors  will  the  FAA 
hire in 2007? You have no budget, so I want you to answer around 
that.  And  how  many  inspectors  does  the  FAA  expect  to  lose  this 
year? And, we’ll start with that. 

Ms. GILLIGAN. OK. Thank you, Senator. 
First,  if  I  could  comment  on  the  retirement.  While  it  is  true,  a 
number  of  our  inspectors  are  eligible  for  retirement,  we  do  have  a 
higher age bracket workforce. It’s because most of the, not most of 
them, all of them come to us after years of experience in the indus-
try.  So,  they  actually,  oftentimes,  come  to  us  as  a  second  career. 
And so, while they are relatively soon eligible for retirement, very, 
very  few  of  them  retire  when  they’re  first  eligible.  Our  retirement 
rate  has  been  consistent  at  between  five  and  6  percent  a  year  for 
a number of years, the past 10 years. And we do a yearly employee 
attitude survey, where we ask about retirement plans. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. If I could interrupt for a second—— 
Ms. GILLIGAN. Sure. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.—I’d  like  to  comment  on  that.  I  think 
there’s a difference between jobs in general and jobs which involve 
saying, ‘‘No,’’ or, ‘‘Do this differently.’’ There is an energy level and, 
you  know,  there’s  simply  a  ferocity,  a  focus  level,  which  changes. 
And  I  tell  you  this,  say  this  by  having  carefully  watched  the  FAA 
doing  certification  processes.  It  takes  a  younger,  more  ambitious, 
ferocious  type  of  person  to  make  sure  that  each  and  every  one  of 
the 13,000 parts that goes into a particular airplane is in my mind, 
to  make  sure  that  they’re  exactly  right.  Because  they  all  have  to 
be  exactly  right.  Now,  you  could  go  into,  you  can  go  into  an 
outsource  repair  station  in  some  other  country  and  have  the  same 
rules,  and  ‘‘I’ll  get  my  next  round  of  drinking,’’  and  unnoticed, 
unnotified inspections and the rest of it. 

But,  I  really,  I  really  would—and  I’d  like  the  Inspector  General 
to comment on this too—there’s a difference in inspection, which is 
a  highly  technical,  it’s  sort  of  like  doing  algorithms,  I  mean,  it’s  a 
fugue, it’s a work of love and precision. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

And, it’s also a matter of life and death. And I’d like to have each 
of you comment on the age factor with those retiring, as your state-
ment that, well, we’ve got people who are old who have more expe-
rience, as opposed to what I said. 

Ms. GILLIGAN. Certainly, sir. First of all, our data shows that, in 
our  attitude  survey  we  asked  employees  what  you’re  retirement 
plans  are  and  about  5  percent  reported  that  they  plan  to  retire 
within a year. So, we think that’s consistent. And, you’re absolutely 
right.  These  inspectors  bring  to  this  job  a  love  of  aviation  safety 
that they’ve nurtured through their whole career and most of them 
come to FAA as, sort of, the pinnacle of what they’d hope to accom-
plish  in  the  course  of  their  careers.  And,  I  believe  that  their  age 
and experience is a valued asset that they bring to us. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Without,  interrupt  again,  but  I  want  to 

get it to the IG before my time runs out. 

Ms. GILLIGAN. I’m sorry. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I voted for having pilots go from 60 to 65 
years  old.  I  think  that  is  a  world  apart  decision  about  age  than, 
about  not—you  know,  in  a  crisis  these  things  become  very  impor-
tant,  but  a  lot  of  those  are  senior  folks  who  are  doing  overseas 
flights,  where  it’s  avionics  are  automatic  and  all  the  rest  of  it.  In-
specting  parts,  inspecting  brakes,  getting  down  on  the  ground  in  a 
hot Sierra Leone sun and looking for precisely that particular piece 
which  could  cause  problems  is  a  very  different  matter.  Could  you 
briefly comment on that? 

And, Mr. Scovel, could you briefly comment on that? 
Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Certainly.  As  I  know  you’re  well  aware,  our  in-
spectors are not at the turning of every wrench and the inspection 
of  every  brake.  They  are  there  to  oversee  that  the  systems  are 
being followed, that the people are trained, that the mechanics are, 
in  fact,  performing  the  function  that  they’re  supposed  to  perform. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Now, this is not the data analysis, this is 

the—— 

Ms. GILLIGAN. I’m sorry. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER.—this is the oversight analysis. 
Ms. GILLIGAN. Yes, yes. Right. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. You referred to the data analysis. 
Ms. GILLIGAN. The data analysis. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Data, I’m sorry. 
Ms.  GILLIGAN.  No,  I’m  misunderstanding  your  question,  sir.  I 

apologize. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well, I’ll wait until my next round. 
Ms. GILLIGAN. I’m so sorry. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Senator Dorgan? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  Senator  McCaskill,  thank  you  very  much.  I 
confess  I  don’t  know  as  much  about  this  issue  as  I  would  like  and 
I apologize for being delayed at this hearing. 

I  want  to  ask  a  question,  especially  about  overseas  repair  sta-
tions.  I  had  written  a  piece  about  this  a  year  and  a  half,  2  years 
ago about an American carrier, was according to some news reports 
flying  empty  320  aircraft,  Airbus  320s  empty  to  El  Salvador  to  do 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

their  maintenance  and  then  flying  them  back  empty,  as  well.  And 
I became curious about that and wondered what’s the circumstance 
that  would  persuade  someone  to  do  that.  And,  of  course,  it  is  cost. 
And I became further curious to find out what are the standards 
with respect to a repair station in El Salvador versus a repair sta-
tion in this country. And, as I began to look at it, I discovered that 
at that point nearly half of the maintenance was outsourced, some 
of  it  out  of  the  country.  And,  I  mentioned,  I  guess  I’ll  mention  to 
carrier  because  it  was  in  the  news  at  the  time,  it  was  JetBlue.  It 
was flying empty Airbus 320s to El Salvador for maintenance. 

And so, I was wondering about the standards that exist at those 
stations  and  my  understanding  from  that,  I  would  ask  the  FAA 
whether it is the case, is that the folks at those repair stations are 
not required to have the same certification. Let me just read to you 
what  I  had  learned  at  that  point.  Airplane  mechanics  in  El  Sal-
vador  are  paid  from  $300  to  $1,000  a  month.  About  one-third  of 
them  have  passed  the  FAA  certification  for  airplanes  mechanics 
that  all  U.S.  mechanics  are  required  to  pass.  Is  that,  is  that  the 
case or was it the case? Is it now the case? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. Sir, we’re very familiar with the facility in El Sal-
vador. About, something less than 200 of the employees there hold 
FAA  certificates.  The  remainder  of  the  employees  hold  the  certifi-
cate issued by the El Salvadorian Government. As Mr. Filler men-
tioned  earlier,  all  countries  that  are  members  of  the  International 
Civil Aviation Organization do meet a common set of standards be-
fore  they  can  issue  certificates  to,  whether  it’s  mechanics  or  pilots 
or anyone who operates in the system. So, all of the employees hold 
certifications  and  almost  200  of  them  hold  FAA-issued  certificates, 
which they are allowed to hold. 

Senator DORGAN. And, is it the case that, as Mr. Roach testified, 
that  when  inspectors  are  permitted  to  make  an  inspection  of  an 
overseas repair station, they must give advance notice? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Generally,  sir,  we  give  advance  notice  even  to  do-
mestic stations. These are, first of all, these are large complex orga-
nizations  and  it’s  not  really  very  easy  to  hide  something  in  at  mo-
ment’s notice. 

We want to make sure when we send inspectors, whether it’s do-
mestically  or  internationally,  that  the  people  who  they  need  to 
meet  are  there,  that  the  records  are  available,  that,  in  fact,  our 
time  is  well  spent  on  inspection  and  not  on  waiting  and  trying  to 
bring all the details and the facts together. So it’s common practice 
for us to give notice, even to domestic repair stations, as well. Yes, 
we do notify the foreign repair stations when we are coming, again, 
so  that  we  have  the  right  information  available  for  the  inspectors 
to be, to be able to accomplish the inspection. 

Senator DORGAN. I don’t want to suggest with my questions that 
there’s  diminished  safety.  I  don’t  know  the  answer  to  this,  but  it 
seems  to  me  strange.  First  of  all,  that  we’ve  rushed  now  to  well 
over  60  percent  of  the  maintenance  for  the  airlines  being  con-
tracted  out,  some  of  it  offshore.  It  seems  strange  to  me  that  a  do-
mestic  airline  would  fly  an  empty  jet  to  El  Salvador  for  mainte-
nance.  It  seems  strange  to  me  that  the  FAA,  which  would  be  re-
quired to evaluate the capabilities of that repair station would give 
them  advance  notice  of  when  one  is  about  to  inspect.  It  seems  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

me  with  almost  every  circumstance  of  oversight,  giving  someone 
advanced  notice  that  you’re  coming  gives  you  a  very  different  im-
pression when you come. 

I’ve  just  been  involved  in  this  issue  of  China  and,  labor  stand-
ards  in  China  and  the  advanced  notice  given  to  Chinese  manufac-
turing  plants  of  when  inspectors  would  show,  which  gives  a  very 
different  picture  of  the  plant  the  next  day  when  the  inspector 
shows. 

So, I’m very troubled and concerned about this rush to outsource, 
about  whether  there  is  accountability  for  outsourcing.  And,  it 
seems to me that there, that many of the airlines are now rushing 
to  subcontract  their  maintenance  to  others  and  that,  at  least  in 
some  cases  with  respect  to  foreign  repair  stations,  in  addition  to 
the  airline  subcontracting  their  repair,  you  are  subcontracting,  ef-
fectively, your oversight by going to the civil aviation authorities in 
those  countries  for  oversight.  I,  somehow,  it  doesn’t,  it  looks  to  me 
like these are pieces to a puzzle that don’t fit. If you want account-
ability  and  oversight  that  gives  you  a  strong  feeling  that  everyone 
is meeting the same standards. 

Ms. GILLIGAN. If I may comment on your reference to contracting 
out  the  oversight.  I  think  you’re  referring  to  those  cases  where  we 
have  a  bilateral  agreement  with,  and  we  have  three  of  those  in 
place  right  now  with  European  countries.  Before  we  enter  that 
agreement, we evaluate the ability of that government and their in-
spectors to do those inspections on our behalf and we reach the de-
termination that they have a level of confidence that we can accept. 
They  then  provide  their  inspection  results  to  us  and  we  make  the 
decision  whether  or  not  the  certificate  holder  can  hold  that  certifi-
cate, whether we need to go in and spot check. And as the IG com-
mented,  we  are  increasing  the  amount  of  spot  checking  that  we’re 
doing. 

As Mr. Filler testified earlier, we provide that same kind of over-
sight  to  over  1,200  repair  stations  in  the  U.S.  that  hold  European 
certification.  Our  inspectors  inspect  on  behalf  of  Europe,  1,200  re-
pair stations in the U.S. Our inspectors provide those results to the 
European  authorities  and  the  European  authorities  determine 
whether or not U.S. entities can continue to hold the certificate. So, 
we do, we do for the European authorities, the same kind of inspec-
tions  that  we  have  them  do  for  us,  but  ultimately,  the  decision  on 
whether  someone  or  a  company  keeps  a  certificate.  We  retain  that 
for  our  certificate  holders  and  the  Europeans  retain  that  for  their 
certificate holders. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But,  if  I  might  just  finish  two  additional  ques-

tions. 

Ms. Gilligan, there are, as I understand it, 103 international field 
inspectors  for  nearly  700  repair  stations  and  it  seems  to  me  to  be 
terribly understaffed. 

Second,  when  you  look  at  the  Department  of  Transportation  In-
spector  General  reports  of,  for  example,  December  2005.  They 
found that non-certificated facilities operate without the same regu-
latory requirements as certificated repair stations, operate with no 
limit on the type or scope of work they perform. 

I  mean,  I  think,  I  have  missed  the  comments  of  Senator  McCas-
kill.  I  think  I  caught  a  bit  of  the  flavor  of  her  questions.  I  think 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

there’s substantial evidence here that this rush to outsource main-
tenance  is  not  accompanied  by  the  same  kind  of  oversight  that 
ought to, that passengers ought to expect, that the Congress ought 
to insist upon, and that we had previously had when those repairs 
and maintenance were done by a carrier on the site. Just speaking, 
just  for  myself,  I  understand  why  someone  would  fly  an  empty 
plane  to  El  Salvador.  That’s  about  finding  cheap  labor,  I  assume, 
if any. Does anybody else agree with that? You fly an empty Airbus 
to El Salvador and set up cheap labor for maintenance. 

Mr.  BARIMO.  Yes,  I’d  probably  elaborate  that  there’s  more,  more 

involved in the decision than just the labor rate. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Yes,  the  cost  of  the  flight  down  and  back  with 

an empty plane. 

Mr. BARIMO. And more importantly, the turn time and the qual-
ity  of  the  aircraft  produced.  So,  if  the  air  carrier  can  trim  3  days 
off of a heavy check and get an airplane that is, in fact, more reli-
able than any of their competitor’s aircraft, then it probably makes 
sense  to  go  down  there  and  do  that.  There’s  more  that  goes  into 
the decision than just the labor rate. 

Senator  DORGAN.  All  right.  It’s  a  fair  point.  I  would  accept  that 
people  sitting  around  the  table  evaluating  where  we’re  going  to 
outsource or how are we going to outsource maintenance would not 
just  look  at  labor  rates.  It’s  a  fair  point  you  make.  I  think  that,  it 
seems  to  me,  likely,  that  labor  rates  are  a  compelling  part  of  that, 
especially  when  you  take  a  look  at  what  I  just  cited,  with  respect 
to the cost of maintenance in El Salvador. 

I’m just picking out that issue because I happened to see it a cou-
ple of years ago and I followed it up to find out what is this about. 
I’ve taken more time than I needed to. Mr. Roach wanted to make 
a comment, if you wish. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Go ahead, Mr. Roach. 
Mr.  ROACH.  Yes,  in  reference  to  flying  planes  down  to  El  Sal-
vador,  it  was  JetBlue,  but  the  type  of  aircraft  that  you  mentioned, 
if you recall. I don’t know where these planes have been, these par-
ticular  JetBlue  have  serviced,  those  are  the  planes  that  had  these 
emergency  landings,  with  the  nose  gear  that  would  not  operate 
properly. 

Senator DORGAN. That was, actually, that plane was not a plane 
that  was  maintained  in  El  Salvador.  I  did  check  on  that,  but  that 
particular airplane was not one that was flown to El Salvador. 

Mr. FILLER. Senator, if I could also. 
Mr. ROACH. I’m not finished yet. 
Mr. FILLER. I’m sorry. 
Mr. ROACH. In addition, these surprise inspections, it is true that 
there  are  inspections  in  the  United  States  that  they  forewarn  peo-
ple,  but  there  are  inspections  where  there  are  not  people  fore-
warned, they have surprise inspections in the United States, where 
outside  the  country  they  don’t  have  them.  So,  there’s  a  big  dif-
ference there. 

Senator DORGAN. Is that true, Ms. Gilligan? 
Ms.  GILLIGAN.  I  wouldn’t  call  them  surprise  inspections.  We  do 
have  people  that  are  co-located  more  closely  to  some  operators  in 
the United States and they are there more on the day-to-day basis. 
And  we  do  have  the  ability  and  the  authority  to  do  the  same  in  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

foreign  repair  station  if  we  have  the  need  to.  So,  we  do  have  the 
ability  to,  we  do  need  to  notify  the  State  Department.  When  U.S. 
citizens travel on official business into another country, they do no-
tify  the  embassy,  but  we  can  then  go  to  the  repair  station.  We  do 
find it more useful, generally, to provide notice of when we’re going 
to be there. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Go ahead, Mr. Filler. 
Mr. FILLER. Thank you, thank you, Madame Chair. 
I  would  like  to  also  add,  with  respect  to  the  advance  notice,  the 
procedures  that  repair  stations  and  any  certificated  company  has 
to  have,  Senator,  are  very  extensive.  I  mean,  manuals  and  forms 
and procedures that, even if, and I’ve done many audits myself and 
I’ve done it for many, many years in and out of the FAA, and I can 
tell  you  that  if  an  entity  has  2  weeks  notice,  3  weeks  notice  the 
FAA is coming, they’re not going to be able to change their culture. 
They’re  not  going  to  be  able  to,  all  of  a  sudden,  follow  their  repair 
station  quality  manual  if  they  weren’t  following  it  before.  It’s  just 
too  much  to  turn  around.  And,  I  think  that  overlay  of  oversight 
that  the  FAA  provides,  it  doesn’t  make  a  difference  from  a  safety 
perspective, whether you know the FAA is coming or not. 

And  then  finally,  with  respect  to  looking  at  individual  incidents 
or  accidents,  I  would  caution  the  Committee  in  using  any  specific 
accident  analysis  to  prove  the  general  rule.  All  accidents  are,  by 
nature, exceptions to the general rule. They’re not the general rule 
and I can mention, and I don’t think it advances the ball so I won’t, 
but I can mention for every incident anybody can cite that occurred 
in  a  repair  station,  a  contracted  repair  station,  I  can  cite  one  that 
occurred  inside  an  air  carrier  when  maintenance  people  employed 
by  the  airline  made  a  mistake  that  killed  people.  And,  that’s  the 
reality  of  our  business.  Safety  doesn’t,  no  one’s  got  a  monopoly  on 
safety, and nobody has a monopoly on complacency. 

Thank you. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  I,  let  me,  I’ve  got  a  number  of  questions 
here,  but  let  me  start  by  saying  I,  the  issue  is  not  who  is  respon-
sible  for  any  individual  accident,  the  issue  is,  is  oversight  and  ac-
countability  the  same,  regardless  of  where  an  airplane  is  main-
tained and worked on. That’s the issue. 

And, we have established that we have certified and non-certified 
foreign  repair  stations.  And,  I’m  trying  to  get  at  the  difference  be-
tween  the  two  and  the  difference  in  the  level  of  oversight  and  ac-
countability  for  the  non-certified  repair  stations,  which  we’ve  al-
ready  established  are  doing  all  the  same  kind  of  work  as  the  cer-
tified repair stations. My understanding, in the first round of ques-
tioning, that in the instances of the use of non-certified repair sta-
tions,  in  these  countries  all  over  the  world,  that  it  is  the  airlines 
that  have  the  responsibility  for  overseeing  that,  the  level  of  train-
ing,  background  checks,  and  security  that  are  going  on  at  those 
non-certified  foreign  repair  stations.  Is  that  correct,  Ms.  Gilligan? 
Ms. GILLIGAN. The airline is always responsible for the work that 
is  being  done  on  the  aircraft  and  the  airline  is  always  responsible 
for determining that the aircraft or the product should be returned 
to service. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  But  they  are  the  only  ones  responsible  at 

the non-certified facilities, isn’t that correct? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

Ms. GILLIGAN. But, then we’re providing oversight of the carrier. 
Senator MCCASKILL. OK. 
Ms.  GILLIGAN.  We  are,  in  fact,  examining  their  processes  and 
procedures  that  they  are  putting  in  place  to  meet  their  require-
ments. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Then  how  do  you  explain  the  fact  in  the 
2005 IG report, the IG found that there were six carriers that were 
looking,  that  were  supposed  to  be  overseeing  work  at  non-certified 
foreign repair stations and that they had done this by phone? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  We  take  those  findings  very  seriously.  It  is  be-
cause of those kinds of findings that we have put in place a number 
of corrective actions in response to the IG’s recommendations. I be-
lieve  that  they  made  those  findings,  but  we  do  know  and  the  data 
shows, because the accident rate says that, in fact, we are following 
the  standards.  We  and  the  airlines  are  following  the  safety  stand-
ards. But please, make no mistake about it, those kinds of findings 
are  very  troubling  to  us  and  they  are  the  reasons  why  we  take 
steps to enhance our own oversight systems, as well. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  you  know,  it  comes  back  to  the  point 
I  tried  to  make  the  last  time,  is  that  if  certification  is  important 
and  if  we  believe  certification  helps  safety,  then  allowing  the  air-
lines  to  use  facilities  that  aren’t  certified  comes  with  a  certain  in-
herent  risk.  And,  if  in  fact,  the  IG  has  found  that  they  were  over-
seeing  non-certified  facilities  by  phone,  then  clearly  the  FAA,  at 
that  point  in  time  and  we  have  not  increased  by  any  notable  per-
centage  the  number  of  safety  inspectors  since  that  point  in  time. 
I think you can understand the concern. And, what was interesting 
in  your  testimony  just  recently,  I  know  that  American  says  they 
get  surprise  inspections  at  FAA-certified  facilities  all  the  time. 
Would you disagree with that statement? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  No,  as  I  commented,  we  do,  we  often  are  co-lo-
cated  and  the  American  office  that  oversees  American  Airlines  is 
actually  co-located  with  the  American  facilities  and  our  inspectors 
are there on a regular basis. That’s absolutely accurate. 

Senator MCCASKILL. And then you said, well, we can do it at for-
eign repair stations when we need to. Are you implying that some-
how  there  is  a  more  dire  need  to  have  spot  inspections  in  the 
United States of America and not in foreign nations? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  No  ma’am,  all  I  meant  to  indicate  was  that  in 
some places we’re co-located and it’s easier, but there are 5,000 re-
pair  stations  domestically  and  we  don’t,  we  are  not  co-located  by 
all  of  them  and  we  don’t  do  the  kinds  of  oversight  that  we  do  at 
American  Airlines  at  every  one  of  the  repair  stations.  In  most 
cases, we notify people because we are traveling to come to the re-
pair station and so it’s consistent here in the United States and in 
the repair stations that are overseas. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  let’s  assume  that  we  think  spot  in-
spections are important or you wouldn’t be doing them in American 
Airlines, and let’s assume that the reason you’re not doing them at 
foreign  repair  stations  is  because  of  travel  time  and  convenience. 
Wouldn’t  it  be  certainly  appropriate  and,  in  fact,  I  think  you’re 
policies would embrace the idea, that the carrier that is using that 
foreign repair station would pay for the additional time that inspec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

tor would stay or pay for, let’s say they arrive and the paperwork’s 
not there. 

By  the  way,  I  would  think  that  would  be  something  you’d  want 
to know, if they had the paperwork onsite and available for inspec-
tion at any time. 

But,  let’s  assume  that  an  inspector  traveled  to  a  foreign  repair 
station,  got  there,  the  right  people  weren’t  there,  the  right  paper-
work wasn’t there. Isn’t that airline responsible for paying the cost 
for that inspector to stay over as long as it takes to make sure that 
that  facility  is  up  to  the  same  standards  that  we  require  of  Amer-
ican-certified repair facilities? 
Ms. GILLIGAN. To date—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. That is, U.S.A.-certified repair facilities. 
Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Right,  to  date  we  have  charged  fees  to  the  repair 
station  itself,  when  we  do  certification  activities,  when  we  issue 
their first certificate, when we do their yearly or biannual reviews. 
We have never charged anyone for the surveillance, that’s the safe-
ty  oversight  function,  because  we  believe  that  that’s  inherently  a 
public  good  and  it  is  something  that  the  FAA,  because  we  don’t 
want  to  be  limited  in  the  amount  of  that  kind  of  oversight  we  can 
perform, so we don’t want to be limited by having people pay fees. 
To  date,  we  have  not,  we  have  not  charged  fees  to  the  airlines. 
We’d have to look at doing that, but we do charge fees to the repair 
stations  themselves  for  our  inspectors  who  are  doing  that  certifi-
cation work. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  OK,  for  the  repair  stations,  I  mean,  charge 
them  for  the  extra  days  that  are  necessary  to  stay  there.  Is  there 
any reason why that wouldn’t be possible in order to have spot in-
spections in foreign repair facilities just like we have in the United 
States? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Again,  as  a  matter  of  policy,  we  have  not  wanted 
to  charge  fees  for  the  safety  oversight.  We  never  wanted  there  to 
be  any  question  that  we  didn’t  provide  oversight  because  someone 
didn’t pay a fee. So, we have always done that as part of our inher-
ent governmental responsibility. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Well, I’m confused then, because when I of-
fered  my  amendment  in  Committee  that  brought  about  this  hear-
ing,  one  part  of  my  amendment  would  require  the  payment  to  the 
FAA  for  the  cost  of  us  having  to  travel.  Since  cost  is  a  factor  for 
these  airlines,  it  certainly,  I  think,  the  notion  that  the  American 
people  should  not  have  to  underwrite  them  going  to  another  loca-
tion  for  lower  costs.  I  don’t  think  that  most  taxpayers  would  want 
to foot the bill for these airlines going to another country. 

When I, the comment that FAA provided in response to the draft 
of that amendment, said that currently, foreign repair stations that 
are, do hold certificates, must pay for all costs associated with FAA 
inspector oversight, including travel, salary, and benefits. 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Yes,  ma’am.  And  unfortunately,  that  is  correct, 
but  not  complete.  It  is  correct  that  all  those  costs  are  paid  when 
we  do  what  we  refer  to  as  certification  activities,  not  when  we  do 
what  we  call  surveillance  activities.  And,  I  apologize  because  our 
staff  in  responding  to  the  question,  I  believe,  split  the  hair  a  little 
too closely. They do pay for all of the activities that allow a repair 
station  to  get  a  certificate.  That  includes  the  personnel  cost  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

benefits  for  our  inspectors,  as  well  as  their  travel.  But,  when  our 
inspectors are doing surveillance inspection, what we call safety in-
spections,  foreign  repair  stations  do  not  pay  fees  for  that  part  of 
our  work.  Again,  because  we  never  wanted  there  to  be  any  confu-
sion  that  we  were  limited  in  the  amount  of  oversight  we  could  do 
based  on  the  amount  of  fees  that  were  paid.  So,  I  apologize  that 
we  were,  again  I  think,  they  were  accurate  in  the  way  we  use  our 
terminology, but I believe it was confusing and I apologize for that. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  So,  if  you  take  your  airplanes  to  foreign 
countries,  you  are  not  going  to  have  spot  inspections  and  you  can 
enjoy  the  lower  costs  of  labor  in  those  countries  and  the  American 
public  is,  in  fact,  underwriting  the  cost  of  that  outsourcing.  Cor-
rect? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. The, well, the American public is paying for FAA’s 
continued  oversight  of  any  of  the  U.S.  aircraft  that  are  operated 
around the world. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  They’re  paying  the  extra,  they  are  paying 
the  extra  amount  of  money  that  it’s  costing  the  FAA  to  do  what-
ever, in fact, the amount that you have collected versus the amount 
that has been spent. You have collected some, I guess, what you’re 
now saying today, for the certification process. 

Ms. GILLIGAN. That’s correct. That’s right. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  But,  the  taxpayers  are  actually  footing  the 
bill  for  the  extra  amount  the  government  is  having  to  spend  in 
order  for  these  carriers  to  enjoy  lower  labor  costs  in  other  coun-
tries. Isn’t that correct, Ms. Gilligan? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. The inspectors are providing oversight at those fa-
cilities  for  whatever  reasons  that  the  carriers  choose  to  use  them. 
And in some cases, as Mr. Barimo has acknowledged, that the ele-
ment of the cost of the labor is a piece of it. From the FAA perspec-
tive, our inspectors, whether they are located internationally or lo-
cated  domestically,  we  are  doing  our  oversight  to  determine  that 
U.S.-registered  aircraft  meet  the  safety  standards  that  our  regula-
tions  require,  wherever  those  aircraft  operate  in  the  world.  And, 
that’s  how  we  have  viewed  it,  that  it’s  the  same  level  of  oversight 
necessary, wherever that aircraft is operated. 

Senator MCCASKILL. I think the point, obviously, I think you un-
derstand,  and  that  is,  the  taxpayers  are  paying  extra  for  safety  in 
order for the airlines to enjoy lower labor costs. And, I would, well, 
my time’s up and why don’t you go ahead, Senator Rockefeller? 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Madame Chair. 
I  am  going  right  back  to  where  I  left  off.  The  idea  of  unan-
nounced inspections is, in every single respect, offensive to me. We 
have  a  lot  of  coal  mines  in  West  Virginia.  Ninety-nine  percent  of 
West Virginians have never been in a coal mine, except if they hap-
pen to work there because they’re not allowed in there. First Lady 
Eleanor  Roosevelt  did  it,  but  almost  nobody  does.  But,  Governors 
and  Senators  can  do  that,  so  I’ve  been  in  a  lot  of  coal  mines  and 
it  is  just  a  fact  of  life,  it’s  a  fact  of  human  nature,  it’s  a  fact  of, 
in  that  case,  corporate  policy,  and  this  case  may  be  different  or 
may  be  the  same,  that  everything  seems  to  look  better.  It’s  what 
they call rock dusting. The mine looks clean, everything is orderly. 
I’ve never ever, as either a Governor or a Senator, ever been down 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

a coal mine when it just doesn’t look absolutely terrific, for me be-
cause I’m heavily involved in energy issues. 

Now,  I  recognize,  and  I  don’t  say  this  to  denigrate  you  in  any 
way, shape, or form, but you’re under the restrictions of the Office 
of  Management  and  Budget  on  how  you  answer  questions.  And,  I 
do  understand  that  and  the  audience,  I’m  sure,  understands  that. 
You  do  not  have  the  freedom,  maybe,  to  answer  in  the  way  that 
you choose to. And I, again, I don’t criticize you for that. But, I do 
criticize you’re defense and other’s defense of, ‘‘it doesn’t make any 
difference if it’s pre-announced or not.’’ I think it makes all the dif-
ference  in  the  world,  and  if  people  were  to  come  in  and  find,  let’s 
say,  somebody  missing  because  there  was  a  particular  phase  of  an 
inspection, and then so be that. All right, so you don’t get a perfect 
everybody  lined  up  ready  to,  you  know,  show  you  what  they’re 
wares  are.  It  is  a  wrong  thing  to  do.  It  is  a  wrong  thing  to  do.  It 
is  a  more  expensive  thing  to  do,  to  announce  it,  but  it’s  a  wrong 
thing  to  do  for  air  safety.  I  believe  that  with  every  fiber  in  my 
body. 

Along  with  Senator  McCaskill,  I  chair  this  Subcommittee  and  I 
intend  to  follow  through  on  that.  I  just,  I  feel  so  strongly  about  it 
that I can not tell you. 

Second, the whole question of, that was brought up by the union 
with  respect  to,  and  I  just  want  to  get  clear  on  this,  of  people  not 
being able to speak English. And then your answer was, ‘‘Well, we 
can,  we  can  do  that  by  hands-on  training.’’  Any  Senator,  any  busy 
executive,  you,  anybody  who  has  complex  problems  before  them, 
not  only  has  to  have  an  explanation,  but  they  have  to,  probably 
have  to  have  a  binder,  which  they  read  on  the  trip  over  to  remind 
them  of  that  explanation.  And  so,  the  concept  of  actually  people 
just  learning  things  through  hands-on  training,  that  is  assuming 
that  both  parties  speak  a  common  language  and  that  both  parties 
are  qualified  in  every  respect,  is  one  that  I  also  feel  very  strongly 
about.  And,  I’m  not  asking  you,  particularly,  to  comment  on  that. 
I am asking Mr. Scovel to comment on it. 

Mr.  SCOVEL.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I  must  say  we  do  not  have  re-
search  conducted  by  my  office  on  that  specific  point.  However,  I 
would  have  to  acknowledge  the  common  sense  in  your  statement 
that  when  a  mechanic  in  a  foreign  country  cannot  speak  English, 
and  his  or  her  instruction  manuals  are  printed  in  that  language 
and  that  language  only,  that  puts  the  quality  of  the  maintenance 
that he or she will provide at risk. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Anybody else want to comment? 
Mr. FILLER. Yes, Senator. I’d like to. The regulations require that 
persons that are supervising, inspecting, and approving for returns 
of  service  have  to  read,  write,  and  understand  the  English  lan-
guage.  There  is  no  independent  requirement  to  speak  the  English 
language. In the foreign—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Regulations require. 
Mr. FILLER. Yes, sir. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Now, that’s an interesting phrase, isn’t it? 
How  many  times  have  I  heard  that?  What  does  that  have  to  do 
with  follow-up?  This  is  where  the  question  of  oversight,  either—— 

Mr. FILLER. I thought you had asked about—— 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I am. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

tion. 

Mr. FILLER.—speaking English. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  But,  you  helped  me  to  expand  my  ques-

Mr.  FILLER.  OK.  I  think  it’s  relevant  that  individuals  are  re-
quired  to  read,  write,  and  understand  the  English  language  in  a 
foreign repair station, as well as in a U.S. repair station. But, there 
is no requirement that they have to speak it. In a foreign location, 
the  technicians  often  are  looking  at  manuals  that  have  been,  or 
work  cards  that  have  been  translated  into  their  native  language. 
But,  at  the  same  time,  FAA  requirements  are  that  the  records 
must  also  be  translated  into  English  so  they  can  be  evaluated  by 
FAA inspectors. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Please. 
Mr.  ROACH.  What  he  said  was  a  little  tricky.  He  said  the  people 
who  signed  the  book  have  to  have  speak  English.  The  people  who 
do the work are not required to speak or write English. The people 
who are actually hands- on, the people who work it, the person who 
comes  out  after  all  the  work  is  done,  who’s  working  at  that  repair 
station that has to sign the book because that individual has to be 
able to read and write English. But, the person actually tightening 
the  screws  and  changing  things,  they  don’t  have  to  read  or  write 
English to do the work. There’s no certificate to my understanding, 
people  who  are  working  on  aircraft,  they’re  not  required  to  have 
any  particular  certificate.  Only  the  person  who’s  over,  who  has  to 
sign  off  the  log  book,  which  could  be  the  person  for  an  aircraft  or 
a number of aircraft. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Accepting  what  you  say  for  the  moment, 
Ms.  Gilligan,  would  you  care  to  comment  on  that  and  Mr.  Scovel 
would  you  care  to  comment  on  that.  And  I  beg  the  indulgence  of 
the Chair. 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Yes,  Senator.  Actually,  everything  that  both  of 
these gentlemen have said is accurate. Individuals can work on air-
craft  that  do  not  have  to  hold  a  particular  certificate.  They  must 
then  be  under  the  supervision  and  overseen  by  people  who  hold 
proper  certificates  and  authorizations.  Whoever  holds  the  certifi-
cate  has  to  be  able  to  read,  understand,  read  and  understand 
English, as Mr. Filler described. And, that has been the check and 
balance  in  the  system.  It  is  true  that  people  who  work  on  aircraft 
will have work cards, their instruction cards may be translated into 
whatever  is  their  native  language,  but  whoever’s  overseeing  that 
work  is  fluent  in  both  their  language,  both  that  native  language 
and in English, so as to insure that the records are properly main-
tained to demonstrate the work that has been done. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  And  there’s  always  somebody  with  that 

person during the inspection? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  There  is.  The  requirements  for  the  work  to  be 

overseen by someone who’s authorized to do that. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. That’s not my question. 
Ms.  GILLIGAN.  I,  they  are  monitoring  the  work.  There  may  be 
more  than  one  person  doing  work  at  a  time.  They  may  not  be—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Video or—— 
Ms.  GILLIGAN.  It’s  not  a  one  to  one,  it  may  not  be  a  one  to  one 
relationship, but the person who’s going to sign that work off, who 
takes that responsibility very seriously is monitoring the work and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

moment. 

determines  if  the  work  has  been  properly  accomplished  in  accord-
ance with the instruction before signing the authorization for that. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  We’ll  come  back  to  you  Mr.  Roach  in  a 

Let  me  just  say  as  a  matter  of  philosophy  that  I  think,  I  used 
the  word  fugue  a  moment  ago,  which  probably  seemed  a  bit  bi-
zarre—I’m  a  baroque  music  fan—but  I,  to  me  an  aircraft,  and  I 
mentioned  the  13,000  parts,  which  are  individually  accepted  part 
by  part  before  a  first  model  of  the  five  that  have  to  be  approved 
of  a  new  aircraft  are  allowed  to  proceed.  I  consider  the  repair  and 
maintenance work, not on perfectly new pieces of metal, but on po-
tentially  frayed  pieces  of  metal  and  to  what  degree  frayed,  to  a 
dangerous degree, not to a dangerous degree. This is a very subtle 
science,  it’s  an  art  form.  It’s  not  something  which  comes  from  the 
bosom  of  one’s  heart  to  do  a  good  job,  it  comes  from  an  absolute 
knowledge  and  determination  under  110  degree  sun,  presumably 
we  know  that’s  a  little  unfair,  but  sometimes  inside  a  shed,  it  can 
be  that  way  too,  people  can  get  tired  and  you  have  to  be  just  as 
good,  like  a  receptionist  at  any  of  our  offices,  at  6  o’clock  in  the 
evening  as  you  do  at  9  o’clock  in  the  morning.  I  think  that,  that’s 
my  philosophy  of  repair  and  maintenance.  Incredibly  delicate,  in-
credibly  complicated,  and  incredibly,  the  kind  of  thing  you  do  not 
make a mistake upon. 

Mr. Scovel? 
Mr.  SCOVEL.  I  would  concur,  sir.  If  I  may  return  to  one  of  your 
earlier questions on FAA certification of mechanics working at U.S. 
stations versus foreign stations. It is our understanding that, under 
FAA  requirements,  supervisory  and  inspection  personnel  at  a  do-
mestic, FAA-certificated repair station must be certificated by FAA. 
However, for a foreign repair station certificated by FAA, no per-
sonnel must hold a true FAA certificate. Personnel working on air-
craft  are  required  to  fulfill  certain  training  or  experience  require-
ments,  such  as  18  months  of  practical  experience  in  work  being 
performed,  but  they  need  not  hold  the  actual  FAA  certificate.  I 
think that is an important difference to note for the record. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  All  right.  Mr.  Roach,  to  you  and  then 
final  from  my  point  of  view,  Madame  Chair  to  you,  Ms.  Gilligan. 

Ms. GILLIGAN. Thank you, sir. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Did  you  get,  I  think  you  cared  to  com-

ment. 

Mr.  ROACH.  Just  on  the,  the  language  situation.  The  manuals 
that  are  translated  in  those  foreign  repair  stations  are  not  trans-
lated  by  the  manufacturer.  They  are  translated  by  the  foreign  re-
pair station or the carrier and so the manuals that we work on do-
mestically  are  the  manuals  that  have  been  prepared  by  the  manu-
facturer of that particular aircraft. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Are  you  suggesting  by  that  that  they’re 

more in pictorial form? 

Mr.  ROACH.  No,  I’m  saying  that  the  manuals,  the  manuals  are 
prepared by the manufacturer for the maintenance of that aircraft, 
Boeing  or  Airbus  whoever’s  handling,  let’s  say  Boeing.  And  those, 
Boeing does not translate that into any particular language, which 
means that it goes to another party, who then translate what Boe-
ing meant by that manual to somebody else who doesn’t necessarily 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

have the training and skills in maintenance because they’re not re-
quired  to.  Only  the  person  who  oversees  or  supervises  work,  who 
does  not  have  to  be  on-sight.  They  could  be  in  a  room,  which  hap-
pens  quite  frequently,  they  could  be  in  a  room  someplace  when 
they’re  told  this  particular  work  has  been  completed,  to  come  out 
and look at it. So your people out there who do not speak English, 
who  are  reading  manuals  that  have  been  translated  third  hand, 
who  are  performing  this  particular  work.  And,  as  you  indicated, 
there  are  thousands  and  thousands  of  parts  that  are  very  impor-
tant  to  the  safety  of  that,  to  the  airworthiness  of  that  aircraft  and 
so we think that reflects on the safety of the aircraft. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I thank you, sir. 
Ms.  Gilligan,  please  understand  as  I  ask  you,  I  seem  to  be 
peppering you with questions and I apologize, but one thing I real-
ly  do  understand  is  that  all  administrations,  not  just  the  present 
one,  but  the  previous  ones  have  vastly  underfunded  the  Federal 
Aviation  Administration.  I  mean,  you  look  at  our  attendance  here 
and  you  get  a  Congressional  response.  So  that  I,  I  understand,  I 
mean,  there’s  nothing  you  can  do  about  funds.  You  can’t  complain 
about funds and you need funds—and I know that, and I know that 
you know that. 

So, my question for your last response on this is that I recognize 
you are very funds short and we’ve only partly helped you with the 
whole digital air traffic control system yet to build. 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  Thank  you,  sir.  And  if  I,  actually,  if  I  may  com-
ment  on  the  resource  issue.  Actually,  I’m  here  to  thank  the  Con-
gress because, in fact, for this year 2007 under the Continuing Res-
olution  and  for  last  year,  2006,  we  actually  received  in  the  safety 
program  increases  above  the  Presidential  request.  And  we  appre-
ciate those and we understand that those are to make up for some 
short-falls,  which  we  were  able  to  demonstrate  had  occurred  and, 
in fact, we took reductions in our workforce back in the year 2005. 
So,  we  are  actually  quite  appreciative  of  Congress’s  understanding 
of  the  continued  need  to  invest  in  the  safety  infrastructure  that 
FAA needs to put in place. And, we appreciate that. 

I  did  want  to  comment  on  the  Inspector  General’s  comment 
about, at foreign-located repair stations it is true we do not require 
people to hold an FAA certificate, but our inspectors, when they are 
certificating  that  facility,  make  a  finding  that  there  are  people  in 
that facility that meet all of our standards in order to serve in that 
function. So, we do fill that gap. We don’t require them to hold the 
FAA  certificate,  but  we  make  a  finding  that  they  are  competent 
and qualified to meet those same requirements. 

But,  thank  you  for  giving  me  the  opportunity  on  the  resource 
question  because,  in  fact,  Congress  has  been  extremely  supportive 
of the need for us to continue to build our safety infrastructure and 
we appreciate that. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. And that must continue. 
And I’ve doubled my time and I appreciate it, Madame Chair. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Senator Rockefeller. 
I,  unfortunately,  have  to  be  on  the  Chair  to  preside  at  4:30,  so 
we  only  have  10  minutes.  So,  I  will  have  questions  that  I  will  not 
have  time  to  get  to  in  the  next  10  minutes  and  I  will  ask  those  of 
you in writing to add to the record. And, I will appreciate if people 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

can  keep  their  answers  as  brief  as  possible  so  I  can  try  to  get  to 
as many of them as possible before we have to adjourn. 

I think after 9/11 in this country, there was an acceptance of the 
responsibility  that  the  traveling  passenger  has  as  to  what  they 
have to go through to maintain safety and security on an airplane. 
My  mother  has  two  knee  replacements,  I  have  one.  We  accept  the 
fact  that  we  have  to  be  personally  wanded  every  time  we  fly.  I 
think  the  American  public  is  assuming  that  we  are  making  the 
same  kind  of  requirements  of  the  mechanics  that  are  working  on 
these airplanes. 

And,  I  know  this,  that  in  the  IG’s  report  of  February  2003,  that 
during the investigation of the IG, you actually found a staff senior 
aircraft  technician  at  a  foreign  repair  station  was  a  member  of  al- 
Qaeda.  And,  that  your  investigation  revealed  that  that  aircraft 
technician  had  been  photographing  the  U.S.  aircraft  as  potential 
targets  for  a  terrorist  attack.  Have  I  accurately  portrayed  your  re-
port in that regard, Mr. Scovel? 

Mr.  SCOVEL.  Yes,  although,  truly  Senator,  modesty  compels  me 
to  say  that  it  was  not  our  investigation  that  found  the  al-Qaeda 
plant at that repair station. It was other law enforcement authori-
ties.  We  note  that  in  our  report  as  an  example  of  security 
vulnerabilities. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  It  was,  do  you  know  whether  that  foreign 

repair station was certified or non-certified? 

Mr. SCOVEL. It was certified, Senator. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  OK.  Let  me  ask,  in  2003,  Congress  made 
some requirements of TSA in connection with FAA to, in fact, com-
plete  a  rule  imposing  security  standards  on  foreign  and  domestic 
repair  stations  and  it  was  required  that  this  rule  be  done  by  Au-
gust  of  2004.  And,  then  those  security  audits  of  foreign  stations 
were  to  be  completed  18  months  after  the  regulations  were  final-
ized. Am I correct that, to date, not even a proposed rule has been 
issued,  let  alone  a  final  rule  and  that  the  agencies  are  now  30 
months delinquent in meeting this Congressional mandate? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. It is true, Senator. The TSA has not issued a pro-

posed rule for, to meet those security requirements. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  understand  TSA  is  the  lead  agency,  but  I 
believe  that  there  was,  inherent  in  the  legislation,  a  request  that 
you  work  with  its  counterpart,  your  counterpart  in  TSA  to  move 
these rules forward. Have, in fact, you all, do you have any written 
correspondence  or  anything  indicating  that  you  have  been  pushing 
TSA  to,  to  come  out  with  rules  concerning  security  at  repair  sta-
tions, both foreign and domestic? 

Ms.  GILLIGAN.  I  don’t  know  that  there’s  a  written  record.  There 
certainly  have  been  discussions  of  the  language  in  the  legislation 
and  of  the  requirement  that  TSA  must  issue  their  regulations  and 
then make audit findings so that FAA could take the next step. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And,  it’s  my  understanding  that  your  re-
port,  Mr.  Scovel,  not  only  dealt  with  background  checks  as  a  secu-
rity  vulnerability  in  foreign  repair  stations,  but  you  also  talked 
about access to the airport, that was, that you observed by vending 
machine personnel and other contract personnel. And, that you had 
pictures  in  your  report  of  gaps  in  sensing,  of  failure  to  secure  the 
perimeter. Could you briefly summarize the various security lapses 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

that you witnessed at these, and then, and these are actually, I as-
sume, the certified repair stations or were these also non-certified? 
Mr.  SCOVEL.  They  were  certified,  Senator.  I  must  say,  however, 
that  under  Department  rules,  our  report  was  not  classified  in  the 
DOD sense but was marked as Sensitive Security Information. For 
that  reason,  I  am  not  allowed  to  discuss  all  the  details  that  you 
may  be  interested  in  on  the  record  in  an  open  hearing.  However, 
I  would  be  happy  to  discuss  those  with  you  and  your  staff  in  pri-
vate. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I’d  be  anxious  to  visit  with  you  about  that. 
I  think  that  this  security  issue  is  a  major  issue  here,  particularly 
in light of the fact that we’ve had reports that on the non-certified 
facilities,  some  of  the  oversight  being  provided  by  the  airlines  was 
done  by  telephone.  I  don’t  think  that’s  the  kind  of  oversight  that’s 
going to reassure the American public that we’re doing all that we 
can do to make these airplanes secure and safe for travel. 

The 2004 report, FAA report to Congress states that FAA is fur-
ther  revising  the  repair  station  rules  to  update  and  modernize  re-
pair  station  ratings,  and  add  a  quality  assurance  program  to  com-
plete  the  quality  system  requirements  for  both  foreign  and  domes-
tic repair stations. 

The  notice  for  the  proposed  rulemaking  for  this  effort  is  sched-
uled  for  publication  by  the  end  of  the  third  quarter  in  Fiscal  Year 
2005. Was this notice of proposed rulemaking ever issued? 

Ms. GILLIGAN. Yes, I’m sorry, Senator, I just had to check. 
We  did  issue  that  proposal,  and  we  have  received  comments,  we 
are  disposing  of  those  comments.  So  we’ll  be  moving  to  final  rule. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  that  was—it  was  supposed  to  be  done 

by the end of the third quarter 2 years ago. 

Ms. GILLIGAN. That was the notice that was to be issued at that 
time.  I  can  get  you  the  specific  schedule.  I  don’t  recall  if  we  met 
that third quarter date, but it has been out for comment, the com-
ment period has closed, and we are now reviewing those comments, 
and moving to final rule. 

Senator MCCASKILL. OK. Well, I think we’ve talked about the ac-
countability  in  terms  of  a  security  audit  that  Congress  mandated 
that has—they haven’t begun to occur. And, we’ve talked about cer-
tified  versus  non-certified,  and  what  kind  of—we’ve  talked  about 
spot inspections, and not spot inspections, I guess I would just ask 
for comments from any of the witnesses as we close. 

There’s  clearly—there  are  two  standards  in  terms  of  repair  sta-
tions.  You  have  the  standard  that  is  here  in  certified-FAA  repair 
stations in the United States of America, we have spot inspections, 
you  have  the  certified  mechanics,  you  have  oversight  by  the  FAA. 
And then you have a whole lot of repair stations that don’t have 
that  same  level  of  scrutiny  and  that  same  level  of  oversight.  And 
I  would,  since  we  now  know  that  the  majority  of  the  maintenance 
work  is  now  being  done  in  those  that  have  the  lesser  standards,  I 
would  like  any  of  you  who  are  comfortable  and  want  to  comment 
on this double standard to explain to the American traveling public 
why  we  would  ever  want  a  double  standard  as  it  relates  to  the 
maintenance  of  our  aircraft,  and  therefore  the  safety  and  security 
of the aircraft? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

Mr. BARIMO. I’m glad to address it from the airline perspective— 
there  is  no  double  standard.  Airlines  maintain  airplanes  to  a  cer-
tain standard, and that’s universal across the board. 

So,  I  want  to  go  back,  even  to  the  beginning  of  this  hearing, 
where we talked about the scope of work being done by non-certifi-
cated  entities.  And  what  we’re  talking  about  is  a  group  of  licensed 
A&P mechanics who are working under the authority of the airline. 
Generally  doing  low-level,  line  types  of  checks.  So,  functional 
checks,  servicing  the  airplane,  things  like  that—not  heavy  mainte-
nance.  In  every  case,  when  ATA  members  are  using  foreign  repair 
stations  for  heavy  maintenance,  it  is  certificated,  Part  145  repair 
stations. 

So,  I  understand  there  were  some  deficiencies  identified  in  the 
IG’s  report,  I  would  consider  those  isolated  events,  and  there  are 
regulations  that  require  carriers  to  manage  that  properly,  and  if— 
in certain cases—it wasn’t managed properly, then there’s a mecha-
nism to go deal with that. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  I  would  say—we’ve  got  4  minutes.  So, 
I don’t know how many of you want to comment—how many of you 
want  to  comment,  raise  your  hand?  OK,  that  gives  you  each  about 
a minute. 

Mr. Brantley? 
Mr. BRANTLEY. I believe the dual standard that we have is in the 

oversight that’s provided by the FAA. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Right. 
Mr. BRANTLEY. With regard to these foreign repair stations, over-
sight of the actual work performed is a responsibility of an inspec-
tor  in  a  certificate  management  office,  in  the  country  here.  So,  for 
whatever  airline  they’re  tasked  with  providing  oversight  for,  that 
would  be  their  job  to  ensure  that  that  work  is  performed  properly. 
And,  in  order  to  do  that,  they  are  required  to  give  60  to  90  days 
notice—this  isn’t  a  short  lead  time  we’re  talking  about—60  to  90 
days  to  even  be  able  to  go  and  do  an  inspection.  And  there’s  no 
guarantee that when that 90 days is up and they get there, there’s 
still an airplane in there having maintenance done, that they’re re-
sponsible for. 

So, it truly is a nightmare for an inspector to try to do the over-

sight that they’re charged with doing. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Mr. Filler? 
Mr. FILLER. Senator McCaskill, thank you. 
I  just  would  like  to  also  emphasize  the  international  component 
to a lot of the issues that we’re discussing here today. ICAO exists 
because some very smart people over 60 years ago thought that we 
needed  international  safety  standards,  that  would  apply  to  the 
members of the international community. So, all of the things that 
we’re  here  discussing  today  are  all  the  subject  of  ICAO  standards, 
including  security  and  perimeter  checks,  and  background  checks. 
And there is some U.S. oversight of that, and my understanding is, 
TSA  does  do—as  Mr.  Barimo  pointed  out—security  audits  of  some 
foreign  locations.  ICAO  also  does  security  audits  to  ensure  compli-
ance with ICAO standards. 

There’s  a  practical  reason,  as  well,  why  foreign  repair  station 
people  that  might  have  to  be  certificated  if  they  worked  here,  do 
not  have  to  hold  individual  A&P  certificates.  Some  of  these  facili-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

ties,  for  example,  one  of  our  very  prominent  members,  has  35  re-
pair station certificates, from 35 countries. That counts the E.U. as 
only one of those 35. 

If  every  one  of  those  countries  required  their  technicians  to  be 
certificated individually, under the regulations of that local author-
ity as the State of Registry, it could get out of hand pretty quickly. 
I think, as Ms. Gilligan pointed out, the FAA has a performance- 
based rule, they evaluate these people, they make sure they can do 
their  job,  and  if  they’re  technically  not  up  to  the  regulatory  stand-
ard,  then  the  FAA  will  say,  ‘‘Sorry,  you  need  to  put  somebody  else 
in place.’’ 

So, I think the oversight issue you raise is a legitimate issue, but 
I don’t think the traveling public, or this Committee, should be con-
cerned  that  there’s  a  lower  level  of  safety  by  the  work  performed 
by work stations in general, or by foreign repair stations versus do-
mestic repair stations. Thank you. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I’ve  got  time  for,  half  a  minute,  if  anyone 

else wants to comment. 

Mr. SCOVEL. Half a minute, Senator, if I may. 
Our work has shown that non-certificated repair facilities located 
overseas  are  at  the  far  end  of  the  oversight  spectrum.  FAA  over-
sight  of  those  facilities  is  very  thin,  if  not  non-existent  in  most 
cases. 

While safety has not yet been compromised in the form of an ac-
cident,  we  must  question  the  quality  of  the  oversight  and  deter-
mine  what  is  still  needed.  We  have  urged  FAA  in  our  report,  and 
in our testimony today, to directly confront the question of whether 
the  current  system  should  continue,  or  whether  FAA  should  limit 
the type and scope of maintenance that is allowed to be performed 
at non-certificated facilities. 

Mr. ROACH. I have 15 seconds, Senator. 
We have a bargain—the machinists union has a bargain relation-
ship  with  every  major  carrier  in  this  country,  with  the  exception 
of Delta and American. And, in our discussions with the CEOs and 
CFOs, nobody’s ever said to us, there can be work done better over-
seas, it’s always been a cost factor. 

So,  when  somebody  alluded  to  the  fact  that  maybe  something’s 
happening  overseas  that’s  not  happening  here,  we’ve  never  heard 
that from any major carrier, that, it’s always been a cost factor, be-
cause they’re getting the work done a lot cheaper, without benefits 
to  workers,  without  any  concern  about  human  rights  or  anything 
of dignity in these other countries. Thank you. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Let  me  close  by  saying,  I  know  there  was 
reference  made  to  an  isolated  incident.  And,  I  understand  there  is 
a data-related look at performance of these airlines from a mechan-
ical  standpoint.  But  everyone  should  keep  in  mind,  in  terms  of  se-
curity  that,  what  changed  this  nation,  I  think,  could  be  character-
ized as an isolated incident. 

And I appreciate all of your attendance today, and the testimony 

you’ve given, and the hearing is adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 4:30 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

The oversight of aviation safety is one of this Subcommittee’s primary responsibil-
ities. The government has no more important role in making sure that our Nation’s 
aviation system remains the safest in the world. 

I  want  to  thank  Senator  McCaskill  for  requesting  this  hearing  and  aggressively 
seeking to improve our nation’ aviation safety. And, I would like to thank our other 
witnesses for coming today as well. 

I have a few brief remarks and then will ask other Senators if they have opening 

statements. 

First,  I  want  to  state  that  I  firmly  believe  that  the  United  States  has  the  safest 
and best air system in the world. I do not want to give anyone the impression that 
I believe it is unsafe to fly. 

But, the aviation industry continues to change rapidly in light of unrelenting com-
petitive pressures. I am concerned that the quickly changing nature of the commer-
cial  aviation  industry  coupled  with  the  FAA’s  declining  level  of  resources  threatens 
the  agency’s  ability  to  maintain  the  necessary  level  of  oversight  of  air  carriers,  for-
eign  repair  stations,  and  upgrade  the  existing  safety  infrastructure  at  our  airports. 
Although  I  understand  why  many  commercial  airlines  are  contracting  out  an  in-
creasing amount of their maintenance work, I am concerned that this work is being 
sent  to  foreign  countries  where  governmental  oversight  from  both  the  home  nation 
and FAA may be weak or non-existent. 

Compounding  the  industry’s  trend  to  outsource  much  of  its  significant  mainte-
nance work is the inability of the FAA to certify and closely monitor an ever increas-
ing  number  of  foreign  repair  stations.  I  do  not  question  the  agency’s  commitment 
to safety. I believe that this is due mainly to a lack of resources. 

I  am  deeply  concerned  that  the  FAA  is  losing  a  number  of  its  most  senior  safety 
inspectors  and  does  not  have  the  ability  to  replace  all  of  them.  This  Committee,  as 
it  begins  evaluating  the  future  of  the  FAA,  should  be  spending  a  considerable 
amount  of  its  time  making  sure  that  the  agency  is  able  to  meet  its  foremost  mis-
sion—the safety of the traveling public. 

Again, I want to thank Senator McCaskill for her leadership on this issue. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV TO 

HON. CALVIN L. SCOVEL III 

Question. How many inspectors will the FAA hire in 2007? How many inspectors 
does the FAA expect to lose this year? Given that these are highly skilled positions, 
are  there  enough  well  trained  individuals  who  the  FAA  could  hire  to  be  inspectors 
if the Agency has the resources? 

Answer.  FAA  expects  to  hire  approximately  290  aviation  safety  inspectors  in  FY 
2007. During the same period, FAA expects to lose approximately 200 aviation safe-
ty inspectors, which would result in a net increase of 90 inspectors in FY 2007. Con-
gress  approved  additional  funding  for  these  90  inspectors  in  FY  2007,  which  was 
an increase over FY 2006 staffing levels. 

According  to  FAA’s  May  2007  Aviation  Safety  Workforce  Plan,  the  Agency  main-
tains  a  pool  of  about  5,000  qualified  inspector  applicants  that  can  be  hired  quickly. 
These  applicants  have  specialties  in  avionics,  maintenance  and  operations.  We  do 
not  know  whether  FAA’s  statements  are  valid  since  we  have  not  performed  a  de-
tailed  evaluation  in  this  area.  However,  as  FAA  recognizes  in  its  workforce  plan, 
the  Agency  faces  the  challenge  of  hiring  people  with  the  right  skills,  such  as  risk- 
based  decisionmaking  and  data  analyses.  These  skills  are  needed  for  inspectors  to 
work  effectively  in  the  current  aviation  environment  and  with  FAA’s  risk-based 
oversight systems. 

(75) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

We  have  identified  other  shortcomings  in  FAA’s  goals  to  achieve  a  well-trained 

inspector workforce. For example, according to its workforce plan, in FY 2007: 

• FAA’s goal is to hire only 10 percent of new staff with the competencies needed 
to  perform  inspections  using  risk-based  systems;  and,  the  new  staff  only  needs 
to possess two of the nine competencies that are needed. 
• FAA  plans  to  train  a  minimum  of  30  percent  of  existing  inspectors  in  only  one 

course in risk-based competencies. 

Using  risk-based  oversight  systems  is  a  foundational  part  of  FAA’s  plan  to  meet 
future oversight challenges. Therefore, in our view, the Agency needs to step up its 
hiring and training efforts if it is to maintain a sufficient number of inspectors with 
the right skill set to provide oversight of a dynamic aviation industry. 
Supplemental Information 

According to our analyses of FAA records, as of July 21, 2007, FAA had hired 170 
inspectors;  but,  190  inspectors  had  retired.  FAA  will  need  to  work  aggressively  to 
meet  its  goal  to  hire  290  inspectors  by  September  30,  2007.  According  to  its  work-
force  plan,  FAA  does  most  of  its  hiring  during  the  last  two  quarters  of  the  fiscal 
year because of funding delays. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV 

TO MARGARET GILLIGAN 

Question  1.  How  many  inspectors  will  the  FAA  hire  in  2007?  How  many  inspec-
tors does the FAA expect to lose this year? Given that these are highly skilled posi-
tions,  are  there  enough  well  trained  individuals  who  the  FAA  could  hire  to  be  in-
spectors if the Agency had the resources? 

Answer. At the end of Fiscal Year 2007 FAA is projected to have 3,740 ASIs com-
pared  to  3,662  at  the  end  of  Fiscal  Year  2006.  This  is  an  increase  of  78  new  hires 
which will support new certification and surveillance activities related to the growth 
of existing operators and a backfill of 185 positions lost through attrition. 

An  additional  81  ASIs  are  projected  to  be  hired  in  FY  2008.  This  increase  will 
support  new  safety  initiatives  along  with  continued  operational  safety  (core  busi-
ness) to our customers. The increase will also support continuation of the transition 
of air carriers to a system safety approach to oversight. 

In  order  to  ensure  an  adequate  number  of  ASIs,  FAA  has  developed  a  Human 
Capital Plan that is a proactive approach to succession planning for retiring inspec-
tors.  This  plan  takes  into  account  various  demographic  and  geographical  data  and 
identifies the appropriate skill sets required to perform the job. FAA has a central-
ized  applicant  pool  with  a  registry  of  approximately  3,843  qualified  applicants  that 
we use to fill our vacancies. 

Question  2.  I  understand  that  the  FAA  is  shifting  away  from  a  safety  oversight 
system  based  on  individual  inspector’s  skills  and  knowledge  to  a  more  risk  assess-
ment  approach  based  on  data  evaluation.  No  matter  how  sophisticated  FAA’s  risk 
assessment  approach  becomes  in  identifying  high  priority  sites  to  monitor,  is  there 
any real substitute to a human inspection? 

Answer. There will always be a need for inspectors to perform onsite inspections. 
What’s  important  is  that  we  establish  what  to  inspect  based  on  an  assessment  of 
risk.  The  Air  Transportation  Oversight  System  (ATOS)  provides  automated  tools 
that  analyze  the  data  collected  by  our  inspectors  and  point  them  toward  elements 
of  a  carrier’s  system  that  might  present  a  risk.  In  this  way,  we  ensure  the  most 
efficient use of our safety oversight resources. 

Question  3.  According  to  Mr.  Brantley’s  testimony,  insufficient  funding  for  travel 
obviously has impacted the FAA’s ability to perform oversight of foreign repair sta-
tions.  Mr.  Brantley  asserts  that  increasingly  FAA  inspections  of  major  repair  sta-
tions that perform heavy maintenance work have been canceled or cut short due to 
lack of funds. According to inspectors in the field, the inspection process has become 
primarily  budget  driven  rather  than  motivated  by  safety.  Please  comment  on  this 
statement.  Has  the  FAA  cut  down  on  the  inspection  of  heavy  maintenance  work? 
Answer.  The  FAA  does  not  agree  that  inspections  of  major  repair  stations  that 

perform heavy maintenance have been canceled due to lack of travel funds. 

In FY 2006 and 2007, Congress has provided substantial budget increases to allow 
us  to  hire  additional  inspectors.  The  cost  of  hiring  an  inspector  includes  the  per-
sonnel  costs  and  benefits  required,  as  well  as  the  costs  for  training  and  travel  to 
make  the  inspector  competent  and  effective.  The  FAA  ensures  that  critical  safety 
travel resources are available for inspectors to perform their safety oversight respon-
sibilities. The FAA is not aware of any travel canceled due to funding issues. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV 

TO MARSHALL S. FILLER 

77 

Question  1.  Representatives  from  your  organization  have  stated  in  the  press  that 
the oversight of facilities in places such as Britain and Portugal was often more rig-
orous  than  in  the  United  States.  I  would  expect  the  European  Joint  Aviation  Au-
thority  to  have  a  rigorous  safety  system  in  place;  but  I  am  concerned  that  other 
countries whose aviation governance systems are not as mature may not be as thor-
ough. 

Answer. All 189 member countries are required to follow International Civil Avia-
tion Organization (ICAO) safety and security standards and virtually all foreign re-
pair  stations  are  located  in  Category  1  countries  (i.e.,  countries  that  the  FAA  has 
found  to  be  in  compliance  with  ICAO  standards.)  More  importantly,  the  FAA  (not 
the  foreign  authority)  is  responsible  for  monitoring  compliance  with  14  CFR  part 
145. 

In  those  cases  where  a  maintenance  bilateral  agreement  exists  (such  as  France, 
Germany, Ireland and soon to be expanded to other members of the E.U.), the FAA 
does rely on findings made by the foreign safety inspectors just as the foreign avia-
tion authorities rely on the FAA’s oversight findings of U.S. facilities to ensure com-
pliance with the foreign government’s requirements. 

However, in most cases, maintenance on U.S.-registered aircraft and related com-
ponents  is  NOT  governed  by  a  bilateral  agreement.  Therefore,  FAA  inspectors  per-
sonally oversee those facilities, wherever they are located. A foreign repair station’s 
compliance  with  part  145  is  ensured  through  normal  surveillance  and  frequent  re-
certification  inspections,  an  activity  that  is  not  required  domestically.  ARSA  urges 
the  Congress  to  ensure  that  the  FAA  has  sufficient  funding  to  conduct  surveillance 
activities at all repair stations, wherever they are located. 

Question  2.  Does  the  Aeronautical  Repair  Station  Association  maintain  minimum 
requirements  for  its  members  with  regard  to  the  level  and  quality  of  background 
checks? Are there any international standards for repair stations or can anyone who 
can find mechanics and planes to work on open a business? 

Answer. ARSA does not set a standard for members regarding background checks. 
Regulations  issued  by  the  country  where  the  facility  is  located  dictate  the  need  for 
such  checks  depending  primarily  on  the  location  of  the  facility.  Domestically,  many 
repair  stations  located  at  an  airport  are  required  to  have  their  personnel  undergo 
criminal background checks under TSA regulations if they require unescorted access 
to the designated airport security identification display area (SIDA). Therefore, a re-
pair station employee that performs line maintenance for an air carrier would have 
the  same  10-year  criminal  background  check  requirement  as  an  airline  mechanic. 
Many repair stations voluntarily implement additional security procedures since the 
quality and safety of their work directly affects their business. 

Internationally,  the  International  Civil  Aviation  Organization  (ICAO)  sets  stand-
ards for maintenance, security, and safety. Member countries must adopt or validate 
regulations that comply with those standards, including personnel licensing, certifi-
cation of air operators and approved maintenance organizations. In fact, FAA regu-
lations are based on ICAO standards. 

Each country must implement the types of security procedures to be followed just 
as  they  must  do  in  the  safety  area.  These  are  based  on  the  standards  contained  in 
ICAO Annex 17 and thus are very similar to TSA regulations. They include, but are 
not limited to: 

• A  national  civil  aviation  security  program  with  continuous  threat  monitoring 

and mandatory quality control procedures; 

persons with unescorted access to restricted security areas; and 

• Airport security programs for each airport serving international carriers; 
• Air operator security programs; 
• Background  checks  for  persons  implementing  security  control  measures  and 
• Periodic ICAO security audits. 
The  professionals  at  the  TSA,  ICAO  and  other  countries’  security  oversight  orga-
nizations have concluded that resources should be focused where the threat is great-
est.  Therefore,  FAA-certificated  foreign  repair  stations  working  on  components  and 
located  miles  away  from  an  airport  are  not  required  to  implement  background 
checks  for  their  employees.  However,  if  they  perform  line  maintenance  at  an  inter-
national airport or otherwise require access to the ramp area, foreign repair station 
employees  would  be  subject  to  similar  security  requirements  as  their  FAA  counter-
parts, including background checks. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

Neither  domestic  nor  international  security  requirements  are  based  on  whether 
a person works for an airline or a repair station; they are dependent on the degree 
of  access  the  individual  has  to  the  restricted  security  areas  of  an  airport.  Further, 
mandating  additional  security  requirements  where  none  are  truly  needed  will  re-
allocate  limited  oversight  resources  from  areas  where  the  threat  is  greater.  This 
could have the unintended consequence of reducing the level of security for the trav-
eling public. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:43 May 10, 2012 Jkt 074105 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\74105.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

